Most converts in the revivals that preachers like Finney and Beecher led, perhaps three-fourths of them, were women who then prayed and lobbied for their husbands and families to convert. Finney and his closest lieutenant, Theodore Dwight Weld, encouraged women to be active in their religious communities. Where New England churches had urged women to keep silent except at home, the new generation of revivalists welcomed them as prayer leaders and preachers. Such speaking in “promiscuous assemblies,” may have been familiar in Baptist and even Methodist churches, but it was new in the more middle-class Presbyterian and Congregational churches. Women who became religious leaders in the revivals often also became leaders in their communities. The movement demanding womens rights that swept the United States in the 1840s sprang from the same areas of upstate New York that revivalists called the burned-over district (see Chapter 12). The link was not surprising.
For Finney, conversion meant that one needed to show one’s new faith in ethical behavior, and no ethical behavior was more important to him than opposing slavery. Upstate New York’s churches sent revivalist preachers into the rest of the country to preach for the abolition of slavery. For the next 30 years, the Finney-Weld brand of revivalism spread across the country and was one of the streams of abolitionism that inspired Northerners to fight a war to end slavery.
The rights of women and opposition to slavery were not the only reform causes to spring from the revivalism of the Second Great Awakening. Other reformers, inspired by the same forces, began to advocate for important changes in the way prisoners were treated. Too often, they said, overcrowded prisons were simply schools for crime, and the focus on punishment, whatever the original crime, did little to redeem or reclaim prisoners to reenter society. At first, reformers advocated the building of prisons in which each prisoner would be confined to a solitary cell where they would have time to reflect on their past, be taught new habits, and prepare to reenter society. But too often, the solitary confinement led to insanity rather than reform. In response, prison reformers built a new kind of prison in which each prisoner had a separate cell, but also had access to common dining quarters, workshops, and a chapel. In all of these spaces, the authorities sought to teach prisoners a new way of behaving as preparation for reclaiming them. In the 1830s, the New York state penitentiary at Auburn was redesigned to foster the new approach, and soon thereafter, a large new penitentiary at Sing Sing on the Hudson River was built with 1,000 cells plus the common areas. Reformers hoped that the new, more humane approach would change lives and ultimately society. Other states quickly followed in adopting the new models.
Many mentally ill people were treated very much like prisoners before the reforms, and they often found themselves in similar circumstances. Reformers quickly took up the cause of those they said were insane. Perhaps no one equaled Dorothea Dix as a reformer in the treatment of the mentally ill. In 1843, Dix told the Massachusetts fegislature that she was calling their attention “to the present state of Insane Persons confined within this Commonwealth, in cages, closets, cellars, stalls, pens! Chained, naked, beaten with rods, and lashed into obedience!” Moreover, she had the facts to
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 289
This illustration from an anti-alcohol publication makes the claim that drunkenness was the cause of many problems in society, especially the abuse of women.
prove her point. The result, beginning in Massachusetts, was that a system of state hospitals for the insane replaced the earlier prisons.
Many other reforms also blossomed. Although the campaign against alcohol would reach its peek many decades later, it began during the Second Great Awakening. Lyman Beecher preached temperance sermons that were widely reprinted, including one in which he said, “What then is this universal, natural, and national remedy for intemperance? It is the banishment of ardent spirits from the list of lawful objects of commerce...” Many, including members of Congress took the pledge to stop drinking, the U.S. Army stopped the old tradition of a ration of alcohol, and refusing to drink became a mark of religious observance in many circles. At the same time, the American Peace Society advocated an end to all wars. The American Sunday School Union distributed not only Bible stories, but also basic reading books in places where there were no schools. Schools were opened for those who were deaf and blind. Efforts were made to rescue prostitutes. Countless reforms designed to create a better, more humane, and sometimes more tightly controlled society emerged from the enthusiasm of the awakening.
Utopian Religious Communities
The religious enthusiasm of the early 1800s also inspired untraditional ways of thinking about religious matters. Large American spaces that allowed people to develop their own communities relatively undisturbed and the American emphasis on liberty, even the liberty to be eccentric, made the United States fertile ground for radical experiments and utopian religious communities. Some of these religious experiments were short lived. Others lasted for generations. A few, most of all the Mormons, have continued to the present.
MOTHER ANN LEE AND THE SHAKERS
The founder of the United Society of Believers in Christ’s Second Appearing, or the Shakers, was Ann Lee—known as Mother Ann Lee—who before the American Revolution gathered a few supporters in England and came to America in 1774. Lee was convinced that she was receivings special revelation from God that human sexuality was the basis of all sin and celibacy was the only way to live a godly life. Lee inspired Shaker communities in New York and New England. Shaker worship reflected Lee’s spirituality and, according to observers, included, “shaking and singing, hopping and turning, smoking and running, groaning and laughing-Shaker communities at New Lebanon, New Hampshire; Sabbath Day Lake, Maine; and elsewhere thrived, and the Shakers became one of the largest and most successful of the pre-Civil communitarian movements.
290 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
SBlSglMKBiiaMSiBB
In Shaker worship and community life, women and men were kept separate, but all participated in lively music and dance designed to shake sin out of their bodies.
Shaker theology placed Ann Lee on a par with Jesus and committed the society to the equal leadership of women with men. But Shakers were united by their community life more than by theology. They demanded celibacy, a requirement that limited the community’s appeal and prevented increasing membership by means of childbirth. Instead, all new members had to be converts who were attracted to Shaker life. The revivals produced many such converts who sought a deeper spiritual life than they found in traditional churches. Shaker beliefs were reflected in their commitment to making things of beauty, and Shaker furniture remains a reminder of their beliefs.
American Voices
The Shaker Community, “Tis the Gift to be Simple,” 1830s
rhe simplicity and joyfulness of the Shakers have infiltrated American culture in many ways. Shaker furniture, now so popular, was not just a product for them. Mildred Barker, leader of a Shaker Community in Maine, who died in 1990, once reflected, "I almost expect to be remembered as a chair or a table." But Barker reminded those who came to interview her that behind oil of the Shakers' physical artifacts, "There's the religion." And while many of their complex theological ideas have largely been forgotten, the basic joy, humility, and playfulness of the Shakers continue to be remembered in this familiar hymn that dates to the 1830s:
Tis the gift to be simple, 'tis the gift to be free;
Tis the gift to come down where we ought to be;
And when we find ourselves in the place just right,
Twill be in the valley of love and delight.
When true simplicity is gaind,
To bow and to bend we shan't be asham'd To turn, turn will be our delight,
'Till by turning, turning we come round right.
Source: Stephen J. Stein, The Shaker Experience in America (New Haven: Yale University Press, 1992), p. 191.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
What values and priorities are extolled in the hymn?
2.	Historical Interpretation
Why might simplicity, certainty, and humility have been particularly appealing to 1830s Americans? What aspects of the larger society might Shakers have found most disturbing and unwelcome?
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 291
10.2
The things they created, whether furniture, houses, or art, were owned in common, not individually, a requirement that some found as difficult to accept as celibacy.
JOHN HUMPHREY NOYES AND THE ONEIDA COMMUNITY
The Oneida Community also had its roots in the Second Great Awakening and flourished in Oneida, New York, between 1848 and 1879. Its founder and spiritual guide was John Humphrey Noyes, who was born in Vermont in 1811. As a student for the ministry, he became convinced that repentance from sin was not enough and that people should simply stop sinning. Noyes became convinced that all Christians could achieve a state “in which all the affections of the heart are given to God, and in which there is no sin.” Gathering a small community in Putney, Vermont, he expanded his definition of Christian perfectionism to include what he called “complex marriage,” an arrangement in which monogamy was replaced with many sexual companions. Noyes argued that sexual pleasure was a gift from God and that Christianity demanded the sharing of that gift without any exclusive or jealous reservations.
Vermont authorities, however, took a dim view of these sexual practices and beliefs, and Noyes and his followers moved to Oneida, New York, where the community thrived for decades, supported ultimately by producing and selling silverware. Oneida eventually fell victim to Victorian morality and to its dependence on Noyes as its single charismatic leader. Between 1875 and 1879, Oneida was torn by debates as New York authorities began threatening arrests for Oneida’s flouting of the marriage laws. Noyes fled to Canada and the community dissolved although the silver business supported former members for generations.
ROBERT OWEN AND THE NEW HARMONY COMMUNITY
After making a fortune in London, Robert Owen founded a model factory town at New Lanark, Scotland, in which he sought to put the spirit of universal welfare into practice. In the early 1820s, Owen decided to relocate his utopian vision of a community designed to benefit all of it members and establish it in the United States. In early 1825, 900 people arrived at New Harmony, Indiana, where Owen had purchased land. But New Harmony failed within a year. The community could not attract enough skilled workers to make it economically successful. There was tension between those who ran New Harmony and the rest of the community. As one disaffected resident recalled, the “aristocrats” quarreled, and the fields went to ruin. Owen lost most of his fortune, which he had invested in New Harmony, but returned to England to continue to advocate his version of social reform.
f
JOSEPH SMITH AND THE CHURCH OF JESUS CHRIST OF THE LATTER-DAY SAINTS
Joseph Smith (1805-1844) was as much a product of New York’s burned-over district as Charles G. Finney. Smith was born in 1805 and moved with his family to a farm in Palmyra, New York, when he was age 11. In 1827, word spread along the Erie Canal that Smith had found a treasure that would unlock the Indian history of the area. He had, he said, found golden plates and magical stones known as Urim and Thummim with which to read and translate what was written on the plates by an ancient prophet-historian named Mormon. He published the result, the Book of Mormon, in 1830. With that book, a uniquely American religious tradition was born, one that its followers believed represented a rebirth of true Christianity. Smith, however, did much more than publish a new book; he organized a community. Within a month of the book’s publication, the first Mormon community began to form near Palmyra, New York, with Smith as its leader. Some responded with hos-
• tility to his efforts, even tarring and feathering Smith at one point. But converts seeking religious truth poured in, a temple was built, and the community grew.
In response to the hostility, Smith and the Mormon community moved first to Missouri and then in the late 1830s, to Nauvoo, Illinois, which became the largest and fastest growing city in Illinois because of Mormonism. The city’s 15,000 residents
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
became a virtually autonomous state, and their militia was recognized by state law. But Smith s political involvements and religious teaching, especially his suggestion that all members participate in marriages involving one husband and multiple wives, brought renewed hostility. On June 27, 1844, a mob killed Smith and his brother Hyrum.
With Smith’s death, Brigham Young became the new leader of the Mormons in 1847 and led them on a cross-continent trek to the shores of the Great Salt Lake in what is now Utah. Salt Lake was then on the northern edge of the Republic of Mexico, which was soon to be annexed by the United States. There, far from any governmental authority, they set up settlements in a tight, church-regulated community. They also embraced Smith s revelation that a man could take as many wives as he could support.
But the Treaty of Guadalupe Hildago, which marked the end of the U.S. War with Mexico from 1846 to 1848, brought Salt Lake City and the Mormon community under the control of the U.S. government. For a while, the U.S. government left the Mormons alone, but in 1857, President James Buchanan replaced Young with a non-Mormon territorial governor, and the Mormon War broke out as federal authorities tried to enforce monogamy on the Mormons and the Mormons fought back. In one well-publicized incident, Mormons massacred a group of non-Mormon settlers. Only in 1890, after an intense time of prayer and a new revelation, did the Mormon leadership abandon plural marriage. Relations with the government improved, and Utah became a state in 1896. Of all the new religious communities spawned during the Second Great Awakening, the Church of Jesus Christ of the Latter-Day Saints has been the most successful.
Mormons, like those shown in this wagon train, crossed the plains and mountains to get to new homes in Utah.
Transcendentalism
In 1838, far from Salt Lake City or the revivals of New York, Ralph Waldo Emerson gave a speech at Harvard Divinity School in Cambridge, Massachusetts, that had as much impact as any revival sermon. Emerson had been ordained as a Unitarian minister but had resigned when he came to believe that the Lord’s Supper and public prayer were barriers to direct experience of the divine.
In the Divinity School Address, Emerson told an audience of future Unitarian ministers that too often in formal worship, “The soul is not preached.” And he said, “The true preacher can be known by this, that he deals out to the people his life,—life passed through the fire of thought.” Emerson’s call to preach “throbs of desire and hope” rather than formal theology offended most of his audience and he was never invited back to the Divinity School, but the speech represented a new approach to religious life that was developing in America in the 1830s.
While Emerson continued to develop his ideas for another 40 years, the Transcendentalist movement with which he is most associated blossomed in the 1830s. In 1836, a group that came to call themselves the Transcendental Club met at the Boston home of George Ripley, another Unitarian minister, to discuss ideas. The members of the club created a theology that reflected a powerful personal experience of life.
In 1841, under Ripley’s leadership, members of the Transcendental Club founded Brook Farm, a utopian community in West Roxbury, Massachusetts, where the residents sought to support themselves through manual labor. Women and men shared work equally, and an effort was made at true gender equity. But few of the residents of Brook Farm actually knew much about farming, the farm did not prosper, and the community disbanded in 1847. Nevertheless, Emerson’s writings and the Transcendental movement he helped launch reflected an impatience with “old ways” and a desire for direct and immediate experience of the divine that continued to impact American religious life.
10.2
Quick Review How did the increasing diversity of religion in America reflect other political and social changes in the nation?
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 293
DEMOCRATIZED EDUCATION: THE BIRTH OF THE
COMMON SCHOOL
_________________ Explain thG dGVGloprnent of public education as a result of, and in response to, the cultural currents of the 1820s and 1830s.
103
The years during which Andrew Jackson dominated American politics were also years in which the nations public school system was radically transformed, though the transformation was mostly the work of Jacksons staunch opponents. Many of the most prominent education reformers were Whigs who did not share Jackson’s vision for American society. They often sought to change the ways schools were organized and conducted for the same reasons they opposed Jackson politically. Schools, Whig educators believed, could build a new American culture more to their liking than the Jacksonian brand of democracy that most school reformers found too individualistic and unlikely to transmit the kind of moral code they thought was essential to a well-regulated national life.
Various individuals with their own agendas contributed to what came to be known as the Common School Crusade. Catherine Beecher sought to empower women by opening the doors for them to become school teachers. Horace Mann, a Whig Party leader, helped launch a new and more tightly organized school system in Massachusetts—a system that came to serve as a model for much of the nation. Ihe transformation of the nation’s schools in this period was a key dynamic of the changing culture of the United States between the 1820s and the 1840s.
Women Become Teachers
In 1835, Catharine Beecher, daughter of the religious leader Lyman Beecher, was already well known for founding the Hartford Female Seminary to help educate women and for her petitions seeking to stop Jackson’s Indian Removal. In her Essay on the Education of Female Teachers published in that year, Beecher argued that women were much better equipped than men to be teachers, but she also wanted to educate them for the work. She saw teaching as an extension of motherhood, a nurturing role: “What is the most important and peculiar duty of the female sex? It is the physical,
, n' "I0 u Very y°un9 women' taught school, most often in one-room schools like this one where ch' dren of 311 ages learned to read, write, count, and then advance through more complex assignments. No all the schools were as comfortable as the one shown here and not all the children were as well behaved.

Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
intellectual, and moral education of children. She continued, “Woman, whatever are
her relations in life, is necessarily the guardian of the nursery, the companion of child-
hood, and the constant model of imitation. It is her hand that first stamps impressions
on the immortal spirit, that must remain forever.” At a time when most teachers were
still men, Beecher argued not only that women actually made better teachers than
men, but also that including women as teachers would expand the supply of teachers
for the country and open the door to a professional life for middle-class women who
had few employment options.
Beecher’s impassioned views reflected those of Emma Willard, who had founded the Troy Female Seminary in 1821 in upstate New York to prepare women to be teachers. Like Beecher, Willard had argued, “There are many females of ability, to whom the business of instructing children is highly acceptable.” She also believed that women should get the same education as men and modeled the curriculum at Troy on what men studied at college, though she added courses on how to teach. In 1837,
Mary Lyon founded Mount Holyoke Female Seminary in Massachusetts to give future female teachers a college education.
New Structures for Schooling
While Catharine Beecher and her colleagues were transforming the gender of the
teaching profession, other reformers sought to transform the structure of schools.
None of these leaders was more important than Horace Mann. In 1836, Mann, a
rising star in the Massachusetts Whig Party, helped shepherd a bill through the
Massachusetts legislature that created a state Board of Education. He then became
the boards full-time, paid secretary. Mann spent the next 12 years advocating tighter
state standards for education, more money for schools and teacher salaries, and a
better education for children. He became the best-known spokesperson for public
education of his generation.
Mann believed in state standards for the schools. He described the schools of Massachusetts as, “so many distinct, independent communities.” Mann meant to change that. He also believed that it was the responsibility of all citizens to pay taxes to support schools; looking at the conditions of the state’s schools when he took office, he did not think that they paid nearly enough at the time in such taxes. Like Beecher and Willard, Mann wanted educated teachers and created a system of state-sponsored teacher preparation schools, called “normal schools,” that offered 1 year of state-funded preparation to any young woman or man who wanted to be a teacher. Mann’s greatest concern, however, was the moral education of the state’s citizens. He believed that there needed to be a public guardian of morality, and since the United States had no state church, that guardian had to be the public school.
While Mann was the best-known educational reformer, almost all Whigs also came to advocate the same changes he did: state systems of education, state support for teacher preparation, and state efforts to ensure a common morality. Like many reformers, Mann and his allies could not understand why anyone would oppose them.
Yet even in Massachusetts, there was opposition. Jacksonian Democrats in the legislature tried to abolish the Board of Education and the office of secretary. They saw the state control that Mann advocated as expensive, unnecessary, and an unwarranted interference by the state in local affairs, which would undermine local support for each town’s school.
Roman Catholics were especially unhappy with the growing influence and cost of the public school system. Catholics saw the public schools as essentially a Protestant venture, something Protestants like Mann could never understand. Mann advocated teaching the Protestant Bible in school “without note or comment,” leaving it to churches or parents to interpret it. But Catholics believed that the Bible should be read in light of the teachings of the Church and not left to individual interpretation.
Chapter 10 Democracy
in the Age of Andrew Jackson 295
10.3
They found anti-Catholic bias in many of the textbooks the public schools used To pay taxes only to have their children read such material outraged them. Citing examples from textbooks that spoke of “deceitful Catholics,” Catholics in New York City wrote that they could not “in conscience, and consistently with their sense of duty to God, and to their offspring” send them to the city’s public schools and requested public funds so that they could operate their own schools. When such funds were denied Catholics in New York and around the country started their own parochial system at their own expense.
The Nation's Textbook: McGuffey's Reader
claws
catch
harks
scratch
J {
L
The j ler. ; p teeth: : she will: she will i
In 1836, the small Cincinnati publishing house of Truman and Smith brought out a new textbook for schools. The first McGuffeys Reader became part of a series, the McGuffey's Primer, McGuffey's Speller, and the First through the Sixth McGuffey's Eclectic Readers. By 1920, when most school districts had turned to other materials, 122 million copies of the books had been sold.
The McGuffey Reader offered lessons in reading and public speaking designed to create a unified, literate, and patriotic society. The Readers reflected the same morality that Mann and Beecher wanted the schools to teach. They included patriotic speeches by Patrick Henry and stories of George Washington as well as tales of the poor boy and his faithful dog or the poor boy who worked hard and made good. The texts also included ethical instruction, for example, don’t steal apples from someone else’stree, and instruction in how to speak and present oneself. The goal was a citizenry that could speak well, participate in a common democratic dialogue, and use a common national language instead of regional dialects.
A story in the Second Eclectic Reader is illustrative of the McGuffey approach. “Henry, the Bootblack,” begins with the story of Henry, “a kind good boy.”
Henry’s “father was dead, and his mother was very poor. He had a little sister about two years old.” One day, Henry found a pocketbook. He could have kept all the money in it, but he found the owner and returned it. The owner then gave him a dollar for doing so. Henry used the dollar to set himself up as a bootblack and he was “so polite that gentlemen soon began to notice him, and to let him black their boots.” When Henry brought home his first fifty cents in earnings his mother responded, “You are a dear, good boy, Henry. I did not know how I could earn enough to buy bread with, but now I think we can manage to get along quite well.” This account is not the kind of success story that would appear fifty years later. In the story, Henry does not go on to own a factory or make a fortune. He is simply a dutiful child who makes his mother happy. The students who read the McGuffey texts were urged to do the same. They were also urged to learn the correct pronunciation and spelling for support, boots, notice, money, and other words in the story. McGuffey was teaching a common morality but also a common American English to all students.
The United States that the Readers portrayed was white, middle class, hard working, and willing to sacrifice for the common good. The Readers also demanded a high standard of reading ability and moved students step by step to attain it. In one-room schoolhouses, often staffed by teachers with little training, which was the national norm throughout the 1800s, a teacher could encourage different stu dents to move from Reader to Reader in careful order and be confident that, by the time the student had mastered the Sixth Eclectic Reader, he or she would be fluent in the English language and in the nation s

( »
OF THE ECLECTIC HEHEIS.
See how this dog stands on his feet. He Wants to play with John.
A dog has four feet. A dog and a cat can see in the dark.
Hogs keep watch at night and hark, lliey bark most when the moon shines.
A dog will chase a sheep, or a hog, or a co5V? an(j bjte it. If you are kind to dog, he will not bite you.
ike	Riders were filled with patriotic speeches and stories
Ictr,.e. °ne S °Wr> here, designed to teach morality, in addition to istruction on	,
^-ummon ways of pronouncing key terms.
296 Part IV
Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
ethical norms. Not everyone agreed with the specific values the Readers taught, and reformers were often tone-deaf to complaints, but the public schools and their teachers shaped American culture as significantly as any of the religious, political, or commercial ventures of the Age of Jackson.
Quick Review Why might education be increasingly important in an expanding country?
CONCLUSION
Andrew Jackson was like no other president before him. He had no connection to the Founding Fathers, either by blood, class, or any similar privilege. Jackson was determined to make the presidency the center of American government, believing that the government should be an expression of his agenda and of his party. In his two terms as president, Jackson successfully prodded Congress to bend to his will or used executive power to realize his goals, despite fierce opposition. A complex American leader with a long-standing distrust of centralized government, his views were reflected in his actions: an Indian Removal policy that forced thousands of Native Americans out of their ancestral homes in Illinois, Georgia, Mississippi, Alabama, and Florida and on to new lands in present-day Oklahoma; opposition to the Second Bank of the United States because he thought the federal government should have no role in banking, issuing paper currency, or expanding credit; and the Nullification Crisis in which Jackson successfully challenged South Carolina’s efforts to declare federal law null and void in that state. Those actions would have long-lasting effects on the nation.
For many Americans in the decades between 1820 and 1850, the growth of a more popular democracy and popular social movements led by ordinary citizens were far more important than President Jackson’s policies or opinions. Along with the market revolution that was transforming the physical, commercial, and political landscapes of the United States, the Age of Jackson, as his years in the White House were called, was also a period of social and religious revival and reform. It was the peak of a long-running series of religious revivals known as the Second Great Awakening. This upsurge in religious activity resulted in greater rights for women, stronger opposition to slavery, and radical transformation of the nation’s public schools, whose teachers and moral teachings shaped American culture as significantly as any of the religious, political, or commercial ventures of the Age of Jackson.
CHI R E
Considering the political, economic, and social aspects of the "Age of Jackson," to what extent was the United States in that period different from the beginning
of the 1800s?
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson
Chapter 10 Chapter Review
10.1
JACKSONIAN DEMOCRACY
Analyze Jackson's advocacy for Indian Removal, his opposition to the Bank of the United States, his support for a tariff, and the impact of these policies on other Americans.
Review Questions
1.	Comparison
How did Jackson’s vision of the presidency differ from that of his predecessors?
2.	Crafting Arguments
What were Jackson’s most important political priorities? What connections can you make between his policies and his vision of the presidency?
3.	Historical Interpretation
What does the debate over Indian Removal tell you about political divisions in the United States in the 1830s? What groups were most likely to support removal? What groups were most likely to oppose it?
4.	Synthesis
In what ways was the Nullification Crisis part of a longstanding disagreement about the nature of American government that went at least as far back as the debate over ratification of the Constitution?
DEMOCRATIZED RELIGION: THE SECOND GREAT AWAKEN I NG_______________________________________________
Analyze the diversity of American religious experience and how the freedom of the era gave rise to diverse religious expressions.
Review Questions
5.	Synthesis
How did the role of religion in American society and culture change between 1800 and 1840? What explains the changes you note?
10*2
6.	Historical Interpretation
What might explain the close connection between calls for religious revival and campaigns for social reform in the 1830s and 1840s?
7.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the various utopian religious com. munities of the early 1800s. What common features die they share? What common forces might have contributes to their emergence?
DEMOCRATIZED EDUCATION: THE BIRTH OF THE COMMON SCHOOL
i 103
Explain the development of public education as a result of, in response to, the cultural currents of the 1820s and 1830s. i
Review Questions
8.	Contextualization Why did reformers like Catherine Beecher believe women had a natural aptitude for teaching? In what ways did Beecher see teaching as a natural extension of women’s role in the home?
9.	Crafting Arguments
Is it fair to describe Mann’s system of public education, as some of his opponents did, as nothing more than a vehicle for imposing mainstream Protestantism on all Americans? Why or why not?
10.	Historical Interpretation
How did textbooks in The McGuffey Reader series shape the society and culture of the United States in the first half of the 1800s?
298 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
1830-1853
In this painting, Emigrants at Kanesville by William Henry Jackson, a backlog of wagons waits to be ferried across the Missouri River at Council Bluffs, Iowa.
In the summer of 1845, the Democratic Review, a New York City paper edited by John L. O’Sullivan, urged the nation to annex the independent Republic of Texas: "It is time now for opposition to the annexation of Texas to cease,” Sullivan wrote. Texas was a hot topic, and many newspapers were taking the same position. But the Review claimed that including Texas in the United States was an essential part of the fulfillment of our manifest destiny to overspread the continent allotted by Providence for the free development of our yearly multiplying millions. Manifest Destiny quickly became a core American belief. It was a mindset that justified the Louisiana Purchase of 1803, the hoped-for U.S. acquisition of the Oregon Territory along with the northern half of Mexico including Texas and California, and a significant influence across the Pacific Ocean.
Manifest Destiny gave a new name to an old idea. Even before the
American Revolution and in growing numbers in the 1790s, white Americans had crossed the Allegheny Mountains in spite of government prohibitions and had established colonies in Kentucky and in the Ohio River Valley. Soon after 1800, others were crossing into Florida and Missouri, both then under Spanish control. In both cases, the settlers were confident that the American army and American government would soon follow. While the first Americans to cross into Texas spoke of loyalty to the
CHAPTER OBJECTIVE
Demonstrate an understanding of how the idea of Manifest Destiny and the policies of the Polk administration almost doubled the size of the United States in 12 years in spite of opposition from many people in the country.
MANIFEST DESTINY—THE IMPORTANCE OF AN IDEA_________________________________
Explain what Manifest Destiny meant and how it led the United States to involvement in Texas, California, and Oregon.
THE U.S. WAR WITH MEXICO,
1846-1848 Analyze the causes, strategies, and outcomes of the U.S. War with Mexico.
WEST TO THE PACIFIC___________________________________
Analyze the causes and outcomes of U.S. expansion in California and into the Pacific region, including establishing new relationships with Hawaii, China, and Japan.
11.1
11.2
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 299
113
	Significant Dates
1821	Mexico gains independence from Spain First American colony established in Texas
1829	Mexico abolishes slavery, including in Texas
1830	Revolts against Mexican authority begin in Texas
1835	Americans in Texas capture the Alamo, drive out Mexican army
1836	Narcissa and Marcus Whitman help found the first Protestant mission in Oregon Texas declares independence from Mexico Fall of the American forces in the Alamo to Mexican army Treaty of Velasco recognizes independent Republic of Texas Congress passes gag rule forbidding discussion of slavery
1837	Financial Panic of 1837
1842	Webster-Ashburton Treaty resolves U.S.-Canadian border dispute
1844	Treaty of Wang-hsia gives United States open trading rights in China
1845	The term Manifest Destiny becomes popular James K. Polk inaugurated as president U.S. annexation of Texas
1846	Beginning of U.S. War with Mexico
1848	Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo ends war with Mexico Gold Rush in California
1849	Thoreau's Civil Disobedience published
1851	Herman Melville's Moby Dick published
1853	Commodore Perry enters Tokyo Harbor, begins opening Japan to United States Gadsden Purchase, last acquisition of land in continental United States
Manifest Destiny
The doctrine, first expressed in 1845, that the expansion of white Americans across the continent was inevitable and ordained by God and was a means to spread Protestant Christianity and Jacksonian Democracy to more people.
Republic of Mexico, by 1830, they too were seeking protection from the American government. In all these cases, many in the government were happy to oblige, seeing the movement of colonists as a first step in expanding the nation. Being aware of the nation’s long-term expansion, the power of the idea of Manifest Destiny, and the political and military actions that the nation’s leaders took in the name of that idea is essential to understanding how the nation expanded into the shape it has today. This chapter will explore the political, diplomatic, and military issues involved in turning the idea of Manifest Destiny into a geographic reality.
It is also important to understand how the acquisition of so much new territory in the 1830s and 1840s, as well as other developments in people’s thinking, changed the lives of those who lived in the United States. The population of the country was expanding as dramatically as its geographical borders. Migrants from around the world especially flocked to California to find their fortunes in the gold. Citizens of the Republic of Mexico suddenly found themselves living in the United States because the border had moved, as did American Indians, who rejected the claims of all nations to their lands. Other immigrants came to the already established parts of the nation. In addition, amid the many changes, slaves, supporters and opponents of slavery, and women became increasingly vocal about the issue of freedom and equality. These issues will be explored in Chapter 12. The great territorial expansion of these years and dramatic changes in the makeup and the thinking of people in the United States during the same time period transformed the country and its future.
MANIFEST DESTINY—THE IMPORTANCE OF AN IDEA
Explain what Manifest Destiny meant and how it led the United States to involvement in Texas, California, and Oregon.
ifllli
At the mythical level, Manifest Destiny was seen as the spirit hovering over the westward movement of white settlers, leading them and urging them on whether they came by foot, covered wagon, or stage coach.
11.1
The idea that the United States had a “manifest destiny” led to more than simply acquiring land, though between 1845 and 1848, the United States would almost double in size, from 1.8 million square miles to almost 3 million. Advocates of Manifest Destiny claimed that the United States—with God’s blessing—should rule the heart of North America from the Atlantic Ocean to the Pacific and from a still-to-be-defined border with British Canada to an even more undefined border with the Republic of Mexico. For O Sullivan and other supporters of Manifest Destiny, it was the nations appointed role to spread not only democracy—in its Jacksonian form—but also to spread Protestant Christianity in place of the Catholicism of Mexico or the native beliefs of American Indians. The same year that O’Sullivan coined the term Manifest Destiny, Illinois Representative John Wentworth told Congress that he “did not believe the God of Heaven...designed that the original States should be the only abode of liberty on earth. On the contrary, he only designed them as the great center from which civilization, religion, and liberty should radiate and radiate until the whole continent shall bask in their blessing. That belief, held by many beyond Wentworth, that the United States was specially chosen by divine will to bring liberty and democracy to the planet and especially North America—was a driving force in the push for new lands in the 1840s.
Many Americans supported versions of Manifest Destiny for their own reasons. Land speculators and those promoting the extension of the nation’s railroads wanted to exploit the vast lands in the West. Farmers dreamed of starting over in rich—and cheap new lands. Workers believed that rapid national expansion would guarantee industrial profits and thus their jobs, or give them a chance to start over if necessary. Protestant leaders and missionaries saw U.S. control of the new lands as an opportunity to ensure that a Protestant United States, not a Catholic Mexico, controlled the continent. Manifest Destiny also referred to a patriotic belief that the nation had a divine mission to become a world power.
and a National Identity, 1800-1848
In contrast, many other Americans opposed the whole idea of a “manifest destiny.” Democrats tended to support expansion, but most Whigs, led by Henry Clay, had grave reservations. Clay’s goal was not necessarily a larger country but a better developed one with roads, canals, railroads, and industries knitting it together and ensuring its prosperity. Antislavery advocates opposed the acquisition of more land, especially Texas, since they were certain that new lands meant new slave states. However, some proslavery advocates, notably South Carolina Senator John C. Calhoun, wanted Texas but worried that other incorporated lands, especially California and Oregon, might become free states peopled by darker-skinned citizens, which would shift power away from the white slaveholding regions.
Some Americans also saw the violence associated with expansion as simply wrong. Many residents of the lands from Texas to California did not want to become part of the United States at all. Antonio Maria Osio spoke for those who did not want to become U.S. residents when he described himself as “a Californio who loves his country and a Mexican on all four sides and in my heart.” He opposed the annexation of California to the United States, and when it happened, he left, eventually settling in Baja California so that he could to remain a citizen of Mexico.
While many Americans debated Manifest Destiny in the Congress, the press, and the pulpits, other Americans, especially trappers and farmers, moved into the regions, just as a generation before the same types of people had expanded beyond the Mississippi. Regardless of whether the United States, Mexico, or Britain claimed the land, these frontiersmen and women were confident that, in time, their government would follow them. Most of all, they moved into Texas (see Map 11-1).
The Birth of the Texas Republic
The tensions between Americans living in Texas and the Mexican government that governed it had been building even before Mexico gained its independence from Spain in 1821. When the United States purchased Louisiana from France in 1803, the western
Chapter 11
Californio
Person of Spanish descent—and after 1821, citizen of Mexico—living in California.
Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 301
300 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land,
T
Saltillo MAP 11-1 Trade networks between Mexico, Texas, and the United States. Mexico (and before it, Spain) had established settlements and trade networks throughout its sparsely populated northern territories. Texas trade ran not only south from San Antonio and Goliad in Texas to Monterrey and other trading centers in Mexico but also east into the United States. Separate networks connected the heartland of Mexico with its settlements in Santa Fe and Taos in New Mexico, with Tucson in the future Arizona, and with the missions and presidios along the coast of California.
San Francisco n San Jose Santa Cruz (Branciforte);
San Carlos de Monterey
PACIFIC OCEAN
"f* Mission B Presidio • Town
-----Present-day political boundaries
—— Principal road
Present state names and boundaries provided for orientation Indian communities, including the New Mexico Pueblos, are not shown
Tejanos
People of Spanish or Mexican descent born in Texas.
border of the territory was disputed. Spain insisted it was the Sabine River (the current border between Louisiana and Texas), but French officials hinted that the United States might claim territory further west. Jefferson had wanted Louisiana to include all of the land from modern-day Texas to the Rio Grande River, but he was not prepared to fight Spain over it. In the Adams-Onis Treaty of 1819, Spain ceded Florida to the United States, along with Spanish claims to Oregon, in exchange for U.S. recognition of the Sabine River as the border between U.S. Louisiana and Spanish Texas, though some in Congress criticized the treaty for that reason. Despite treaties, however, Americans still crossed the Sabine in the early 19th century settling in Texas.
Soon after the Adams-Onis Treaty was signed, a revolutionary uprising began in Mexico. Like the people of the United States, most Mexican citizens wanted to be free of control by a European power. The Mexican revolution against Spanish rule, which lasted from 1810 to 1821, was long and bloody and decimated the Mexican economy In Texas, the Mexican population, people known as Tejanos, fell from 4,000 in 1800 to 2,500 in 1821. Comanche and Apache tribes dominated large parts of Texas, and
much of the desert was vacant of any human habitation. Nevertheless, after 1821, Mexico had won its independence.
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
With the establishment of the Republic of Mexico, two independent republics— the English-speaking, overwhelmingly Protestant United States in the north and the Spanish-speaking and mostly Catholic Republic of Mexico to the south—bordered each other at the Sabine River, with settlers from one living in the territory of the other.
Even before Mexican independence, the Spanish government had given Missouri merchant Moses Austin permission to start a colony in Texas, believing that more settlers—whatever their origin—would help stabilize a border area that was far from the population centers of either Mexico or the United States. In 1821, Moses’s son Stephen F. Austin, along with Erasmo Seguin, a Tejano with liberal political views, rode into Texas to build the new settlement. A month later, Austin and his party learned that Mexico had won its independence. Austin then went to Mexico City where he met with Mexico’s new leader Agustin de Iturbide and announced, “I make a tender of my services, my loyalty, and my fidelity to the Constitutional Emperor of Mexico.” Austin’s physical presence in Mexico City and willingness to make an oath of allegiance to the new nation impressed the new government. In April 1823, Austin received confirmation of his claims to a huge swath of land in Texas and his right to act as an empresario, or colonizing agent, for this land. He was the only American to get such rights.
At first, the new American colony grew slowly, but Austin continued to recruit settlers. The Mexican government, aware that it could do little to stop settlement and anxious for a buffer against Indian tribes and the United States, hoped that settlers in Texas would create a stable population of loyal citizens.
Few Europeans and even fewer Mexicans moved into Texas, but Americans came in large numbers. The Tejano community was overwhelmed by the newly arrived Americans. By 1830, 20,000 American colonists had arrived and had brought 2,000 slaves with them. The Americans generally ignored the requirement that they convert to Catholicism, though they did not build Protestant churches, and most absolutely refused to free their slaves in spite of the fact that Mexico had abolished slavery in 1829 and expected the residents of Texas to obey that decree. One American visitor to Texas, Amos Parker, wrote, “A person may travel all day; and day after day, and find Americans only.” Those in the Tejano community were also divided. Many Tejanos profited from trade with the Americans and identified with their independent streak. Others clung to their connection to Mexico. Distance, difficult travel conditions, and an unstable government in Mexico City with more pressing concerns closer to home allowed an American community to develop in Texas that was officially governed by one set of laws but lived by its own rules (see Map 11-2).
The Mexican government’s benign neglect of the American community in Texas ended in 1830 when the Mexican Congress closed Texas to further American immigration and the importation of slaves. Mexico also insisted that trade be routed through established ports further south in Mexico rather than directly between Texas and the United States. The government stationed more soldiers in Texas to enforce the new rules. Austin was stunned, and revolts broke out in the English-speaking colonies, a few of which drew Tejano support.
In 1832 Mexican troops defeated an American effort to take control of an army garrison, but in October, American colonists met at San Felipe and called for autonomy for Texas within the Republic of Mexico. In 1833, they organized an army under the command of Sam Houston and sent Austin to Mexico City to negotiate for them. Tejanos were not represented in these meetings, and most of the 5,000 Tejanos probably opposed these actions. But by now, there were 30,000 Americans in Texas, and the Tejanos were greatly outnumbered. Austin had little success in Mexico City. He was arrested in the fall of 1833 and at the time of his release from jail in the summer of 1835 he wrote, “War is our only recourse. There is no other remedy.” Most Americans in Texas seemed to agree.
empresario
An agent who received a land grant from the Spanish or Mexican government in return for organizing settlements.
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 303
of war in June 1812, it passed by the smallest margin of any U.S. declaration of war-79-49 in the House and 19-13 in the Senate. The nation was far from unanimous in its commitment to war, and the war did not go well.
Madison was confident that the war would be quick and cost little in terms of money or American lives. He was terribly wrong. The attack on Canada was a disaster. Jefferson and Madison, with their commitment to a small government and modest taxes, had kept the army weak while many in Congress who voted for war had also voted against every military appropriation in the time leading up to the war. Far fewer of the people in Canada, English or French, wanted to become part of the United States than the Americans expected. In addition, the British army was strong and had been cultivating Indian alliances.
In July 1812, Detroit fell to British soldiers and Indians led by Tecumseh, and an American attack on British forts on the Niagara River failed. Far from taking Canada, the opening battles of the war had left the Northwest more open to attack by the British and Tecumseh’s tribal alliance. Tecumseh is still remembered as a hero in Canada for his role in defending that country. Battles along the frontier were brutal. The Kentucky militia scalped British soldiers, and Indians scalped American settlers. Both sides complained of atrocities.
At first, the Royal Navy enforced a much tighter blockade on the Atlantic coast than Jefferson’s embargo had ever accomplished, wrecking the U.S. economy. British landing parties attacked coastal towns at will. However, an American naval victory on Lake Erie by ships under the command of Oliver Hazard Perry gave the country a new hero. Shortly after, Tecumseh was killed in October 1813 when the U.S. Army won a significant victory over combined British and Indian forces at the Battle of the Thames in southern Canada. The combined victories brought some safety to the New York, Pennsylvania, and Ohio frontier, but all thought of conquering Canada disappeared.
By 1814, the war turned further against the United States. Napoleon’s abdication in April 1814 freed the British for a full-scale fight. In August, British troops raided Washington and burned the Capitol and the White House. First Lady Dolly Madison collected state papers and the famous Gilbert Stuart painting of George
In August 1814, only a short time after 1800 when they had begun serving as the center of the American government, British troops burned both the Capitol building and the White House. The deserted husks of both buildings stood until the war ended and they could be rebuilt.
230 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Washington and fled just ahead of the British. However, on September 13, the British bombardment of Fort McHenry in Baltimore harbor failed to dislodge the American garrison. When Francis Scott Key, who was temporarily being held in British custody, saw that the American flag had not been struck in defeat, he was inspired to write “The Star-Spangled Banner.” That same month, American forces also stopped a British invasion of New York. But stopping invasions was hardly winning the war.
On the Indian front, however, American forces were achieving some important victories. Like the French and Indian War and the American Revolution, the War of 1812 was a disaster for Indians living east of the Mississippi. Tecumseh’s death at the Battle of the Thames ended the fragile coalition he had built and opened all of Ohio and Indiana Territory to rapid white settlement. In the south, at the Battle of Horseshoe Bend in March 1814, Andrew Jackson defeated a Creek and Cherokee alliance, killing close to 1,000 Indian fighters and 2,000 more in subsequent battles, 15 percent of the tribes’ total population. “My people are no more!” the Creek leader Red Eagle, or William Weatherford, said. In the Treaty of Fort Jackson, the Creeks were forced to give up almost 25 million acres in Georgia and Alabama, half of their total land.
While both sides were winning and losing battles, an American peace delegation of Henry Clay, Albert Gallatin, and John Quincy Adams, son of the former president, met with their British counterparts in Ghent, Belgium, to negotiate what would become the Treaty of Ghent. Despite its strong position in the war, Britain, having ended its hostilities with France, was fearing that peace would not last, and it wanted to end its battles with the United States to conserve resources. Initially, the British asked for significant concessions, including a large protected zone for their Indian allies, but the American delegation stalled through much of 1814. Late in the year, fearing the situation with France, the British agreed to a treaty that essentially returned all borders and issues to their status quo before the war began. It was a wise move for them. Napoleon, living in exile on the island of Elba off the Italian coast since his defeat in 1814, returned to power briefly in 1815. He again ruled France until his final defeat by British and German troops at the Battle of Waterloo in June 1815. If the British had lost at Waterloo, and the battle was a close call, it might have been because their best troops were in North America.
Even as the Ghent negotiations were taking place, Federalists in New England were taking actions against the war. Many New Englanders saw little value in the territorial expansion of the country and were convinced that new lands would only mean new Democratic-Republican representatives in Congress. Even more, the war had devastated the New England economy, which was dependent on international shipping. In protest, New England governors ordered their state militias to serve only within the borders of their own states. In December 1814, Federalist delegates from across New England convened the Hartford Convention in Hartford, Connecticut, to demand peace and consider New England’s secession from the Union if peace did not come quickly. While a majority of the delegates ultimately opposed secession, the convention insisted on the right of nullification, the right of state governments to impede Congressional actions within their own boundaries, and proposed amendments to the Constitution to protect New England’s power. Delegates to the convention expected the Madison administration to give in to their demands, but when news arrived of Jackson’s victory in New Orleans and then the peace treaty, the convention did more to discredit the Federalist Party than support their cause. Nevertheless, it signaled the level of hostility to what many came to call “Mr. Madison s War.
The war’s final dramatic Battle of New Orleans was fought after the peace treaty was already signed but before news of it had reached Jackson or the opposing British army. The British planned to attack New Orleans so they could win control of the Mississippi River and cut U.S. trade on it. Major General Sir Edward Pakenham and his 8,000 troops were battle-hardened from years of fighting the French, but in New Orleans, they faced Jackson’s 4,700 American troops, a collection of regular militia, Tennessee and Kentucky volunteers, and pirates and smugglers under the command
8.4
Treaty of Ghent
A treaty signed in December 1814 between the United States and Britain that ended the War of 1812.
Hartford Convention
A meeting of Federalist delegates from the New England states to protest the continuation oftheWar of 1812.
Chapter 8 Creating a New People, Expanding the Country 231
of the infamous Jean Lafitte. On January 8, 1815, Pakenham’s troops marched straight into a line of fire organized by Jackson’s army. When, after hours of fighting, the British called for a truce, almost 700 British soldiers had been killed and 1,400 wounded. Of the Americans, 8 were killed and 13 wounded. It was one of the great victories of the war, and it made Jackson a hero and would help make him president. And, though it came after the peace treaty, it helped convince the British that they should, indeed, honor the terms of the treaty, which they might not have done if they had taken New Orleans (see Map 8-2).
Far more Americans, Indians, and British soldiers and sailors died in the War of 1812 than anyone expected when the war began. Indian tribes from the Shawnees to the Creeks would never have significant power again. The United States was virtually bankrupt as a result of the war. Secretary of the Treasury George W. Campbell reported that the government needed to borrow $50 million in the fall of 1814 and resigned when he could not raise it, and the government, for the only time in history, defaulted on its debts.
Nevertheless, news of the Treaty of Ghent and of Jackson’s victory in New Orleans was met with national celebrations. Henry Clay asked, “What is our present situation?” and answered his own question: “Respectability and character abroad—security and confidence at home.” Daniel Webster, who as a representative from Massachusetts had opposed the war, now said:
The peace brought about an entirely new and a most interesting state of things: it opened us to other prospects and suggested other duties. We ourselves were changed, and the whole world was changed.
It was an odd mood for a nation that had lost more battles than it won, come close to bankruptcy, and still had its new capital city laying in ashes. But Webster captured the national mood better than the statistics. The end of Britain’s long war with France also brought an end to Britain’s war with the United States, which had continued in various forms of conflict for 40 years.
Lake Supef..
BRITISH
NORTH AMERICA
(CANADA)
VERMONT
lib. "
■ ILLINOIS "§ i TERRITORY ■
Fort Dearborn Aug 15, 1812^ U
MICHIGAN ' TERRITORY
MASSACHUSETTS
^NNsyu^^7connect1cut
NEW JERSEY
-A" DELAWARE
VIRGINIA’
Michillimackinac V
July.17, 1812
INDIANA
TERRITORY
OHIO
BRITISH
NORTH AMERICA (CANADA)
MICHIGAN /	'	____
TERRITORY '	Queens,on Height,	JA'°
Battle of,he Themes
Octs{i8i3*> -	T	NEW YORK
' TENNESSEE -"
north Carolina;
SOUTH
CAROLINA
ATLANTIC
OCEAN
j Detroit surrendered , /
;	Aug 16,1812	,
LOUISIANA
Fort Mims New Orleans 1813 Jan 8, 1&15~
o u n -iGEORGIA Horseshoe Bend WC Mar 27, 1814
■j|k. American victories
American victories over Indians
■jjk. British victories ■ Forts
American troop movements British troop movements British naval blockade
Fort Mej Fort Defiance
Tippecanoe
INDIANA
TERRITORY
OHIO
* Dayton Cincinnati
Erie
PE NN SYLVANIA
t	~ NEW;
ZJERS6Y
\	T
MARYLA#$
Fort McHenry (Baltimore) -jfc, )
Sept 13-14, 1814 .i s?
Washington. D.C.*	DaAWARE
surrendered and burned# F’
Aug 24, 1814 ’
il^s



o^°’ NEW '



XX > blXde o XXrX ,	Were 6Xempt the fightin9 of the War of 1812'The British navy maintained a highly
successful in batdes on theXat fak	h?'"9 “?T l° " ,Sta" and making il eaSy t0 attack and bum the « pital in 1814. The American navy was more
at thZwar's eS	arm'eS 9	9 Mississippi River from Tippecanoe in Indiana Territory to the final battle in New Orleans
232 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Almost immediately after the war ended, Britain and the United States negotiated a commercial treaty that gave the United States trading rights with Britain and much of Britain s empire. Two years later, in 1817, the Rush-Bagot Treaty guaranteed the disarmament of the Great Lakes, and the year after that another treaty, the Anglo-American Convention, resolved much of the border between the United States and Canada. These treaties were the beginning of long-lasting peace on the northern border of the United States. Indeed, after 1815, both Europe and America settled into a long period of relative peace and mutual prosperity.
In spite of all the complaints about the war, the years during which the region’s ports were closed were a time when some residents began manufacturing enterprises that in the years ahead would fuel rapid industrialization of the region. The United States was considerably more self-sufficient at war’s end than it had ever been before. Still, trade with Europe after the war’s end not only resumed but also quickly exceeded all previous levels. In addition, with peace came further territorial expansion and an extraordinary economic and commercial transition that fundamentally changed the nation. Perhaps most important of all, as Webster and Clay both claimed, the overall effect of the war left the United States a much more confident and proud nation than it had been up to that time. Men like Webster and Clay who were prophets of that confidence and pride, would be national leaders for the next several decades of the nation’s life.
Quick Review Why did the War of 1812 and the events leading up to it split the nation? Based on events in the early 1800s, did Madison make the right decision?
EXPANDING AMERICAN TERRITORY AND INFLUENCE
8.5
Analyze how the United States acquired new territory and increased influence abroad.
In spite of wars and tensions, territorial expansion continued under Jefferson’s handpicked successors, presidents James Madison (1809-1817) and James Monroe (1817-1825) as it had under Jefferson. During this 24 year period, three men who were political allies from the same political party and the same state governed the nation, seeking many of the same goals. Rapid growth fundamentally changed the country. In 1799, Daniel Boone, who had created the first white settlements in Kentucky during the Revolution, moved with his family yet again, this time across the Mississippi River into Spanish-controlled Missouri. Other American settlers from Kentucky followed, seeking ever more land. They assumed that their rights as American citizens went with them and that, eventually, American sovereignty would follow. The Louisiana Purchase in 1803 confirmed Boones assumptions.
Other Americans followed Boone’s pattern in Florida, Texas, New Mexico, and California. Americans ventured far beyond the borders of the United States and expected, often demanded, that the American government continue to protect them and eventually annex new lands to the Union. Many in the government agreed with the settlers, and successive governments, anxious to expand or consolidate regional control, approved.
During the War of 1812, the military victories of William Henry Harrison over the Shawnees in the Old Northwest finalized the opening of Ohio and the future states of Indiana and Illinois to white settlement. At the same time, Andrew Jackson’s defeat of the Creeks and Cherokees in the Old Southwest opened up huge new tracts of land in what would become the states of Mississippi and Alabama. With the lands ceded by Britain in 1783 and the vast Louisiana Purchase now firmly under American control, the most obvious pieces of real estate left for further U.S. annexation after the War of 1812 were the territories known as West and East Florida, still controlled by Spain, and the Oregon Territory that several European powers claimed.
Chapter 8 Creating a New People, Expanding the Country 233
I
I
Florida and Oregon
West Florida was more or less the southern third of what would eventually be Mississippi and Alabama, while East Florida was what is today the state of Florida. To the United States, foreign control of those lands represented multiple threats. It gave Spain control of most access to the Gulf of Mexico, which was a threat to U.S. shipping. Slaves and others seeking to escape U.S. jurisdiction could easily escape south along a long, unguarded border and melt into the vast, unruly lands of Florida. Seminole Indians, already refugees from the growing white population north of Florida, often welcomed escaped slaves and created new communities that were united in their dislike of the Americans. Americans just north of the Florida border were hungry for more land. Many ignored international boundaries and crossed into Florida to farm and build settlements. These settlers in turn demanded U.S. protection from the Seminoles and Creeks, who had been displaced by the Treaty of Fort Jackson and were determined to defend their new land in Florida.
In 1817, Andrew Jackson, a military hero after his victories in 1814 and 1815, told President James Monroe and Secretary of State John Quincy Adams that he could seize Florida in 60 days. The president and Adams did not want a war with Spain but, in language that was deliberately vague, called on Jackson to attack the Seminoles who were harassing white settlers and gave him “full powers to conduct the war in the manner he may judge best.” Given how Jackson had conducted the war against the Creeks, Monroe and Adams knew what their orders meant.
Jackson’s army marched into Florida. They could not find many Seminoles, who were adept at disappearing into swamps and marshes, but they burned their villages and crops. They also seized Spanish forts and arrested a Scots trader named Alexander Arbuthnot and another British subject, Robert Armbrister, charged them with assisting the Seminoles, and after a quick trial executed both. When his troops did find Seminole and Creek leaders, Jackson simply executed them, including Hillis Hadjo, a Creek spiritual prophet who had been part of Tecumseh’s movement.
The execution of Indians did not cause an uproar in the United States or Europe, but an American general executing British subjects in Spanish territory caused an international incident. Monroe and Adams, however, were skillful diplomats. They managed both to distance themselves from Jackson and use what Adams called “the Jackson Magic”—his immense popularity after his victories in the War of 1812—to bring pressure on Spain.
In fact, Spain did not care much about Florida but did have serious concerns about the independence movements in the Spanish colonies in Mexico and South America. The Spanish authorities wanted assurance that the United States would not aid or recognize these revolutions. Spain was also deeply worried about its control of the land from Texas to California. It was more than willing to trade Florida for assurances about Texas and the revolutions further south. Monroe briefly considered making a bid for Texas, but he decided that it was more trouble than it was worth and agreed to the treaty.
Instead of pursuing a claim to Texas, Monroe and Adams decided to ask Spain for its support in the areas that Lewis and Clark had explored. Spain, Great Britain, and Russia all claimed the same territory along the Pacific coast known as Oregon. By the late 1700s, explorers from New Spain were making claims as far north as Alaska. At the same time, Russian fur traders and explorers had established permanent Russian settlements, complete with Orthodox churches, in Alaska and almost as far south as San Francisco. British sea captains, notably James Cook in the 1770s, had explored the Oregon coast. British explorers coming overland from Canada made land claims, among them the Hudson’s Bay Company trading post at the mouth of the Columbia River, which represented the largest European settlement in the region. An earlier U.S. claim, based on Lewis and Clark’s explorations in 1805, was weak by comparison, and there were no U.S. settlements in Oregon. Of course,
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
1
the native peoples of the region had little use for any of the claims, though they traded with all the claimants. Nevertheless, despite its weak claim, the United States had an interest in Oregon. While some in Congress thought Oregon was far too distant and barren to be of interest, Adams—prompted by the merchant and fur trader John Jacob Astor—saw the value of an American presence at the mouth of the Columbia River, not only for access to the fur trade there but as a way to enter the Pacific trade with Asia.
In the 1819 Adams-Onis Treaty with Spain, Spain not only ceded Florida to the United States but also agreed to transfer Spanish rights to the Oregon Territory to the United States. It was a significant accomplishment. The United States paid $5 million in Spanish debts, and the deal was done. All of Florida was now a U.S. territory. While the United States was negotiating with Spain, it was also negotiating with Great Britain about Oregon. In 1818, Adams negotiated the Anglo-American Convention in which Britain and the United States agreed to joint control of the Pacific Northwest for 10 years and to resolve other issues in the future. The two treaties with Spain and Britain gave the United States as strong a claim to Oregon as either Britain or Russia, a claim it would not forget. Just before he ended his tenure as Secretary of State, Adams agreed to an 1824 treaty with Russia that set the border of Alaska much farther north, leaving it to the United States and Britain to resolve questions about Oregon, which they finally did; only in 1846 (see Map 8-3).
Adams-Onis Treaty
An 1819 treaty between the United States and Spain that led to American acquisition of Florida and American rights in the Oregon Territory in return for a $5 million payment to Spain.
8.5
i

Biyiillll
jIOIhISIsi
AP8-3
Expanding Borders, 1817-1823. During his term as secretary of state, John Quincy Adams .gotiated a series of treaties that established the border between Maine and the Louisiana Territory d British Canada as well as created a joint U.S,British ownership of Oregon, and also acqu.red Flonda >m Spain. Chapter 8 Creating a New People, Expanding the Country 235
The Monroe Doctrine
Monroe Doctrine
A declaration by President James Monroe in 1823 that the Western Hemisphere was to be closed off to further European colonization and that the United States would not allow European interference in the internal affairs of independent nations anywhere in the Americas.
Having taken Florida and asserted a claim to Oregon, the United States agreed—for the time being—to stay out of Spain’s way in Texas and California. Nevertheless, the Monroe administration took further steps to consolidate U.S. power in the Americas. In 1822, despite earlier promises to Spain, the United States officially recognized the new independent states of Chile, Colombia, Mexico, and Peru. If Latin America was, in fact, going to be independent of Spain, then the United States meant to be both the regions benefactor and prime trade partner.
Then, going a big step further in a speech to Congress in December 1823, President Monroe declared that, henceforth, the United States would not allow European intervention or the acquisition of any new territory by a European power in North and South America. Coming less than a decade after the United States had almost lost its independence in the War of 1812, it was a bold announcement. A complex set of international developments led Monroe and Secretary of State John Quincy Adams to formulate this stance, which became known as the Monroe Doctrine.
On the Pacific coast, Russian Tsar Alexander I was pressing Russian claims not only to Alaska but also to much of the Oregon Territory in the Pacific Northwest. In 1821, Alexander issued an imperial edict that claimed much of the Pacific coast and gave the Russian-American Company the right to trade there. The Russians threatened to confiscate American ships that traveled too far north, even though more American than Russian sailors were actually taking the sea lions and whales and trading with the Alaskan natives. Nevertheless, for the United States, Russian actions represented a dangerous European intrusion.
Halfway across the world, Greek patriots, borrowing language from the American Revolution, declared independence from the Ottoman Empire, and liberal constitutionalists briefly took power in Spain. The Greek and Spanish revolts were tricky for Monroe and Adams. Many Americans were sympathetic with the Greeks, but the administration also wanted good relationships with the Ottomans. In addition, American sentiment was on the side of a revolution in Spain. These situations in
Russian claims to Alaska dated back to the 1700s, but by the 1820s, the Russians were building up colonies, including their largest one in Sitka, Alaska. These outposts, complete with Russian Orthodox churches, fostered trade with indigenous Alaskans and provided fresh supplies for ships taking fish and sea lions off the coast.
236 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Europe, though not the center of American concern, still had to be responded to carefully, given the strength of public opinion. Much more pressing, however, was the revolutionary activity in the Americas. Taking the wrong side in the revolutions of Latin America could hurt the United States politically and economically for a long time to come while little could be gained from interfering in Europe.
At the tense moment when the United States was considering ways to respond to Russian pressure and to revolutions around the world, British Foreign Secretary George Canning proposed a joint British-American declaration in which both nations would oppose European intervention in the Americas, including efforts to restore Spain’s control, and that neither Great Britain nor the United States would have any territorial interests in the Americas. Canning’s proposal was a problem for Monroe and Adams. They did not want Spain to reassert power in the Americas, and Britain’s influence would be helpful in preventing it. But both the president and his secretary of state had their eyes on eventual U.S. takeover of parts of the Spanish Empire, from Texas to California and perhaps Cuba. Canning’s hands-off agreement would jeopardize long-term American interests.
In the end, Monroe and Adams concluded that they would leave it to the Europeans to deal with Greece and Spain and essentially declared noninvolvement in the “internal affairs of Europe.” On the other hand, they used President Monroe’s December 2, 1823, message to Congress to say that any nation of the Americas that had assumed “free and independent conditions” would “henceforth not be considered as subjects of colonization by any European power.” Many Europeans were amazed at what they saw as the arrogance of the new and still relatively weak United States. It was not clear that the country could enforce the new policy. But the Monroe Doctrine, which began as a simple diplomatic maneuver, became a bedrock of U.S. foreign policy. The independence not only of the United States but of all of the independent Americas from European control was, it seemed, the country’s business. The new policy had no impact on Britain’s long-standing control of Canada or Russia’s dominance of Alaska or, indeed, on those colonies that Spain still claimed in Latin America. But it did announce that the United States would oppose any new colonies anywhere in the Americas. With the Monroe Doctrine, the U.S. government was again reflecting Jeffersonian pragmatism. It might be a small country of farmers, but the United States was claiming vast new influence in all of North and South America. It was a diplomatic expansion that was being matched by an era of economic expansion, growth that was unimagined when Thomas Jefferson took the oath of office in 1801.
8.5
Quick Review How did the outcome of the War of 1812 allow the U.S. government to pursue its expansionist goals and issue the Monroe Doctrine?
CONCLUSION
When Thomas Jefferson became president of the United States in 1801, much of the country’s population, cities, seaports, agriculture, industry, indeed, much of its economy, was contained within the original 13 states. Within the next 20 years, under his leadership and that of handpicked successors James Madison and James Monroe, the country’s territorial claims would extend to the Pacific Ocean. Much of this growth originated in Jefferson’s republican beliefs and his agrarian ideal of a nation of independent farmers rather than a nation run by any elites.
Significant political and social developments also occurred during the first two decades of the 1800s. With the U.S. Supreme Court’s Marbury v. Madison decision in 1803, the Court essentially gave itself the authority to decide the constitutionality of any law passed by Congress. Religion played an increasing role in society, even as
Chapter 8 Creating a New People, Expanding the Country 237
the last states ended their support for specific churches. Many Protestant groups made significant new gains among both white and black adherents with revivals in what came to be known as the Second Great Awakening.
The Louisiana Purchase opened up trade along the Mississippi River and through New Orleans. Lewis and Clark led an expedition to explore the huge expanse of new U.S. territory, even venturing beyond its scope to reach the Pacific Ocean. Their explorations, aided greatly by various Indian tribes, revealed tremendous potential for future American growth.
Tensions leading up to the War of 1812 began during Jefferson’s term and came to a head under the administration of Madison. Ultimately, the inconclusive war resolved issues that had limited U.S. development for decades, and launched a new period of growth for the country. It was the last war ever fought between the United States and Great Britain. It was also the last war in which Indian tribes were allied with another nation against the United States, and afterward, the United States dealt with Native Americans as an “internal matter” rather than a focus of foreign policy.
Although the cost was high in terms of lives lost, money spent, and economies devastated, the end of the war left the United States more confident, proud, and self-sufficient than ever before. With peace came further territorial expansion, especially a series of treaties between 1817and 1823 that established the border with Canada, gave the nation joint ownership of the Oregon Territory with Great Britain, and gave the country control of Florida. The end of the war also launched an extraordinary economic and commercial transition that fundamentally changed the nation and transformed the lives of Americans. The bold new confidence of the United States, reflected in the Monroe Doctrine declaring that there could be no new European claims on any lands in North or South America, surprised the world.
CHAPTER
REVIEW
What are the most significant differences between the United States in 1800 and the United States in 1823? Why are these differences more important than others?
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Chapter 8 Chapter Review
8.1
JEFFERSON AND THE REPUBLICAN IDEAL
Explain how Jefferson's republicanism shaped and reflected the nation's democratic culture.
Review Questions
1.	Contextualization
What did Americans in the early 1800s mean by the terms equality and independence7. What role did these terms play in shaping their social and political ideals?
2.	Crafting Arguments
Defend or refute the following statement: Thomas Jefferson, in both his policy choices and personal life, embodied the spirit of republicanism in the early 1800s. What evidence can you present to support your position? What evidence might support a different argument?
3.	Comparison
How did the political culture of the United States in the early decades of the 1800s differ from the political culture of the late 1700s? How would you explain the differences you note?
THE IDEAL OF RELIGIOUS FREEDOM___________________________
Explain how Americans applied new individualist ideals in their religion and how the expansion of faith-based organizations supported, yet also challenged, Jeffersonian republicanism.
Review Questions
4.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the views of Thomas Jefferson and Lyman Beecher on the relationship between church and state. What conflicting values were at the heart of their disagreement?
5.	Historical Interpretation
When some historians have described the United States as being built on faith in “dynamic democracy” and “evangelical religion,” what did they mean? Is this description an accurate interpretation of U.S. history in the years from 1800 to 1820?
6.	Crafting Arguments
Why did African-Americans, both slave and free, develop their own segregated religious institutions and gatherings over the course of the early 1800s? What needs might such churches and gatherings have met that white churches did not?
8.2
8.3
BEYOND THE MISSISSIPPI: THE LOUISIANA PURCHASE AND THE EXPEDITION OF LEWIS AND CLARK_______________________
Explain what effects the Louisiana Purchase and the westward expansion had on how Americans saw themselves.
Review Questions
7.	Chronological Reasoning
How did events in Europe and Haiti create the opportunity for the United States to acquire the Louisiana Territory?
8.	Comparison
Compare and contrast race relations in New Orleans and the rest of the United States during the early 1800s.
THE WAR OF
1812 8.4
Analyze the causes and impact of the War of 1812.
Review Questions
9.	Chronological Reasoning
Trace the growing tensions between the United States and Britain between 1783 and 1812. What events were most crucial in propelling the two nations toward war?
10.	Historical Interpretation
How would you explain the sectional divide over the War of 1812? Why did the war find the most support in the southern and western states and territories and the least support in New England?
11.	Synthesis
What were the long-term consequences of the war? Is it fair to describe the War of 1812 as an inconclusive war? Why or why not?
EXPANDING AMERICAN TERRITORY AND INFLUENCE
Analyze how the United States acquired new territory and increased influence abroad.
Review Questions
12.	Crafting Arguments
Evaluate the role of individual American settlers in shaping American foreign policy in the early 1800s. How did the desire of Americans to move beyond the boundaries of the United States create both opportunities and challenges for the federal government?
13.	Historical Interpretation
In what ways did the articulation of the Monroe Doctrine represent a turning point in American history? What light does the doctrine shed on the vision of America’s future shared by the doctrine’s supporters?
8.5
Chapter 8 Creating a New People, Expanding the Country 239
intensive, and much work was required afterward to prepare the harvest for market. Because of the value of the cotton crop and increasing demands for it, there was constant pressure to work harder and no end to the punishment for those who did not produce as expected.
While Bibb and thousands of other slaves cultivated the cotton, young women working in the mills, or textile factories, of Lowell, Massachusetts, turned it into cloth to be sold around the world. An anonymous worker described her life in a mill:
Since I was between seven and eight years old, I have been employed almost without intermission in a factory, which is almost 18 years....I do not wonder at your surprise that the operatives were worked in the summer season, from five in the morning till seven in the evening....The time we are required to labor is altogether too long. It is more than our constitutions can bear. If any one doubts it, let them come into our mills of a summer’s day, at four or five o’clock, in the afternoon, and see the drooping, weary persons moving about, as though their legs were hardly able to support their bodies.
North or South, for slaves in fields and workers in factories, cotton was wearying work. For some, cotton brought extraordinary wealth as “King Cotton” came to dominate the U.S. economy, but for others, drudgery permeated life. In one way or another, the rise and dominance of the cotton industry affected almost all Americans.
The transformation of the U.S. economy immediately after the War of 1812 involved many changes that made cotton dominant, including new inventions like cotton gins and steamboats, new institutions like corporations, and a different kind of bank—all of which worked together to expand the national economy. These changing economic and social structures also affected the political scene. The new cotton-based economy made slaves much more valuable and slave owners more anxious to defend slavery. At the same time, many northerners, including northerners in cotton industries, became more hostile to slaveholding, which led to deep national divisions.
Significant Dates
1794 Eli Whitney patents the cotton gin
1812	Francis Cabot Lowell returns from England after memorizing plans for Manchester's mills
1813	Boston Manufacturing Company chartered to build mills in United States
1815	The end of the War of 1812 launches era of economic prosperity
1816	Beginning of "Alabama Fever"— development of Alabama and Mississippi cotton plantations
1817	New York legislature authorizes construction of Erie Canal
1819	Financial panic
Dartmouth College v. Woodward and McCulloch v. Maryland Supreme Court cases
1820	Missouri Compromise
1823	Lowell, Massachusetts, laid out as a new mill town
1824	John Quincy Adams elected	president
after disputed election
1825	Erie Canal completed
1828	Tariff of Abominations
Andrew Jackson elected president
9.1
9.2
CHAPTER OBJECTIVE
Demonstrate an understanding of the changes in the U.S. economy brought about by the rapid expansion of cotton production, other commercial and financial developments, and the impact of these changes on U.S. political life.
CREATING THE COTTON ECONOMY
Explain the role of cotton in transforming the land and the
lives of diverse people in the United States.
COMMERCE, TECHNOLOGY, AND TRANSPORTATION
Analyze the technological and financial changes that
led to the emergence of a new market economy in the United States.
FROM THE ERA OF GOOD FEELINGS TO THE POLITICS OF DIVISION
This picture of large bales of cotton being loaded onto steamships by slave labor reflects much of the economic development of the nation in the decades after the end of the War of 1812.
The end of the War of 1812, Andrew Jackson’s victory at New Orleans, the American takeover of Florida, and the Monroe Doctrine were all far from primary concerns of many Americans in the years after 1815. Something much closer to home—cotton—was transforming their lives. The rapid growth of cotton production changed the lives of more Americans, whether or not they were directly involved in cotton production, than any other development between 1800 and the Civil War. Cotton transformed the nation’s physical, commercial, and political landscape.
Henry Bibb, a former slave, described what cotton meant to him and his fellow slaves on a Louisiana cotton plantation that had only recently been developed:
The object of blowing the horn for them two hours before day, was, that they should get their bit to eat, before they went to the field, that they need not stop to eat but once during the day....I have often heard the sound of the slave driver’s lash on the backs, of slaves, and their heart-rending shrieks....I have known the slaves to be so much fatigued from labor that they could scarcely get to their lodging places from the fields at night.
CREATING THE COTTON ECONOMY
9.3
_ —..	jyiuiilauum ui me ever expaiw
cotton-growing regions of the nation knew little respite from the fati ing labor. They had to clear the land before they could plant, and o planted, the cotton plants needed almost constant care. The harvest Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Explain the role of cotton in transforming the land and the lives of diverse people in the United States.
Cotton’s dominant role in the economy came about quickly. In 1800, a few southern
plantations grew enough cotton to make cloth for their own use and ship a few bags
to England, but the dominant plantation cash crops were rice, indigo, tobacco, and in
southern Louisiana, sugar. But after the War of 1812, cotton quickly outstripped every
other American export and remained a major American industry until the 1930s.
Demand and Technology
Two developments in the late 1790s set the stage for the rapid expansion of cotton
production in the United States. First, during this period, many Europeans came to
prefer cotton clothing to the wool or linen that had clothed them for generations.
Cotton was cooler and more comfortable than wool, and it was getting cheaper. Most
of Europe’s cotton came from India via Great Britain’s East India Company, but India
could not produce enough cotton to meet Europe’s growing demand.
The second development was a set of technological changes that launched the
worldwide expansion of cotton. In England in 1733, John Kay invented a “flying
shuttle” that made weaving cloth much faster and allowed a single weaver to handle a
loom that previously required many weavers. In 1764, James Hargreaves invented the
spinning jenny, which could run multiple spindles, each spinning cotton into thread.
By 1800, a single jenny could be seen operating up to 120 spindles at once. In 1769,
Richard Arkwright patented a “water frame” that used waterpower to drive the spin-
ning process, a major step toward mass production, while James Watt’s coal-powered
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 241
9.1
1800	1820	1840	1860
Year
FIGURE 9-1 Cotton Exports as a Percentage of All U.S. Exports, 1800-1860. This graph illustrates the growing significance of cotton in the U.S. economy during the early 1800s. While all exports from the country were growing, cotton was quickly outstripping everything else, increasing from a tiny fraction in 1800 to one-third of all exports in the 1820 and to more than half by 1840.
steam engine, designed in 1763, added steam power to the English mills, expanding their size long before it provided the energy for railroads and ships.
Although developed in England, much of this technology was soon brought to the United States through transfers, legal or otherwise. British authorities knew that their new means of production were key to their industrial and political might. They provided patents for their inventors and kept their production process secret. However, in 1789, an Englishman, Samuel Slater, having been sworn to secrecy and apprenticed in Arkwright’s textile business, sailed to New York to bring the industry to the United States. Slater ignored Arkwright’s patents and recreated Arkwright’s mechanical spinning in mills in Rhode Island. More technological transfers followed.
Despite the worldwide demand for cotton and England’s growing industrial capacity for turning raw cotton into cloth, American farmers and plantation owners were skeptical that they could make money on it. Green-seed, or upland, cotton was the only kind that would grow in the American South, except for a few places on the coast or coastal islands where a more profitable variety of long-stem cotton grew. But each ball of cotton produced on a green-seed cotton plant contained many of those green seeds. They had to be removed by hand before the cotton could be spun into threads. A slave, working hard all day, could clean about 1 pound of cotton, hardly enough to make a meaningful profit. Many people sought a mechanical way to clean cotton. Eli Whitney, a recent Yale graduate who had gone south to work as a tutor, lived on the Greene family plantation at Mulberry Grove in Georgia where he became interested in devising a machine to clean cotton. He gained fame, if not fortune, for his patent on the cotton gin (gin was short for engine).
While serving as a tutor and tinkering with how to clean cotton, Whitney decided to try pulling the picked cotton through a screen that would allow the seeds to fall out and the clean cotton fibers to be baled for shipment. When the first model failed because the wooden teeth were too brittle, Catherine Greene, the matron of the plantation, suggested wire (from her bird cage) and a brush to keep the seeds from clogging the works. The cotton gin that Whitney patented in 1794 could clean 50 pounds of cotton a day. Others quickly improved on Whitney’s model, and manufacturing cotton gins became a big business from Natchez, Mississippi, to Bridgewater, Massachusetts.
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Whitney did not make his fortune from this invention; too many other people were improving it too quickly. However, he did become rich developing the idea of interchangeable parts and manufacturing rifles with such parts for the U.S. government. Interchangeable parts made everything from rifles to farm implements easier to repair since a replacement part could be counted on to work in the original gun or machine.
The cotton gin transformed the nation. The United States now had an export crop that could make it prosperous. The cotton market and the technology that made it possible led to the rapid development of new lands, especially the great plantations of Alabama, Mississippi, and Louisiana. In turn, the New England factory system that began in Rhode Island expanded to the great mill center of Lowell, Massachusetts, in 1823 and then to factories and factory towns all over the region. As the cotton market continued to grow, coastal and transatlantic shipping also expanded as more and more southern cotton was brought to the mills of New England and to the even larger mills of Manchester and Birmingham in England itself. This rather plain and simple product was a driving force for economics and technology in the period, and it seemed to have no limits.
The Land of Cotton
While some of the nations first export cotton, the long-stem variety, was grown along the Atlantic coast and especially on the Sea Islands off the coast of the Carolinas and Georgia, the greatest cotton production involved the green-seed variety on the plantations of the so-called black belt (named for its rich black soil), stretching from Georgia to Louisiana. The quality of the soil made it perfect for growing cotton.
Within this black-belt area, only Georgia was one of the 13 original states. The northern parts of Alabama and Mississippi were part of the land Britain ceded to the United States at the end of the Revolution. The Louisiana Purchase added Louisiana. Andrew Jackson’s defeat of the Creeks during the War of 1812 and the “Creek Cession” that he negotiated in 1816 opened much new land to white settlement, while the 1819 U.S. treaty with Spain placed the Gulf Coast of Mississippi and Alabama under U.S. control. White settlers—often single men, sometimes families—from Georgia, Tennessee, the Carolinas, and Europe, especially many Scots-Irish, poured in and brought black slaves with them. A land rush that was known as “Alabama Fever” began in 1816 just as the War of 1812 ended. Alabama was admitted as a state in 1819 with a non-Indian population of 128,000, five times what it had been in 1810. Louisiana and Mississippi were admitted in 1812 and 1817, respectively (see Map 9-1).
The federal government played a central role in the development of these lands. The first European settlers were illegal white squatters moving onto farms recently abandoned by Indians, but after the coming of peace in 1815, the federal government quickly began official surveys and legal sales of the land. Before the War of 1812, the largest sales of federal lands in 1 year had been 350,000 acres. In 1815, a million acres of newly acquired lands were sold at $2 per acre, and in 1818, 2.5 million acres were sold as the government acquired land from the Creeks and then from Spain and quickly made it available for sale. These sales helped the federal budget, and white settlement surged. The government spent some of the revenue from land sales on maintaining the army that protected the new lands. It also aided settlement by building a road from Columbia, South Carolina, to Columbus, Georgia, and then farther into the black-belt region (see Map 9-2).
The new land was fertile. Planters who had grown 300 pounds of cotton per acre in South Carolina could grow 800 to 1,000 pounds an acre in the black belt. In 1801, nine percent of the world’s cotton came from the United States while 60 percent came from India. By 1820, the United States was exporting more cotton than India. By 1850, the American South was producing more than two-thirds of the world s cotton. The new technology, the new land, and the institution of slavery created great wealth for some; a poor, hard-earned living for others; and backbreaking, torturous misery for slaves.
black belt
The cotton-growing region that was developed in the early 1800s, stretching from Georgia through Alabama, Mississippi, and Louisiana, named for its rich black soil.
9.1
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 243
NEW
SPAIN
ATLANTIC
OCEAN
500 kilometers
MAP 9-1 The Growth of Slavery in the Black Belt. As the black-belt area of cotton production expanded, slave labor became they key to its success and the number of slaves grew dramatically.
M
More than 50% slave QH 10% to 50% slave
|	, ) Less than 10% slave
□ No slaves, or no statistics available
250	500 miles
The People Who Worked the Land—Cotton and the Transformation of Slavery
The white settlers who were able to buy large parcels of land in the rich new territory of what was known as the Old Southwest did not do most of the hard work of actually planting, hoeing, and picking the cotton that would be grown there. Other Americans did that work: African slaves, whose lives were also transformed by the explosive growth of cotton production and whose value to their white owners increased even more than the value of the new land on which they labored.
Between 1800 and 1860, more than 1 million black Americans were forced to move from the homes they knew—and often from their families, too—to new homes in the interior cotton-growing lands of Georgia, Alabama, Mississippi, and Louisiana and later Arkansas and Texas. While slavery slowly disappeared in the North after 1800 and the slave population of Maryland, Virginia, and the Carolinas stabilized or declined, slavery exploded in the new land. In the 60 years before the Civil War, more slaves made the journey from coastal states to inland plantations than had made the terrible Middle Passage from Africa to North America in the previous 200 years.
In some ways similar to the passage from Africa to North America, the journey from a settled community in Virginia, Maryland, or the Carolinas to the new interior plantations was a terrible ordeal. As more slaves were sold into the interior or sold from place to place within it, slaves on the coast lived in terror of being sold and los-ing all connections to family and birthplace. Slave owners used the threat of sale, or the sale of a perceived troublemaker, to maintain discipline in the slave quarter. Slaves often pleaded with masters not to be sold. Sometimes the pleas were successful but often not. Jeff Randolph, the executor of Thomas Jefferson’s estate, was considered especially humane because he refused to sell the former president’s slaves to a buyer from Georgia but sold them instead, at less profit, to other Virginians. The sale of a
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
MAP 9-2 The Expanding Cotton Belt. The areas of greatest cotton production in the United States grew dramatically between 1801 and 1860.
spouse broke up one slave marriage in five, and one-third of all slave children were sold away from their parents. Men were sold more often than women; planters wanted male muscle, and slave owners in older regions were happy to keep women so that they could bear more children who could, in turn, also be sold. Slaves between ages 14 and 35 were sold much more often than the very young or the aging. A literate slave, Arena Screven, learned that he was to be sold from Georgia to New Orleans and wrote to his wife “with much regret” that he hoped “if we shall not meet in this world I hope to meet in heaven.” Laura Clark, a slave, remembered her mother asking another slave, who had been sold in the same group as she to “take care of my baby child... and if I never sees her no more raise her for God.” Such heartbreak led many slaves to despair, to run away, or to rebel.
Once sold, either to a plantation owner who had come east for additional slaves or more often to a slave trader whose job was brokering other humans, slaves were organized in groups called slave coffles to walk west. Coffles of 20 to 50 slaves, sometimes more, trudging west became a normal sight of southern life. Walking 15 to 20 miles a day, it could take the slaves 2 months to go from Virginia to the Mississippi Valley, often longer when rain flooded streams and turned roads to mud. In later years, more slaves were transported by ship to New Orleans, which became the largest slave-trading center in the United States by the 1820s.
When they could, slaves rebelled. Slave trading was a dangerous business, and stories of slaves murdering slave traders were well known. In 1841, slaves being shipped from Norfolk, Virginia, to New Orleans on the Creole forced the captain to deliver them to the Bahamas, a British colony, where they found freedom because Britain had abolished slavery in 1833. More often, slaves simply ran away when they could, though many went home to family where they were recaptured and sold again.
Once slaves arrived at their destination, they often faced difficult and unfamiliar work. Work in cotton fields was backbreaking for men, women, and children. While tobacco and rice required more skill, cotton required long hours and hard work.
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 245
L
9.1
Cotton was planted in the early spring and required constant attention and weeding throughout the growing season. On most plantations, there was a strict gender divide: men plowed, and women and children hoed. Harvest began as early as August and lasted through September and October. Slaves worked the longest hours—from sunrise to sunset, and if there was a moon, much longer—to get the whole crop in before storms could hurt it. Prickly cotton pods cut their hands, and slaves who did not produce their quota were beaten at day’s end. Finally, with the full crop in, there was a brief respite. But the winter was the time for the women to work the cotton gin and pack the cotton for market while men cleared more land and repaired buildings.
Contrary to many images of the old South, most cotton was grown on relatively small farms. Many of those who first settled and began growing cotton on the new rich lands owned relatively small plots of land and one or a few slaves. These white owners worked in the fields with the slaves or, if the farm was larger, served as their overseers. Less than one percent of the population owned the great plantations for which the South became known. In the largest plantations owned by the most wealthy planters, slaves worked in large gangs with certain slaves appointed as “drivers” to get the work done and poor whites employed as overseers to manage the whole labor force. It was on the large plantations, with constant pressure on the overseers to ensure profits, that slaves faced some of the worst conditions.
Slaves established new communities within the slave quarters. Young slaves met new partners, children were born, and the rhythms of community life were reestablished, but always under threat of dissolution. New leaders emerged within the slave community, often preachers and deacons selected by other slaves. Although legally banned from learning to read or write, slaves sometime secretly did both and taught others to do so. As memories of Africa or the African-American communities on the east coast faded in later generations, a new culture was created in the slave communities, drawing on older traditions and adapting to new contexts. Often with the permission of their owners, slaves grew their own food, made cloth for better clothing than their owners gave them, and even earned cash by selling surplus food and clothing to the free people in surrounding communities or to their own masters. While owners saw slaves exclusively as a source of muscle and work, many slaves and ex-slaves made it clear through their stories that for them family, community, faith, and the
As this picture illustrates, slaves spent long hours in the fields surrounded by the cotton they were expected to cultivate and pick with no reward for their backbreaking labor.
i6 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
American Voices
Charles Ball, Fifty Years in Chains; or, The Life of an American Slave, 1810-1860
Charles Ball was born a slave on a tobacco plantation in Maryland. He remembered his grandfather telling of being captured into slavery in Africa. After establishing his own family in Maryland, Ball was sold to a slave trader who in turn sold him to a cotton and rice plantation in Georgia. He never saw his home or family again. Haifa century later, he escaped, hid on a ship bound for Philadelphia, and lived out his days in freedom. His autobiography, Fifty Years in Chains, was a popular publication among abolitionists—those who supported the end of slavery.
My master kept a store at a small village on the bank of the
Patuxent River....Whilst I was eating in the kitchen, I observed him talking earnestly, but low, to a stranger near the kitchen door. I soon after went out, and hitched my oxen to the cart, and was about to drive off, when several men came round about me, and amongst them the stranger whom I had seen speaking with my master. This man came up to me, and, seizing me by the collar, shook me violently, saying I was his property, and must go with him to Georgia. At the sound of these words, the thoughts of my wife and children rushed across my mind, and my heart beat away within me. I saw and knew that my case was hopeless, and that resistance was vain, as there were near twenty persons present, all of whom were ready to assist the man by whom I was kidnapped. I felt incapable of weeping or speaking, and in my despair I laughed loudly. My purchaser ordered me to cross my hands behind, which were quickly bound with a strong cord; and he then told me that we must set out that very day for the South. I asked if I could not be allowed to go see my wife and children, or if this could not be
permitted, if they might have leave to come to see me; but was told that I would be able to get another wife in Georgia.
My new master, whose name I did not hear, took me that same day across the Patuxent, where I joined fifty-one other slaves.... A strong iron collar was closely fitted by means of a padlock round each of our necks. A chain of iron, about a hundred feet in length, was passed through the hasp of each padlock, except at the two ends, where the hasps of the padlock passed through a link of the chain....
Our master ordered a pot of mush to be made for our supper; after dispatching which all lay down on the naked floor to sleep in our handcuffs and chains. The women, my fellow-slaves, lay on one side of the room; and the men who were chained with me, occupied the other. I slept but little this night, which I passed in thinking of my wife and little children whom I could not hope ever to see again. I also thought of my grandfather, and of the long nights I had passed with him, listening to his narratives of the scenes through which he had passed in Africa.
Source: Charles Ball, Fifty Years in Chains; or, The Life of An American Slave (New York:
H.
Dayton, 1860), pp. 28-31,240-241,280. Thinking Critically
I.
Documentary Analysis What aspects of his sale were most traumatizing for Ball? Why?
2.	Historical Interpretation
What light does Ball's story shed on major trends in slavery and slave ownership in the first half of the 1800s?
9.1
it '
in

hope for freedom were the highest priority. Studies of the advertisements for runaway slaves also made it clear that slaves never stopped running away no matter how far they might have to run. Similarly, small- and large-scale slave revolts never stopped.
Cotton in the North—Factories and the People Who Worked in Them
The technology that made cotton the core of the Industrial Revolution in the United States developed in England and North America during the 1700s. Just before the War of 1812, American Francis Cabot Lowell, who had spent 2 years working in and observing the British mills in Manchester, brought the technology he learned there to the United States. When he left Britain, customs agents searched his baggage to be sure he was not bringing with him drawings or plans from the British mills, which were a closely guarded national secret. But Lowell had simply been memorizing the plans. Like Slater, an Englishman who had transferred British secrets about mechanic spinning to Rhode Island mills in 1789, Lowell was ready to build a British-style mill in Massachusetts. Lowell also brought with him a second, equally important idea—the multishareholder corporation that could raise more money than any one individual could provide and could offer less risk to investors.
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 247
^2
In 1813, Lowell incorporated a new business with Patrick T. Jackson and Nathan Appleton: the Boston Manufacturing Company. Lowell and his mechanic, Paul Moody, recreated a British-style power loom in Massachusetts. With these steps, they established what would be the heart of American manufacturing for the next century: the multiowner corporation that produced cotton fabric in a large factory.
The partners built their first factory, or mill, at Waltham, Massachusetts, on the Charles River. After Lowell’s death in 1817, they then created a new city in 1823: Lowell, Massachusetts, that housed an even larger complex, using the 30-foot drop of the Merrimack River to power mills that could turn cotton into cloth for a domestic and international market at an astounding rate. Similar large operations sprang up on New Hampshire rivers in Manchester, Dover, and Nashua and on other Massachusetts rivers in Chicopee, Holyoke, and Lawrence. Where Samuel Slater’s mills in Rhode Island had been rather small, family affairs, the factories and towns that Lowell and his colleagues built transformed the industry and the lives of the people involved in it. With the creation of Lowell as a new industrial city, the American Industrial Revolution was born.
The Boston Associates needed workers for their giant looms and mills. They turned first to young women from the farms where most New Englanders still lived. More men than women had been heading west for decades, and New England had a surplus of young women. Farm life was hard, young women were kept in subservient positions, and the independence and the potential to earn their own money appealed to many young women. To avoid the squalid conditions of the English factories, Lowell and his colleagues built clean, company boarding houses for their female employees, complete with chaperones and opportunities for religious and educational activities. For the most part, they hired only single young women whose living conditions (and virtue) they could control (see Map 9-3).
The young women who worked in Lowell’s mills in the early 1800s were known as “factory girls.” Lowell was a show town, and its owners published the Lowell Offering to tell the world about the success of the venture and the good life the women who worked there enjoyed. The Lowell Offering attracted new investors to the business and new young recruits to work in the mills. But life at Lowell and the other mill towns was less rosy than the Lowell Offering reported. Conditions may have been better than in the “dark satanic mills” of Britain, but the work was hard, the hours long, and the conditions harsh.
This idealized print of women working at their machines gives little hint of the noise, danger, and drudgery of 14-hour work days where a moment's lack of attention could lead to a disaster.
!48 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
□ Other buildings (mostly residences)
9.1
92
93
MAP 9-3 Lowell, Massachusetts in 1832. The water-powered mills of the new company town of Lowell, Massachusetts, had to be very close to the rivers that surrounded the town, but the company also built boarding houses for the workers in close proximity to the mills making the trip to work and the supervision of the workers quite easy.
A
New Hampshire newspaper, the Dover Gazette, friendly to the factory girls, reported on an 1834 strike by the young women, one of the first strikes in America: In consequence of the notice... [that] their wages would be reduced, to enable their employers to meet the “unusual pressure of the times,” the girls, to the number of between 600 and 700, assembled in the Court-House on Saturday afternoon, to devise ways and means to enable themselves to meet the “pressure of the times” anticipated from this threatened reduction.
The first strikes did not last long and did not win concessions. The company had too much power and the women too little. Still, news of the unrest tarnished the image of Lowell as a benevolent community run in the interests of its workers. A second strike 2 years later—described by one of the participants in the following American Voices feature—also failed.
By the 1840s, conditions had become much tougher in Lowell. The mill owners’ benevolence had worn off. The option of quitting and returning home, which had provided a way to escape the mill life during the 1830s, was disappearing because of an agricultural depression in New England. Young women stayed in Lowell, not necessarily because they wanted to, but because they had few other choices. Period publications like The Voice of Industry published their letters and articles, which described the challenges they faced and what hopes they had. One woman, known
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 249
9.1
92
93
only as Ada, shared these challenges and hopes in biblical terms that her peers would appreciate:
“Do unto others, as ye would that they should do to you,” is a great precept, given to us by our great Teacher....What but the neglect of this great principle, has brought into the world all this confusion, this disorder, this isolated state of interest, between man and man; all this monopoly and competition in business?
As the Industrial Revolution expanded, Ada would not be the last one to ask that question.
New York and the International Cotton Trade
As significant as the mills of New England were in cotton production, most American cotton was shipped in its raw state to Manchester and Leeds in England. The permanent peace that had been established between the United States and Great Britain after the end of the War of 1812 made this trade easy. New York City became the center of the shipment of cotton across the Atlantic and, in the process, became the nations largest city and commercial center, a position it has retained ever since.
New York City enjoyed several advantages that allowed it to play such a dominant role in the nation’s cotton economy, even though no cotton was grown within hundreds of miles of the city and few cotton mills were nearby. First, New York had an extraordinary deep-water harbor. Ships could dock directly in Manhattan and
American Voices
H.
Robinson worked in the cotton mills at Lowell from B * 1835 to 1848. She was 10 when she began and left at age 23 to be married. She published her story half a century later. The book, Loom and Spindle: Or Life Among the Early Mill Girls, remains a classic story of what life was like for the first generation of young women, most fresh from the farms, to take these jobs. The working-hours of all the girls extended from five o'clock in the morning until seven in the evening, with one-half hour for breakfast and for dinner....
One of the first strikes of cotton-factory operatives that ever took place in this country was that in Lowell, in October, 1836. When it was announced that the wages were to be cut down, great indignation was felt, and it was decided to strike, en mass. This was done. The mills were shut down, and the girls went in procession...and listened to "incendiary" speeches from early labor reformers.
One of the girls stood on a pump, and gave vent to the feelings of her companions in a neat speech, declaring that it was their duty to resist all attempts at cutting down the wages. This was the first time a woman had spoken in public in Lowell, and the event caused surprise and consternation among her audience....
My own recollection of this first strike (or "turn out" as it was called) is very vivid. I worked in a lower room, where I had heard the proposed strike fully, if not vehemently, discussed; I had been an ardent listener to what was said against this attempt at
"oppression" on the part of the corporation, and naturally I took sides with the strikers. When the day came on which the girls were to turn out, those in the upper rooms started first, and so many of them left that our mill was at once shut down. Then, when the girls in my room stood irresolute, uncertain what to do, asking each other, "Would you?" or "shall we turn out?" and not one of them having the courage to lead off, I, who began to think they would not go out, after all their talk, became impatient, and started on ahead, saying, with childish bravado, "I don't care what you do, I am going to turn out, whether anyone else does or not;" and I marched out, and was followed by the others.
As I looked back at the long line that followed me, I was more proud than I have ever been since at any success I may have achieved, and more proud than I shall ever be again until my own beloved State gives to its women citizens the right of suffrage.
Source: Harriet H. Robinson, Loom and Spindle: Or Life Among the Early Mill Girls (Boston: T.Y. Crowell, 1898.), pp. 31,83-85.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
How did Robinson explain the factors that led to her decision to join the strike at her mill?
2.	Contextualization
How did work in a textile factory change Robinson's outlook?
What connections can you make between her strike experience and her commitment to the suffrage movement?
!50 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Brooklyn without needing to anchor offshore and unload goods to smaller boats. The port was also easily accessible by coastal vessels from southern ports. As the production of cotton expanded after 1815, most of the South’s cotton was shipped north to New York and then reshipped either across the Atlantic to English ports or up Long Island Sound to Boston for the New England mills. Second, New York already had the infrastructure necessary to accommodate this level of shipping, including miles of docks and a community of merchants. Third, New York, an established port already, had experienced workers, including dockworkers and longshoremen (who handled cargo), to handle the hundreds of ships that did business there. The already large numbers of workers grew rapidly as New York (not counting Brooklyn, which was a separate city until 1898) grew six times its size between the American Revolution and 1820. In 1820, it mushroomed again from 125,000 residents, and to over 500,000 in 1850.
New York businesses sent agents (called “factors”) to Charleston, South Carolina; Savannah, Georgia; Mobile, Alabama; and New Orleans to buy cotton for shipment to New York. In turn, the cotton was transferred from coastal ships to larger transatlantic ships that sailed to ports in England, racing each other to make the trip in the shortest amount of time.
On the return trip from England, these ships brought cash from the sale of cotton and all sorts of British and European goods—iron and steel tools from Sheffield, England, wine from France, and manufactured goods that the United States needed and that could often be bought in New York for less than it cost to make them elsewhere in America. While American manufacturers disliked this reality, merchants from across the country flocked to New York to stock up on cheap goods, enhancing the city’s commerce.
In 1818, shipping across the Atlantic was improved when a Quaker businessman, Jeremiah Thompson, founded the Black Ball Line and established a fixed schedule of weekly departures of fast ships from New York to Liverpool, England. The Black Ball Line announced that it had “undertaken to establish a line of vessels between NEW YORK and LIVERPOOL, to sail from each place on a certain day in every month through the year,” and printed the schedule. Until that time, commercial vessels waited to fill their holds with cargo, however long that took, before sailing. Now with the fixed schedule, passengers and goods could be sure of leaving on time, and factories in England could be sure of a steady flow of cotton to keep their mills operating.
The new ships were called packet ships because the line had a contract with the federal government to carry packets of U.S. mail. These packet ships became a regular feature of world commerce and New York’s waterfront. Any packet ship captain who made the trip to Liverpool in under 22 days or the return trip to New York (which took longer because of less favorable winds) in under 35 days would be rewarded with a new coat and a dress for his wife, courtesy of Thompson. Competition with the Black Ball Line soon developed, and the passenger cabins became elegant as different lines competed for business. Shipwrights along New York’s East River changed the construction of new ships so they could make the voyage even more quickly than the original schedule. But most important, the Black Ball Line’s ships and its many competitors that emerged in the 1820s and 1830s ensured a steady supply of cotton for English mills and steady profits to U.S. cotton growers.
New York was also the place in the United States to raise money. From the time Alexander Hamilton established the first Bank of the United States in New York City in 1791, some New Yorkers grew rich financing commercial activities that were far away from the city itself. Many farmers had long needed to borrow money for seed and fertilizer to plant a crop. After industrialists like Francis Cabot Lowell began creating giant new corporations to build the factories for producing the cotton cloth that launched the industrial revolution, they too needed ways to borrow much larger amounts of money as well as longer periods of time to make profits and pay off the loans. Without such financing, the Industrial Revolution would never have happened. Financial brokers had agreed to work together in New York in 1792, and the New
9.1
Chapter 9 New Industries New Politics 251
York Stock Exchange was founded in 1817, to support this large-scale commerce by allowing investors to pool funds and create new industries as well as commercial enterprises that were larger than any one person, even a rich one, could fund alone.
New York was also home to many banks, investment houses, and insurance companies that helped finance the cotton industry. Nautilus Insurance Company wrote over 300 life insurance policies on slaves, which protected the investments of plantation owners even if those policies did nothing for the slaves themselves. The investment house that became Brown Brothers, Harriman loaned millions of dollars to southern growers to finance the planting and shipping of cotton as well as the buying of slaves. At one point, the company owned three plantations and 346 slaves in Louisiana when owners defaulted on their loans. In general, however, New York financiers made their profits in trade and commerce and kept their distance from the institution of slavery and the risks of cotton growing. Jeremiah Thompson of the Black Ball Line made his fortune transporting slave-grown cotton, though as a Quaker, he opposed slavery itself.
The extraordinary growth of cotton production in the South, the shipment of cotton within and beyond the United States, and the seemingly insatiable European demand for cotton cloth resulted in a rapid growth of the industry. In 1800, Great Britain imported 56 million pounds of raw cotton, 16 percent from the United States and most of the rest from India. After an economic downturn that disrupted the entire industry and more, production once again began to pick up, and by 1830, Britain imported 264 million pounds of cotton, 77 percent from the United States, and by 1840, 592 million pounds, 81 percent from the United States. Once again, the demand seemed endless, but many were now a bit wiser.
With the development of the trans-Atlantic cotton trade and the opening of the Erie Canal, New York City grew rapidly in its commercial success. However, especially in hard times, the city was also plagued with areas of squalid poverty. Many New Yorkers lived in the most difficult conditions, especially in the notorious crime-filled Five Points neighborhood of Lower Manhattan.
252 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
The Panic of 1819
The boom in the industry was not, as it turned out, a continual progression. As more Americans invested in land or slaves to grow cotton or in the commercial activities that flowed from cotton, the optimism led them to become financially overextend. Suddenly in 1819, the growth came to a sudden if temporary halt. After 4 years of peace, Europe was growing more food, and a good harvest in 1818 meant less need for imported American grain. In addition, more raw cotton was being delivered to Liverpool than the mills could process, and new mills took time to build. The value of cotton fell from 32.5 cents a pound in October 1818 to 24 cents a pound in December. By early 1819, it was only 14 cents a pound. At that price, it was not profitable to grow cotton, to invest in land to plant more cotton, or to ship cotton either to New York or to Europe.
Unfortunately, the Bank of the United States decided to protect itself by limiting credit and calling in loans. State banks followed suit, and investors and farmers could not pay their debts. Small businesses failed, farms were foreclosed, and people across the country lost their jobs. The great migration west came to a halt, at least for the time being, and the business cycle slowed dangerously. At the time, no one knew when or indeed if, prosperity would return. A national economy was a new thing in the United States, and it was not well understood. In earlier eras, what happened to New England shipping had little impact further south, and a crisis in southern tobacco never had much impact further north. By 1819, however, the nation’s economy was interconnected as never before and, as a result, a widespread depression affected all Americans. The boom-and-bust cycle of this young industrial economy was also new, and people were shocked. Eventually, the economy and the country recovered, but it took years and much hardship. In the middle of that first national depression, however, Americans worried about the future. The price of cotton and the value of the cotton industry eventually rebounded and grew beyond anything imagined before the panic, but those successes would be at least partly tempered by what had happened.
| 9J| Quick Review Why did cotton come to be known as King Cotton in the early 1800s?
COMMERCE, TECHNOLOGY, AND TRANSPORTATION__________________________________
Analyze the technological and financial changes that led to the emergence of a new market economy in the United States.
9.2
i 5,1
9.2
i
While cotton was the prime factor in the growth of the U.S. economy after 1815, it was not the only one. North American wheat and corn had been feeding Britain and continental Europe long before North American cotton began to clothe them. Trees from North American forests provided wood for ships and buildings on both sides of the Atlantic. North American furs remained in demand as they had been before the American Revolution. And as more Americans moved further into the interior, improvements in internal transportation became essential for the country’s commercial development.
The Erie Canal
The Hudson River offered easy north-south connections between New Yorkers in Manhattan and Brooklyn and farmers along the river valley up to Albany and beyond, but the heartland of New York State, far to the west of the Hudson, was isolated. The Mohawk River had never been navigable, and rural roads were in terrible shape. The treaties with the Iroquois after the American Revolution opened up tens of thousands of acres, many of them rich lands that white farmers could settle, but these farmers faced terrible isolation and difficulty in selling their crops. Beginning in the 1790s, many New Yorkers wanted a way to ease transport across the state, but no
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 253
9.1
9.2
93
Erie Canal
Completed in 1825, the canal linked the Hudson River with the Great Lakes and gave farmers all along its route new ways to be part of a global economic system of trade.
easy approach seemed possible. Indeed, Americans throughout the rest of the growing country had similar needs—and a similar lack of know-how.
After Congress refused to fund a canal linking rural upstate New York with the Hudson Valley, former New York City Mayor DeWitt Clinton ran for governor in 1816 with a promise to build a canal using state funds. The canal that Clinton proposed avoided the hard-to-navigate Mohawk River and Lake Ontario (using the lake would have lowered construction costs but risked diverting trade to Canada). Instead, he proposed a canal that would follow an old Mohawk Indian trading route (the governor knew his New York history) and run from the Hudson Valley directly to Buffalo on Lake Erie. Such a canal would give farmers along its route a link to markets and would connect all of New York state to the growing Ohio region and eventually to the Mississippi River. It would make New York City the commercial capital of the nation.
The plan called for an unimaginable engineering feat. Thomas Jefferson called it “madness.” The canal needed a series of locks to raise and lower water to accommodate changes in elevation of 565 feet. The United States had few engineers, and no one really knew how to build such locks. The longest canal in the country at that time was only 26 miles, less than one-tenth of the projected plan. None of those problems discouraged Clinton or the canal’s backers. When the anti-Clinton faction, led by Martin Van Buren, realized how much enthusiasm there was for the canal, they ended their opposition, and the project quickly moved through the state legislature.
At dawn on July 4, 1817, a gala ground-breaking celebration was held at Rome, New York, when the symbolic first shovel of dirt was dug to build the Erie Canal, a manmade waterway that would extend 363 miles between Albany and Buffalo and contain a total of 83 locks. Clinton was a wily politician. He made sure that many different
The Erie Canai crossed rural New York State, connecting villages all along the way. Travelers needed to keep their heads down when traveling under bridges and wait as locks raised and lowered boats, but the canal boats provided transport at a speed unimagined before it was built.
254 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
contractors got a piece of the action digging the canal. He built political support by ensuring that up to three-quarters of the 9,000 men who did the actual digging were Dutch or English farmers and laborers from New York State and future Clinton voters. As soon as the section near Rome was completed, Clinton used the revenue it generated to cover the interest on the $7 million in bonds that had been floated to pay for the canal, reducing the cost to taxpayers.
Clinton found contractors willing to experiment with new approaches to construction. In one section, near the town of Lockport, locks needed to be constructed to raise and lower the boats over changing elevations. Contractors used gunpowder to blast out the rock, and horses hauled away the debris. By 1825, the canal, four-feet deep and 40-feet wide, was completed. Governor Clinton traveled from Buffalo across the state on the canal and then down the Hudson to mark the official opening by pouring water from Lake Erie into New York Harbor.
Many admired the engineering of the canal and many more enjoyed its economic impact. Goods and exports that had cost $100 a ton to ship from Lake Erie to New York City before the canal now shipped for $9, or even $3, a ton. Farmers in distant upstate New York and in Ohio could get their wheat to international markets through New York Harbor. Formerly isolated farm families could now send letters and even visit friends and relatives. They could also import goods that had earlier been unimaginable luxuries because they had been too heavy or perishable to transport. A newspaper in Batavia, New York, celebrated the arrival of “Oysters! Beautiful Oysters,” from Long Island to a town where fresh seafood had never been available. Farmers and small town residents now could not only eat sea food but also buy a clock for their wall, a mattress for their bed, or curtains for their home at a fraction of the price these goods had cost before the canal opened. By the 1830s, the Erie Canal carried more than twice the freight of the Mississippi River, and Rochester, Syracuse, and Buffalo boomed. Where cotton had made New York City the nation’s commercial center, foodstuffs and other products from upstate New York and even western Pennsylvania and Ohio now cemented the city’s role as the place where the nation’s trade, commerce, and finance met. Other shorter canals were built in many other parts of the country, but none had the commercial impact of the Erie Canal.
Steamboats, Roads, Travel, and News
Erie Canal boats were pulled by horses walking along the bank. The packet ships that crossed the Atlantic were powered by sail as ships had been for thousands of years. But the invention of the steamboat revolutionized water transportation. In 1807, Robert Fulton built the first commercially successful steamboat, the Clermont, which significantly cut the travel time from New York to Albany. Within 2 decades, New York Harbor and adjacent areas had become a hive of steamboat activity for both commerce and passengers, and many steamboat lines competed for the trade, none more successfully than the line Cornelius Vanderbilt owned.
Steamboats also transformed trade on the Mississippi River. In the early 1800s, farmers floated down the river on large riverboats with their goods and then sold the boats for lumber when they reached their destination and walked or rode horses home. Steamboats, however, could travel up the river against the current. In 1817, a steamer went from New Orleans to Louisville, Kentucky, in 25 days, an unheard-of speed. In less than a decade, the travel time had been cut to 8 days as faster boats competed for the Mississippi River business and became a colorful part of America in the 1800s (see Map 9-4).
In certain areas, water transport was the fastest and easiest way to travel through and around the United States, but roads were also important. In 1802, Congress authorized the use of funds from the sale of government lands in Ohio to build a gravel road to the interior of the country. Beginning in 1811, at Cumberland, Maryland, the National Road was built across the Appalachian Mountains. When it reached its original terminus at Wheeling, Virginia (after the Civil War, West Virginia), in 1818, it
9.1
9.2
93
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 255
ATLANTIC
OCEAN
Charleston & Hamburg Railroad
St. Augustine
Canals, 1830
Navigable waterways, 1830 Roads, 1830 Railroads, 1850
MAP 9-4 Canals and Road in the United States. Although the Erie Cana, was without question the most important canal in the nation, a huge network of canals, dirt and gravel roads, and later, railroads connecting to rivers and ocean ports, connected inland areas to world markets.
Westernjtailroad Bostonw Worcester Railroad
Portland
well Boston (Ster
Providence Boston
New Haven Road
Delaware & Hudson Canal f^New York
^ter----Lancaster Turnpike
Baltimore
Baltimore Turnpike 'ashi^igton, D.C.
Chesapeake & Ohio Canal
not only had crossed the mountains but also had linked the Potomac River with the Ohio River, which flowed into the Mississippi, and from there to the Gulf of Mexico. Later, slowly, the National Road was extended across Ohio, Indiana, and Illinois, connecting to the Mississippi River itself. While many, notably Jefferson’s Secretary of the Treasury Albert Gallatin, argued for more federally financed construction, Presidents Jefferson, Madison, and Monroe—all three advocates of a small federal government—doubted whether the national government could finance such undertakings without an amendment to the Constitution. Those three were also Virginians, and Virginia, with a long coastline, benefited more from coastal shipping than from canals or roads. On occasion, they put their doubts aside and signed bills providing
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
federal funding for specific projects, but none of those who lived in the White House between 1801 and 1825 were enthusiastic about federal support for a transportation infrastructure for the nation.
In addition, states built their own roads, like the Lancaster Turnpike across Pennsylvania, but travel by road was slow and expensive throughout the 1820s and 1830s. A stagecoach could travel 6-8 miles an hour on a good road—11 on the best road between New York and Philadelphia. Wagons could haul goods as far as the next river or canal. Tollbooths collected fees to pay for the roads, but on a poor road in the wilderness, it was easy to detour around the tollbooth. Until railroads arrived in the 1840s, proximity to a canal, river, or the Atlantic and Gulf coasts was essential for the productive commerce in goods and services. People who lived near land or water routes for transport were able to get their goods to market, receive newspapers, and stay connected to an increasingly national economy and culture. Those who lived farther away from such transportation lived isolated lives—all the more isolated as others became more connected.
With increased speed in travel, news also moved more quickly (see Table 9-1). Packet ships from Liverpool brought European news, and as the ships cut trans-Atlan-tic travel time from 50 days in 1816 to 42 days in the 1820s, that news traveled faster. Within the United States, by 1817, a man on a horse could bring news from New York to Philadelphia or Boston in 2 days. A steamboat traveling through Long Island Sound could also bring the news to coastal cities in Connecticut and to Boston in about the same amount of time. For southern coastal cities, the travel time was slower, and for inland towns, much slower. Newspapers sprang up across the country, and the federal government developed an extensive post office system (since the Constitution clearly sanctioned the post office and post roads) that helped Americans connect for personal and business matters. The packet ships, stagecoaches, and canal boats also depended on contracts with the federal post office to make their routes profitable. Commercial leaders and traders on the New York Stock Exchange were anxious to have the latest news, especially about crops, but also about European and American demand for goods. They supported the post office and newspapers as essential for the growing, unified market economy.

While steamships like Robert Fulton's Clermont made for easy and fast travel up the Hudson River and along other riversaround the nation they were limited to water transport, while stage coaches, which were much slower, were essential for travel over the country's poorly constructed roads until replaced on many routes by ra.lroads..
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 257
i
i
I
tJ
9.2
TABLE 9-1 Changes in Travel Times Within the United States as a Result of the Revolution in Transportation
Route	1800	1830 ____________I860
New York to Philadelphia	2 days	1 day	Less than 1 day
New York to South Carolina	More than 1 week	5 days	2 days
New York to Illinois	6 weeks	3 weeks	2 days
New York to New Orleans	4 weeks	2 weeks	6 days
New York to Florida	2 to 3 weeks	1 to 2 weeks	3 days
New York to Ohio	2 to 3 weeks	1 week	2 days
Banks, Corporations, and Finance
In the early years of the Republic many Americans harbored deep distrust of large business enterprises. The family farm was the business model with which most people were familiar, and other businesses were expected to be small, individual or family ventures. People might join together to finance a voyage or a project, but these efforts were short-term partnerships. At the time of the American Revolution, there were only seven American corporations, each chartered by colonial legislatures. State legislatures chartered 40 more corporations in the 1780s and some 300 in the 1790s, but gaining a corporate charter remained difficult. In general, such charters were given only to colleges or other nonprofit agencies to serve the public good. Commerce was considered as being for individual gain and therefore not something worthy of a state charter.
Some of the first corporations were banks. Congress had chartered the nation’s first bank, the Bank of North America, at Hamilton’s urging in 1781. By 1815, the United States had 200 state-chartered banks. Banks offered two essential services. First, they printed paper currency—bank notes—that were backed by the bank’s gold and silver deposits (known as specie), making commercial transactions much easier than hauling actual gold and silver around. Second, banks also made loans and collected interest, making funds available to people who wanted to develop a new enterprise and making the banks themselves profitable investments. Soon, banks also began to issue bank notes not only on the species they held but also on the loans in their portfolio. This development made banking more risky but expanded the amount of money in circulation and the credit available, essential elements in the growth of a commercial republic.
As commerce developed, however, larger commercial and industrial ventures, like the mills at Lowell, were too large and risky to be financed solely by individuals, even if those individuals could secure large bank loans. A new idea, that of a corporation as a free-standing commercial venture with multiple stockholders, took hold slowly. Two key elements in a corporation—limited liability for individual stockholders and the corporation’s freedom from having its charter withdrawn or altered by the government—were new in the United States. Individually owned businesses came and went, but corporations with their many stockholders and secure charters eventually became a permanent and important feature of American economic life after 1815.
The Reality of the New Market Economy
In 1819, Washington Irving, already a well-known author, published Rip Van Winkle. The story has entertained generations of readers, but it captured the changes in the United States in the first decades of independence. In the story, Rip, a lazy fellow living in New York’s Catskill Mountains, takes a nap in the woods on a fine fall day. He awakes 20 years later and finds everything has changed in his home village-
258 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
The picture on the sign over the inn was of someone named “General Washington” instead of King George III, but even more surprising, the whole town was different:
The very village was altered; it was larger and more populous. There were rows of houses which he had never seen before, and those which had been his familiar haunts had disappeared....The very character of the people seemed changed. There was a busy, bustling, disputatious tone about it, instead of the accustomed phlegm and drowsy tranquility.
Rip had been a passive subject of King George III. When he awoke, he was a citizen in an independent country that took politics, voting, and political parties very seriously. When he was asked whether he “was Federal or Democrat,” Rip was equally at a loss. But Irving was saying something more about the decades after the Revolution—that “the very character of the people seemed changed.” Where once rural America had moved to a relaxed, slow pace, the whole country was now a more unified commercial enterprise in which a “busy, bustling, disputatious tone” was the norm because people needed to work and work fast.
There were many real-life Rip Van Winkles who, while not necessarily having the benefit of a 20-year nap, still came to live in an adult world utterly different from that of their youth. Ichabod Washburn was born in the small town of Kingston, Massachusetts, in 1798. His widowed mother supported the family with a loom in her home. When his mother could not feed her whole family, Washburn was “put out” to work as a harness maker and told that a boy should not ask too many questions about the world around him. Later, he found work in one of the factories that were springing up around New England and then founded his own business. Washburn & Moen Wire Manufactory became the largest wire maker in the country, sending its products all over the world and making Washburn a rich man. Not all Americans became as rich as Washburn, but many people in many parts of the land moved from isolated family businesses to work in large nationally and internationally connected industries. Ihey went from a slow-paced world of barter to a cash economy based on trade, and they moved from rural isolation to participate in the exchange of information within a much larger world.
9.2
i
: i
]
growing economy and the revolution in transportation only increased dennand for the nations raw materials such as lumber, which new machinery made easy to cut into standard-sized boards for shipment sn(l use in building houses and ships.
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 259
Before the American Revolution, most farmers lived in a barter economy in which most goods and services were simply traded. In that economy, life moved at a slow and predictable pace, and little money was transacted. By the 1820s, the barter economy had disappeared in all but the most remote areas. Farmers sold their goods on the world market and used the cash they received to purchase not only necessities but also, often, luxuries that their pre-Revolutionary forbearers never imagined.
To many Americans—not just to national leaders—distances seemed shorter, money more important, and politics more omnipresent after 1815 than one would have thought possible even a few years before. Visitors to remote farm settlements in Illinois in the 1820s found that cloth coats and calico dresses purchased from a trader or a store were replacing homespun and buckskin. Once one family made the shift, everyone in the village felt pressure to earn enough money to keep up. As people worked harder and longer, public clocks—with an added hand that noted minutes, not just the passage of the hours—became more prominent. Chauncey Jerome’s Connecticut clock company made a fortune manufacturing and shipping clocks to every part of the nation. As one 1840 traveler reported, “In every dell of Arkansas, and in cabins where there was not a chair to sit on, there was sure to be a Connecticut clock.” Rip Van Winkle was not the only one waking up in a different time and in a money-conscious country.
9.2
Quick Review How did new trading routes progressively improve the U.S. economy and, in doing so, change the United States?
93
Era of Good Feelings
The period from 1817 to 1823 in which the decline of the Federalists enabled the Democratic-Republicans to govern in a spirit of seemingly nonpartisan harmony.
FROM THE ERA OF GOOD FEELINGS TO THE POLITICS OF DIVISION
Explain the political developments in the United States during the 1820s, including the shift of power toward the South and West that resulted from the changing economic situation.
James Monroe’s two terms as president from 1817 to 1825 were known as the Era of Good Feelings because of the lack of rancor in his virtually unanimous election and reelection during a time when the opposing Federalist Party had almost disappeared. The period was quite a change from the days when John Adams and Thomas Jefferson contested the presidency and Federalists and Democratic-Republicans fought in the press and on the floor of Congress. But even during the Era of Good Feelings, all was not calm on the political front. The Supreme Court was rapidly expanding its reach and the reach of the federal government into new aspects of the country. In addition, political tensions over the cotton economy, territorial expansion, and slavery exploded with surprising force in the 1820s. The good feelings were not destined to last.
The Supreme Court Defines Its Place
John Marshall served as chief justice of the U.S. Supreme Court from 1801 to 1835. Throughout his long tenure on the Court, Marshall was usually able to convince a majority of the justices to go along with his views no matter what their prior political beliefs were. He used his position to define the role of the court as arbiter of the Constitution, and he expanded the role and power of the federal government in many aspects of national life.
Early in his tenure, Marshall’s 1803 Marbury v. Madison decision claimed a role for the Supreme Court in reviewing the constitutionality of acts of Congress. Marshall never again invoked that right, but in a series of subsequent decisions, he created the same right for the court in relationship to state legislatures and state courts. Two 1819 decisions from the Marshall court were especially important in expanding the role of the Supreme Court and the federal government.
160 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
In an appeal to the Supreme Court in the case of Dartmouth College v. Woodward (1819), the old Federalist Marshall reviewed a decision by lower courts that began when the Democratic-Republican-dominated New Hampshire legislature revised the original charter of Dartmouth College, converting the school from a private to a state college. The Supreme Court ruled that state charters, including charters from colonial legislatures like Dartmouth’s, were contracts and that contracts, once agreed to, were inviolable; thus, the legislature’s actions were unconstitutional. The case was important not only because it asserted the right of the Supreme Court to review the actions of state legislatures, not just Congress, but also because it asserted the inviolability of contracts. As a result, it became an important bedrock of the American economic system. After the Dartmouth College decision, the nation’s growing businesses and industries were able to be certain that their contracts, once agreed to, could not be overturned by legislative action.
The other important 1819 decision was McCulloch v. Maryland. Congress had chartered the Second Bank of the United States at the end of the War of 1812 to stabilize the nation’s finances. But the bank was not popular with many people, especially farmers and others who saw it as an instrument of the commercial elite. In response to the general opposition to the bank and to charges of irregularities in the bank’s Maryland branch, the state of Maryland imposed a tax on the bank as a way to drive it out of business, or at least out of Maryland. In response, the bank brought suit in the federal courts and the case worked its way up to the Supreme Court. In the decision, written by Marshall, the court took Alexander Hamilton’s view that the “necessary and proper” clause of the Constitution meant that Congress had the right to charter a bank if it thought it was in the national interest, despite the Tenth Amendment’s mandate that states should retain any power that was not specifically delegated to the national government in the Constitution. Marshall went further, saying that “the power to tax involves the power to destroy” while the “power to create” that Congress had invoked in the case of the bank, “implies a power to preserve.” The issue Marshall referred to was not obscure. With McCulloch v. Maryland, the Supreme Court declared that states could not interfere with the workings of the federal government.
The Marshall Court continued to expand federal authority in subsequent cases. In Gibbons v. Ogden (1824), the court ruled that the state of New York did not have a right to give Ogden, a partner of Robert Fulton, a monopoly to ferry service in New York harbor since the harbor connected New York and New Jersey and thus involved interstate commerce, which only Congress could control. Later, in Worcester v. Georgia (1832), the court ruled that the state of Georgia could not regulate private dealings by U.S. citizens within the territory controlled by the Cherokee tribe since tribes had their own sovereign rights, subject only to the authority of the federal government. In these and other decisions, the court affirmed what came to be known as a “loose construction” of the Constitution, which as Marshall explained, enabled the Constitution “to be adapted to the various crises of human affairs to preserve its relevance through time. Not everyone agreed with Marshall s perspective, and when he died in 1835, a Democratic-Republican paper did not mourn “the political doctrines” of a justice who sought “to strengthen government at the expense of the People.” Nevertheless, many felt that both the Constitution and the rights of people were stronger for his efforts.
The Politics of Cotton and the Missouri Compromise of 1820
Although Missouri was too far north to be a cotton-growing state, its population also grew as a result of Americas westward movement, and by 1819 Missouri applied to Congress to be admitted as a new state. A bill to authorize a state constitutional convention was introduced in Congress with little fanfare early in 1819. However, Congressman James Tallmadge, Jr., of New York introduced an amendment to the
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 261
Missouri statehood bill to prohibit the introduction of new slaves into the state and gradually free those who were already there. Tallmadge’s amendment created a huge crisis in which southern representatives and senators attacked it and its author.
In language that prefigured the heated debates of the next four decades, Georgia Representative Thomas W. Cobb told Tallmadge, “You have kindled a fire which all the waters of the ocean cannot put out, which seas of blood can only extinguish.” Tallmadge responded in kind: “If a dissolution of the Union must take place, let it be so! If civil war, which gentlemen so much threaten, must come, I can only say, let it come.” Threats of disunion were as old as the Constitutional Convention of 1787, but this language was harsher than Congress had heard in a long time. The reasons were clear.
When the Constitution was adopted, many from both the South and the North believed that slavery was dying; even its defenders tended to describe the institution as a sad though necessary evil. When George Washington and others of his generation freed their slaves, the economic impact was limited since slaves were not of great value. But that period was before cotton transformed the economics of slavery. A slave in the prime of life who might be sold for $400 or $500 in 1814 could be sold for $800-$1,100 in 1819, and though the price of slaves, as of land, decreased with the panic of 1819, values in both cases recovered and then kept rising. Slaves had become valuable, whether as workers or as “products” to be sold. If Virginia and Carolina planters could not use all the slaves they owned, instead of freeing them, they could now sell them to cotton growers in Georgia, Mississippi, and Alabama at a substantial profit. Missouri had few slaves, but by 1820, slave owners were not about to allow an attack on the institution of slavery. Although much of the debate about Missouri was spoken in the language of popular will and the sovereign right of (white) people there to decide their own policies, it took place as economic and racial realities were changing quickly.
In the North, hostility to slavery was growing. Many northerners, including many whose pre-Revolutionary parents and grandparents had owned slaves, now hated the whole idea of human slavery and disliked a constitutional system that protected it. Even before 1820, some people were starting to call themselves abolitionists—those committed to completely ending slavery. Many other northerners had more strategic objections to the constitutional protection of slavery. Ihe three-fifths clause in the Constitution gave the slaveholding South 17 more seats in the House of Representatives and, thus, 17 more electoral votes in presidential elections than an allocation of representatives based on only free people would have done. As a result, four of the five U.S. presidents who had served by 1820 had come from Virginia. Ihe nation was becoming divided between a commercial North and an agricultural South, and although neither region was purely for or against slavery, the fact that slavery gave the South a political edge came across to many northerners as being unfair.
The debates about Missouri, despite all the anger voiced by Tallmadge and Cobb, were not as vitriolic as future debates would be. There were not yet many radical abolitionists in the North, and so far, few in the South were saying that slavery was a positive good. But already in 1819, neither side would back down, and Congress adjourned without doing anything about Missouri.
Before Congress reassembled in 1820, President Monroe and Henry Clay of Kentucky, the speaker of the House of Representatives, designed a compromise to resolve the issue. While the North had a solid and growing majority in the House, the Senate was evenly divided between slave and free states. Since each state had two senators no matter what its population, 11 free states and 11 slave states meant a Senate that was split 22-22 on the issue of slavery. In addition, while Congress had debated what to do about Missouri, the region known as the District of Maine, within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, was also petitioning for statehood with the blessing of the Massachusetts legislature. The compromise proposed that if Maine and Missouri were admitted at the same time, and if Missouri was allowed to be a slave state, then the balance in the Senate would be maintained. However, this proposed compromise
IV
Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848 would also restrict the spread of slavery: while Missouri would be admitted as a slave state, all other states north of the 36° 30° north parallel, that is, the southern border of Missouri, would be admitted as free states. Although most northerners in the House and Senate voted against it, some supported the compromise, as did almost all of those from the South, and the Missouri Compromise passed Congress, allowing Missouri and Maine to be admitted to the Union. The crisis had been averted. The success would be the first of many such compromises for which Henry Clay would become known as the “great compromiser” over the next 3 decades. However, the need for this compromise signaled more clearly than ever before that slavery had become a divisive issue that would not go away (see Map 9-5).
The Contested Election of 1824
As President Monroe came to the end of his second term, the political good will that had marked his tenure disappeared. Although no constitutional limitation had yet been set on presidential terms, Washington had set a precedent for stepping down after two terms, which others had followed. In 1824, as the nation sought a new president,
Missouri Compromise
A compromise in Congress in 1820 that admitted Missouri to the Union as a slave state and Maine as a free state as well as prohibited slavery in the rest of the Louisiana Purchase territory above 36°30° north latitude.
9.3
i
Los
Angeles
RUSSIAN
TERRITORY
BRITISH
NORTH AMERICA
OREGON COUNTRY (US
and Great Britain) SPANISH
TERRITORY
Missouri ft
MICHIGAN /
UNORGANIZED
TERRITORY
Xjy.TERRITORY
; MICHIGAN
\ TERRITORY
:ar>sas R.
ILLINOIS ^St. Louis
OHIO
Ohio*
PACIFIC
OCEAN
---------------------1
ARKANSAS TERRITORY
(1819-36)	< ~	<
tied R. 7
_, j u hatchez § Nacogdoches \	• $
San Antonio de Bejar
KENTUCKY
TENNESSEE
v? ALABAMA
|	| Free states and territories
|	| Slave states and territories
Open to slavery by Missouri Compromise |	| Closed to slavery by Missouri Compromise
— — Missouri Compromise Line
VIRGINIA
PENNSYLVANIA
Washington
D.C.
NEW HAMPSHIRE
MASSACHUSETTS
RHODE ISLAND
CONNECTICUT NEW JERSEY DELAWARE
MARYLAND
NORTH
CAROLINA,
SOUTH ’
CAROLINA
GEORGIA
LOuIsfc^NA,-,
Orleans
Gulf of Mexico
*St. Augustine
FLORIDA
T^RITORY
ATLANTIC
OCEAN







MAP 9-5 The Missouri Compromise Line. This map shows the way the nation was divided in an equal lumber of free and slave states by the Missouri Compromise.
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 263
THINKING HISTORICALLY
The Missouri Compromise
When he heard about the Missouri Compromise, the aging Thomas Jefferson, who had been infuriated by the Tallmadge amendment because it interfered with the rights of states, wrote to John Holmes, a Massachusetts congressman:
I had for a long time ceased to read the newspapers or pay any attention to public affairs, confident they were in good hands, and content to be a passenger in our bark to the shore from which I am not distant. But this momentous question, like a fire bell in the night, awakened and filled me with terror. I considered it at once as the knell of the Union. It is hushed indeed for the moment. But this is a reprieve only, not a final sentence. A geographical line, coinciding with a marked principle, moral and political, once conceived and held up to the angry passions of men, will never be obliterated; and every new irritation will mark it deeper and deeper.
While Clay was being hailed as a national hero for crafting the compromise, Jefferson, perhaps, had a better sense of what lay
ahead. The former president and slaveholder who also wrote passionately against slavery knew that, in the long term, no issue would so greatly divide the nation's citizens, and as he grew old, he saw the division become increasingly intense.
Thinking Critically
1.	Contextualization
How would you characterize pro- and antislavery forces in 1820? What might explain the widespread belief that the issue of slavery had been resolved with the passage of the Missouri Compromise?
2.	Historical Interpretation
In hindsight, it is clear that Jefferson was correct and the Missouri Compromise was only a "reprieve." What evidence was available in 1820 to support Jefferson's point of view? What trends had already begun to emerge that would lead the intensification of the conflict over slavery in the decades to come?
mi
the United States experienced one of the most contested and confusing presidential elections in its history. For citizens of a nation that had elected James Monroe almost unanimously in 1816 and 1820, the ill will of 1824 was a surprise.
In one sense, the election of 1824 proceeded just as the writers of the Constitution— who hated the idea of political parties—envisioned: a contest in which members of the House, with each state’s delegation having one vote, would decide on a president from among several of the nation’s leading citizens who had been identified by the votes of the Electoral College. With the demise of the Federalists, the Democratic-Republican Party was the only party in the nation. It had been as that party’s candidate that Monroe had been elected by an almost unanimous vote since the Federalists did not nominate a candidate in 1820 or anytime after that.
By 1824, however, the usual process in which a party caucus within Congress would select a presidential nominee had broken down, and three members of Monroe’s cabinet along with the speaker of the House of Representatives all sought the presidency. A fifth candidate from the same Democratic-Republican Party, Senator Andrew Jackson, the national war hero from Tennessee, also joined the race. In this type of contest, personal animosity and political intrigue were inevitable.
At first, many thought Secretary of the Treasury William H. Crawford of Georgia was the obvious choice. Crawford had stepped out of the way to support Monroe s election, and he and many of his supporters thought it was now his turn. The congressional caucus that traditionally nominated presidential candidates, in fact, did choose Crawford. However, in what was clearly a warning of trouble to come, less than a fourth of the members of Congress showed up to vote in the caucus. Others, in Congress and outside of it, would find other candidates and other ways to support them.
Secretary of State John Quincy Adams of Massachusetts had a good claim to consideration. Many considered the office of secretary of state as the natural stepping stone to the presidency. Monroe had been Madison’s secretary of state as Madison had been
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Jefferson s, and Jefferson had been Washington’s. In addition, Adams had served the nation well. He had acquired Florida for the United States, arranged treaties that opened vast new lands to settlement, and handled South American revolutions and potential European interference skillfully. As a former ambassador, senator, son of a former president, and favorite of the antislavery North, Adams had much going for him.
Secretary of War John C. Calhoun from South Carolina was another candidate. Calhoun had not yet become the fierce advocate of states’ rights that he was later. In 1824, he was a strong nationalist. He advocated for a strong army and for using army engineers to conduct a national survey that would lead to federally supported roads, bridges, and canals connecting all parts of the nation. He also supported the Bank of the United States. Calhoun initially backed Adams, but when he became convinced after the Missouri crisis that southern and border state electors would never support a New Englander, his own ambition was fired up and he campaigned actively.
Henry Clay of Kentucky, also a contender, was speaker of the House of Representatives and an ardent nationalist. Like Calhoun, he supported an expansive federal government that controlled the currency through a strong national bank and that built roads and bridges as well as supported commerce. From his political base in Kentucky, Clay hoped to be the first president from west of the Alleghenies. He was also shrewd enough to guess that with so many candidates in the race, the House of Representatives, which he controlled, might make the final decision.
Finally, there was Andrew Jackson of Tennessee. At first, Jackson seemed an unlikely candidate for president. Unlike any president after Washington, Jackson had never served in the cabinet or represented the nation abroad. Instead, he was the hero of the Battle of New Orleans. He had served for 1 year in the Senate and in other government posts, but his primary public role was as a military leader, and in the 1820s, the military was not always a popular institution. His wife, Rachel Jackson, strongly opposed his seeking the presidency. In 1822, however, the Tennessee legislature formally nominated Jackson as a candidate for president, primarily as a way to block the then frontrunner Crawford. At that point, Jackson probably supported Adams, in part, because Adams had supported Jackson’s actions in Florida, while Crawford and Clay had not.
No one, including Jackson, counted on how popular he would be with the electorate. When a tavern keeper in Pennsylvania wrote, asking whether Jackson would indeed seek the presidency, the canny general, knowing that his response would be published, replied that it was his “undeviating rule neither to seek or decline public invitations to office.” His response seemed the height of statesmanship to a country that had seen Monroe’s almost unanimous election in the Era of Good Feelings replaced by a divisive contest for the presidency.
The Constitution allows each state to decide how to choose presidential electors. By 1824, most states allowed voters to select electors pledged to a specific candidate, thus greatly democratizing the presidential selection process. That electorate had changed since the Constitution was adopted in 1789. Since 1808 when New Jersey retracted its decision to give women the right to vote, only men voted. Property restrictions on voting, still common when Washington was elected, were long gone in most states, so nearly all white men could now vote, and in some northern states, so could free black men. In New York City, free blacks sometimes held the balance of power among various factions. Excluded from voting were women of all races, most blacks including all slaves, and Indians. Nevertheless, this broad male electorate valued widespread popularity as more important in selecting a president than the voice of a few members of the social and economic elite. By 1824, the (white male) popular will was coalescing behind Jackson far more than anyone expected.
In a nation increasingly divided by sectional issues, a nationally respected war hero had great appeal. In addition, a fierce opponent of banks like Jackson was popular with many people who were convinced at least partially rightly that the Bank of the United States had brought on the panic of 1819. In places like Mississippi
9.3
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 265
9.3
1	and Alabama where some people were growing rich on farmlands that Jackson had
J	wrested from their Indian owners, he was a local hero. Particularly in a country where
an elite’s economic decisions had hurt many farmers and workers, a candidate who had been born in a log cabin and grown up poor, though he had become wealthy as an adult, had deep appeal. Popular appeal had not been a major factor in the elections of Madison and Monroe, but it was the factor in 1824.
In the 1824 election, Jackson won the popular vote. Calhoun, who had withdrawn from the campaign after deciding that Jackson was too popular to beat, was easily elected as vice president since the Twelfth Amendment, ratified in 1804 in the after-math of the Jefferson-Burr fiasco, mandated that presidential electors cast separate ballots for presidential and vice presidential candidates. In addition to Pennsylvania, Jackson easily carried the black-belt states of Georgia, Alabama, Mississippi, and Louisiana as well as most of the rest of the South, a region benefitting from its population of nonvoting slaves, which strengthened its electoral votes as a result of the three-fifths clause to the Constitution. Jackson defeated Adams in New Jersey, Crawford in North Carolina, and Clay in Indiana and Illinois. Adams carried New England, some of the mid-Atlantic region, and the Northwest. However, although Jackson won the most popular votes, no one had the 131 electoral votes needed for a majority:
Jackson	99	electoral	votes
Adams	84	electoral	votes
Crawford	41 electoral votes
Clay	37	electoral	votes
Clay’s prediction was right; the election had been tossed into the House of Representatives. Not since 1800 had the House of Representatives been called on to decide the outcome of a presidential contest.
Ironically, however, since the Constitution required the House to choose from among the top three candidates, Clay himself had been eliminated. Moreover, although his supporters had kept it hidden, Crawford had had a stroke and could not possibly assume the presidency. So the election came down to Jackson and Adams, and Adams was determined to fight for the office, despite ranking second in the popular and electoral votes. The Constitution mandated a process, and Adams wanted to follow it. Many of Adams’s followers, and the supporters of other candidates, saw Jackson as a would-be American Napoleon who would undermine American democracy. No one held that concern more strongly than Henry Clay—who was master of the House and determined that Jackson should not be president. When the House met on February 9, 1825, Adams was elected president by a vote of 13 states, with seven states for Jackson and four for Crawford.
On the evening of the vote, outgoing President Monroe held a party at the White House. Jackson approached Adams, and they greeted each other with considerable formality. Observers thought Jackson was “genial and gracious,” while Adams was stiff, rigid, cold as a statue. The two would not often meet again, but the interaction that night imprinted an image on the public that would follow them, to Jackson’s benefit, for the next 4 years and beyond.
Whether Adams had made any secret agreement with Clay will never be known. But 5 days after the vote, Adams appointed Clay to be his secretary of state and thus his successor if the previous pattern held true. Jackson denounced both men for making a “corrupt bargain,” resigned from the Senate, and returned to his home in Nashville to begin what was essentially a 4-year campaign against Adams, Clay, and their administration, as well as a campaign for his own election to the office that he and his followers believed he had won in 1824. Adams and Clay had underestimated the popular feeling for Jackson. The animosity of the campaign and Jackson’s rancor would make the next 4 years difficult for an administration led by two of the nation s most gifted political and diplomatic leaders.
266 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
The Adams-Clay Agenda
In his inaugural address in March 1825, Adams acknowledged that he came to the presidency, less possessed of your confidence in advance than any of my predecessors.” Nevertheless, it was his goal to unify the nation and improve all parts of the country. He was the last president to believe that the “baneful weed of party strife” might be avoided, and he struggled—unsuccessfully—to avoid the creation of political parties and permanent national divisions.
Adams proposed a list of national improvements to be implemented by the federal government. Support for federally funded improvements such as roads, canals, and so on would be a hallmark of the Adams administration. An emerging political faction that supported national development and strong federal actions to deal with national problems agreed with the direction that the Adams administration was taking. Jackson and another emerging faction would strongly oppose this sort of activist federal government, advocating instead for states’ rights.
Improvement, both personal and political, was a popular ambition in the 1820s. Adams worried about becoming a better person, and he swam naked in the Potomac every day to improve his body. But he also wanted to improve the country, and he saw the money freed from paying off the Revolutionary War debt and the income from sales of federal lands as the perfect opportunity for investing in the country. The General Survey, conducted by army engineers when John C. Calhoun was secretary of war, was the blueprint. Adams, with an eye to southern voters, proposed a second National Road to link Washington, D.C., to New Orleans. He proposed, and Congress approved, building the Chesapeake and Ohio Canal that would connect with the original National Road and link the Potomac with the Ohio and Mississippi Rivers. Postmaster General John McLean built post offices in rural areas and subsidized the stagecoach industry to carry the mail and connect the nation’s far-flung people to one another. Adams also proposed a new national university to be based in Washington and a national observatory—a “lighthouse of the skies.” All of these activities were designed to knit the nation together, advancing knowledge and making it easier to transport goods. In addition, the intent was to unite the nation in a single political entity and a market economy, especially after the divisions sparked by the debates around the Missouri Compromise (see Map 9-4 on page 256).
Secretary of State Clay was involved in all these efforts and, in fact, during the presidential campaign, had described a program of internal improvements and protective tariffs that came to be known as the “American System.” In Clay’s mind, the American System would reduce poverty by linking all Americans (all white Americans; Clay considered neither his own 50 slaves nor others’ slaves to be Americans) in a prosperous commercial community. The system was American because it made the federal government an agent of economic development. Clay believed that the roads and canals, as well as the support of interstate commerce that he and Adams wanted to foster on a federal level, would make a stronger and more united America, commercially, geographically, and socially. Ultimately, Clay wanted transportation and commerce to bridge traditional sectional divides and create a thriving commercial nation that was united by common national investments. Moreover, the system was potentially a way to protect the country by building an infrastructure that could serve military needs, allowing troops to move quickly from one part of the country to another when necessary. Finally, the American System would protect infant American industries through a strong tariff that would allow them to develop and thus reduce American dependence on cheaper foreign imports.
In one of his last acts as speaker in 1824, Clay led an effort to increase the average tariff from 20 percent to 35 percent. The new higher tariff made him a hero to New England mill owners and their workers whose jobs it protected. It was also popular in commercial centers like Cincinnati, Ohio, and Clay’s hometown of Lexington, Kentucky, where new industries needed protection. But the improvements and tariffs
93
American System
The program of government subsidies to improve roads and canals and to foster economic growth and protect domestic manufacturers from foreign competition.
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 267
1
This stylized picture of Andrew Jackson speaking to a crowd begins to suggest the enormous popularity that the former war hero had as he connected with diverse audiences of voters in a way no leader since George Washington had done.
of the American System were not popular in other parts of the country. A high tariff raised the cost of everything southern cotton planters had to buy but did nothing to raise the price of their cotton in the market. They saw the tariff and the president’s antislavery opinions as a sign of a federal government that was working against their economic interests, and many in the South hardened their opposition to Adams, Clay, and the American System.
As the 1828 presidential campaign built steam, Adams and Clay continued their pitch for the costs and benefits of the American System. Jackson, however, had a more focused agenda: to replace Adams, the minority president, with the man who had rightfully won in 1824. Ironically, although Adams ardently wanted to avoid the “baneful weed of party strife,” it was during his term that new American political parties were born.
The Jackson Victory of 1828 and the Rebirth of Political Parties
Whig Party
Political party that began to take shape in support of the Adams-Clay American system and was first known as the National Republicans, but became the Whig Party in the 1830s in opposition to the Jacksonian Democrats.
From the day he left Washington, D.C., in 1825, Jackson was running to become president in 1828. He believed that he and his supporters had been cheated, and he meant to be vindicated. Nevertheless, it took time for the campaign to take shape. It is easier to understand the birth of political parties in retrospect than it was at the time. Many Americans were glad to see the old Federalist Party gone; at the same time, they hated to see the Democratic-Republicans splinter. At first, the two factions in Congress were described simply as “Adams men” and “Jackson men” After the midterm Congressional elections of 1826, the “Jackson men” controlled Congress. The “Adams men” then started to call themselves National Republicans, that is, Democratic-Republicans who supported the national administration led by President Adams. This group, led primarily by Henry Clay, would become the core of the new Whig Party, the party that advocated for a strong national government role in the economy, internal improvements such as roads and canals, and social reform movements in general. The “Jackson men” continued to call themselves Democratic-Republicans, emphasizing that they were the rightful winners of the last election and represented the democratic will of the people, which had been thwarted by Adams and Clay in the 1824
268 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
election. Soon, the Jacksonians dropped the “Republicans” in their name and were simply known as Democrats, forerunners of the Democratic Party that throughout the 1800s argued for the rights of the “common man” to be left alone by centralized government and economic interests.
Neither party was fully organized in the 1828 election and though each had newspapers that were strongly on their side, other hallmarks of national political parties like national nominating conventions came later. Nevertheless, from 1828 on, most Americans expected presidential elections to be hotly contested by two or more candidates representing their respective political parties and running on specific promises. The era of electing a few wise men to select the best president was over forever.
The prime architect of Jackson’s campaign and his political agenda, besides Jackson himself who delegated little, was Senator Martin Van Buren of New York. Van Buren was a strict constructionist of the Constitution who believed that the American System advocated by Adams and Clay violated the Constitution because it involved the federal government in many matters not specifically assigned to it by the Constitution. Although a New Yorker, Van Buren was closely allied with many in the South who liked Van Buren’s commitment to a small federal government because they feared that if the federal government could involve itself in shaping the nation’s economy, it could also interfere with slavery, a threat that terrified the slaveholding class.
The campaign of 1828 was as nasty as any in American history. Newspapers took on a larger role than ever before endorsing candidates and spreading slander about the opposition. The National Republicans reminded voters of Jackson’s temper and his many brawls and duels, which they said were unpresidential, as well as the times he may have exceeded his authority in attacking Indians or executing British subjects. In addition, they attacked his marriage to Rachel Jackson. More than 30 years earlier, the Jacksons had been married before Rachel’s divorce from her first husband was final, so she was thus guilty of bigamy. The attack on their marriage infuriated Jackson and deeply hurt Rachel. When she died shortly after the election, Jackson never forgave his adversaries.
The campaign organized by Jackson and Van Buren was equally nasty. They reminded voters of the supposed “corrupt bargain” that had put Adams in the White House and claimed—with no proof—that Adams, as ambassador to Russia, had procured young American women for the Czar’s pleasure. They portrayed Adams as cold and elitist and attacked his Unitarian beliefs as un-Christian compared with Jackson’s devout Presbyterian faith. For the Democrats, the campaign was not about the American System but a choice “Between J.Q. Adams, who can write, and Andy Jackson who can fight.” The fighter won easily.
The popular vote nearly tripled between 1824 and 1828, and 57.5 percent of all eligible voters actually voted. All but two states, Delaware and South Carolina, chose presidential electors by popular vote for slates pledged to one candidate or another in 1828. Campaigning had risen to new heights, and more voters believed that their votes counted. Political parties organized a new get-out-the-vote effort, which for the first time, included election materials such as buttons, mugs, posters, and slogans. In the end, Jackson won 647,286 votes—56 percent of the popular vote—and 178 electoral votes, and Adams won 508,064 popular votes and 83 electoral votes. (Four years earlier the popular vote had been 153,554 votes for Jackson to 108,740 votes for Adams.) ^ere was no need for the House of Representatives to be involved. A new style of electioneering had emerged.
Democratic Party
Political party that favored states'rights and a limited role for the federal government, especially in economic affairs.
93
Quick Review How did the nation evolve from the Era of Good Feelings to the partisanship of the mid to late 1820s? What were the most important factors in this transition?
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 269
CONCLUSION
Washington Irving’s story, Rip Van Winkle, published in 1819, tells the story of a man who awakens after a 20-year nap to find that everything in his village has completely changed. The story captures the transformation of the physical, commercial, and political landscapes of the United States and the corresponding changes in the lives of Americans during the first decades of independence—largely caused by the rapid growth of cotton production and technological innovation. Although it would have seemed unimaginable even a few years earlier, after 1815 distances seemed shorter, money and material goods more important, and politics omnipresent to many Americans, not just national leaders. Production of cotton and all the accompanying commerce it generated changed the lives of nearly all of the country’s residents and focused the attention of many Americans on productivity and hoped-for prosperity. Slavery expanded from the Atlantic coast as thousands of enslaved people were forced to move into the interior of the country where the black belt, stretching from Georgia through Alabama, Mississippi, and Louisiana, became the center of cotton production based on the backbreaking labor of slaves. At the same time, many white Americans, especially young women, who had been used to the rhythms of farm life, went to work in highly regimented mills, spinning cotton into cloth. Other Americans transported cotton between states and across the Atlantic Ocean at speeds their forbearers could not have imagined. The new prominence of public clocks with a hand that noted minutes in addition to the passage of hours reflected this shift. The demand for cotton and the labor-intensive process of its cultivation led to the explosion of slavery in the South, the growth of the textile industry in the North, and a revolution in industry and transportation.
New York City emerged as a transportation hub connecting the United States to the international cotton trade. The Erie Canal also secured New York’s place as a commercial center as it made transport between interior locations and coastal ports more efficient. Steamboats, canal boats, transatlantic packet ships, and stagecoaches traveled the routes in ever-faster circuits. Banks, some of the first and most important corporations in the young nation, played an essential role in the market economy. Corporate shareholders, a dramatically new development, deepened the stability of businesses and extended their ability to operate. However, the cotton market slumped in 1819, which caused an economic downturn and financial panic among Americans. Although the economy would eventually recover and thrive, the experience reflected a new and not fully understood national economy.
During Monroe’s administration, the Supreme Court, led by Chief Justice John Marshall, decided a series of cases that expanded the power of the federal government and limited that of the states, claiming a role for the Supreme Court in reviewing the constitutionality of acts of state legislatures, which would become important in the years to come. Despite general calm during the Era of Good Feelings of Monroe’s two-term administration, political tensions over the cotton economy, territorial expansion, and slavery exploded with surprising force in the 1820s. When Missouri applied to become a state in 1819, the divisions over slavery intensified, and although the Missouri Compromise was meant to resolve the differences, many agreed with the aging Thomas Jefferson that it was “a reprieve only.” The Era of Good Feelings gave way to divisive contests for the presidency in 1824—a victory for John Quincy Adams—and in 1828—a victory for Andrew Jackson—and the rebirth of political parties. Jackson’s political agenda reflected his concerns for the economic and political interests of a broad spectrum of white America that was growing in influence in the government, and he represented the symbolic voice of a new generation.
CHAPTER
REVIEW
How did the economic changes fostered by the growth of cotton production and the new national market economy in the United States affect national politics and governmental decisions? Why were economic and political trends so closely connected?
270 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Chapter 9 Chapter Review
9.1
CREATING THE COTTON ECONOMY______________________________
Explain the role of cotton in transforming the land and the lives of many diverse people of the United States.
Review Questions
1.	Chronological Reasoning
How did events and developments in the 1790s set the stage for the rapid expansion of cotton production in the United States in the early 1800s? What role did events taking place outside of the United States play in this process?
2.	Historical Interpretation
How did the expansion of cotton production shape the development of slavery in the United States? In what ways did it make life harder for enslaved African-Americans?
3.	Historical Interpretation
How did the expansion of cotton production shape the development of the commercial economy in the United States? What new opportunities and challenges did it create for northern workers?
COMMERCE, TECHNOLOGY, AND TRANSPORTATION
Analyze the technological and financial changes that led to the emergence of a new market economy in the United States.
Review Questions
4.	Historical Interpretation
How did the transportation revolution create new connections between Americans and alter old ones? How did it facilitate the movement and exchange of people, products, and ideas?
92
9.3
5.	Crafting Arguments
Defend or refute the following statement. “The emergence of the market economy in the early 1800s would not have been possible without significant government involvement.” What evidence can you provide to support your position?
6.	Comparison
What were the most important social, political, and economic differences between the United States in 1800 and the United States in 1820? How would you explain the changes you note?
FROM THE ERA OF GOOD FEELINGS TO THE POLITICS OF DIVISION______________________________________________
Explain the political developments in the United States during the 1820s, including the shift of power toward the South and West that resulted from the changing economic situation.
Review Questions
7.	Comparison
Why was the sectional divide over slavery deeper in 1820 than it had been in 1790?
8.	Historical Interpretation
How did Andrew Jackson’s unexpected popular success in the election of 1824 foreshadow broader changes in the nature of American politics? To whom did Jackson appeal? Why?
9.	Historical Interpretation
How did the economic policies of the Adams administration contribute to the emergence of new political parties? How was the growing sectional divide reflected in the new parties?
Chapter 9 New Industries, New Politics 271
CHAPTER OBJECTIVE
Demonstrate an understanding of the changing definitions of democracy in the Age of Jackson and what Jacksonian Democracy meant for different groups of Americans.
Politics dominated the thinking of many Americans in the Age of Jackson. This painting titled Stump Speaking captures the scene as a large group of white men gathered to hear a political speaker.
This illustration of the crowd at the White House after Jackson's inauguration captures the mood of the day, even though the artist was not present and created it based on stories told by others.
Significant Dates
10.1
LEARNING OBJECTIVES
JACKSONIAN DEMOCRACY, JACKSONIAN GOVERNMENT
Analyze Jackson's advocacy for Indian Removal, his opposition to the Bank of the United States, his support for a tariff, and the impact of these policies on other Americans.
DEMOCRATIZED RELIGION: THE SECOND GREAT AWAKENING___________________________
Analyze the diversity of American religious experience and how the freedom of the era gave rise to diverse religious expressions.
DEMOCRATIZED EDUCATION: THE BIRTH OF THE COMMON SCHOOL
Explain the development of public education as a result of, and in response to, the cultural currents of the 1820s and 1830s.
272 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a
Andrew Jackson’s inauguration as president in March 1829 was a somber affair for Jackson himself, who was still mourning his wife Rachel’s death the previous December. He did not make the traditional call on the outgoing president, blaming John Quincy Adams for attacks that he believed hastened Rachel’s death, and he did not attend his own inaugural ball. For his supporters, however, Jackson’s inauguration was a raucous celebration of democracy. When Jackson arrived at the White House, a festive crowd overran the place, stood on the furniture, broke china, and had to be lured outside with bowls of spiked punch. A Washington observer, Margaret Bayard Smith complained about what she saw as the rabble that inundated the White House, describing their behavior as “scrambling, fighting, romping.” Supreme Court Justice Joseph Story called it “the reign of King Mob.” But order was restored, and Jacksons agenda began to emerge.
Jackson cared about a few big issues, and these shaped his agenda as president. He did not worry much about how the issues were connected. During both of his campaigns for the presidency in 1824 and 1828, he had promised to acquire land for white settlement by forcing Indian tribes to move west of the Mississippi River. He also promised to undermine the Bank of the United States and the power of northern economic elites-
National Identity, 1800-1848
He was opposed to Henry Clay’s American System and wanted to keep taxes low and the role of the federal government modest. That said, Jackson understood power and was committed to expanding the power of the presidency itself. As he proceeded with his agenda, he was often challenged, and his response was to fight back with all the resources he could find.
The era during which Jackson led the country was known as the Age of Jackson. Jackson was the symbolic voice of a new generation and a specific class of American people. The first president born west of the Alleghenies, he was not connected to the Founding Fathers as all of his predecessors had been. He spoke for the economic and political interests of a broad spectrum of white America that was growing in influence in the government. Although it was not his doing, Jackson also presided over a nation in which the churches and the schools expanded and changed significantly.
JACKSONIAN DEMOCRACY, JACKSONIAN GOVERNMENT
Analyze Jackson's advocacy for Indian Removal, his opposition to the Bank of the United States, his support for a tariff, and the impact of these policies on other Americans.
Jackson knew what he wanted to accomplish as president. Before implementing any other policies, he planned a clean sweep of senior federal office holders, some of whom had served under several presidents. Jefferson’s successors—Madison, Monroe, and John Quincy Adams—had made few changes below the level of the Cabinet itself, partly because they were all from the same political party and partly because they did not see it as the president’s role to make wholesale personnel changes. In a significant change of practice, Jackson replaced many officials, and in the process, created the suspicion that there had been corruption without evidence for it. Jackson believed in what came to be called the “spoils system,” which was a patronage system in which a victorious political party rewards a candidates supporters with government jobs. Jackson used the term “rotation in office,” but his supporters believed to the victor belongs the spoils’’ Suddenly with Jackson in office, experienced officials, including 25 customs collectors and 423 postmasters, were fired from what had been a small, stable federal bureaucracy. Services deteriorated, and the quality of some federal services like the postal service did not recover until civil service reform took hold in the 1880s.
10.1
1826 Charles B. Finney leads religious revivals in western New York
1828	Tariff of Abominations;
Jackson defeats Adams for president
1829	Andrew Jackson inaugurated president
1830	Congress passes Indian Removal Act Nullification Crisis begins
Joseph Smith founds the Church of Jesus Christ of the Latter-Day Saints
1832	Jackson vetoes recharter of Second Bank of the United States
South Carolina legislature nullifies federal tariffs
Black Hawk's War in Illinois
1833	Congress passes compromise tariff Nullification debate ends
1835	Treaty of New Echota
Catharine Beecher publishes Essay on the Education of Female Teachers
1836	First McGuffey Reader published Second Creek War in Alabama
1837	Horace Mann elected Secretary of the Massachusetts Board of Education
1838	Ralph Waldo Emerson "Divinity School Address"
1838-1839 Trail ofTears
spoils system
A way of selecting people for government jobs based on the idea that "to the victor belongs the spoils."
10.2
10.3
Chapter 10 Democracyinthe Age of Andrew Jackson 273
nullification
A constitutional doctrine holding that a state has a legal right to declare a national law null and void within its borders.
Martin Van Buren, architect of Jackson’s 1828 campaign for president, became secretary of state. But Jackson’s other cabinet officers were less talented, and Jackson often ignored them. Instead, he surrounded himself with informal advisors who came to be known as his “Kitchen Cabinet,” longtime friends and advisors who worked closely with the president, particularly to accomplish removing Indians from wanted lands, revoking the charter for the Second Bank of the United States, and preserving the authority of the federal union against radical supporters of states rights. Jackson's Presidential Agenda
Jackson had several interlocking, but not entirely consistent, priorities. He distrusted government at all levels but had unbounded trust in his own ability to govern. He meant not only to be an activist president—John Quincy Adams and other presidents had also followed strong agendas—but also to make the presidency the center of the American government. He would not defer to Congress in ways that all of his predecessors had done. He vetoed more congressional bills than all of his predecessors combined and made it clear that Congress would have to reckon with him. As he had announced before the election, he was determined to force the Indians who lived in northern Georgia, Alabama, and Mississippi to move west to clear the land for white settlement. Although he supported a modified tariff, he meant to scale back the size of the federal government. He hated the Bank of the United States and was determined to destroy it. He saw its charter as an inappropriate use of federal authority and was convinced, probably rightly, that the bank had contributed to Adams’s campaign. And perhaps most of all, Jackson was determined to preserve the Union at a time when southern leaders were insisting that each state had the right of nullification, the right to declare that specific federal legislation was null and void within its borders. Jackson was a slaveholder and a defender of slavery, but if slaveholders threatened national unity, they would have to deal with him.
In his two terms as president, Jackson realized most of his goals, despite fierce opposition. He established permanent precedents for presidential authority. He was a hero to some and an evil genius to others. For most historians, he remains one of the most complex American leaders, expanding the roles of poor and working-class whites in the political process and of the presidency in American life, while reducing the rights of Indians, slaves, federal employees, bankers, and indeed anyone who disagreed with him.
Five Civilized Tribes
The Cherokees, Chickasaws, Choctaws, Creeks, and Seminoles, who had established treaty agreements with the United States in the late 1700s or early 1800s, lived in peace with their neighbors and adopted more of the ways of the whites than most Native Americans.
The Indian Removal Act, the Trail of Tears, and the Settlement of Oklahoma
For some white Americans, “Indian Removal”—Jacksons policy of forcing the Cherokee Nation and other tribes to move to reservations in distant Oklahoma, or Indian Territory as it was called, was a great achievement. For the tribes caught in Jacksons web, the policy led to war within the tribes, terrible losses, resistance, resignation, and reinvention. Their white supporters, though passionate, were ineffective against Jackson.
Known as the Five Civilized Tribes, the Cherokees, Chickasaws, Choctaws, Creeks, and Seminoles had for generations lived in the region known as the Old Southwest—Georgia, Alabama, Mississippi—as well as in Arkansas, and Florida. These tribes had traded and fought with Spanish, French, and English settlers and had sold or ceded much of their land, but based on treaties with the U.S. government, they still owned huge tracts of land in the heart of the cotton-growing South.
Far more than the Indians of the Northwest or the West, the Five Civilized Tribes had adopted many white ways and customs, intermarried with whites, and created a unique culture based on farming and trade. Of the five tribes, the Cherokee Nation had the most sophisticated political, economic, and cultural institutions. Stretching over northwest Georgia, Alabama, Tennessee, and North Carolina,
274 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
the Cherokees expected to be treated as a sovereign country. The Cherokees, who had supported the British during the Revolution, had signed a treaty with the new United States government in 1785 and never again waged war against the United States. They supported Jackson in his battle with the Creeks and lived at peace with their neighbors, but that did them little good once Jackson determined his course of action.
After making peace with the United States in the 1780s, the Cherokees took well to the European-style of communication and farming. In 1821, a Cherokee warrior, Sequoyah, intrigued by what he called the “markings” of written English, invented an 86-character alphabet that represented the syllables of spoken Cherokee. The new alphabet caught on quickly, not only in handwritten form but also in typeface for printing. The Cherokee Phoenix, published in both English and Cherokee, became an important means of communication. Sequoyah, who never learned English, created a similar alphabet for the Choctaw language. His achievement to invent a written language while being illiterate in all languages had never before been done. In addition, the Cherokees set up a large and effective trading network with other tribes and the white community. In 1827, they adopted a written constitution for the Cherokee Republic.
Beginning in the 1790s, Christian missionaries came to live among the Cherokees. The Cherokees welcomed them, though most never became Christians. Using Sequoyah’s alphabet, the missionaries translated the Bible into Cherokee and later became some of the most heroic defenders of Cherokee rights.
Cherokees also cultivated cotton as their white neighbors did, and some owned African slaves. An 1825 census counted 13,563 Cherokees, 220 whites (some of whom were married to Cherokees), and 1,277 African slaves in the Cherokee Republic. Of all the American Indian tribes, the Cherokees were the model of assimilation that presidents from Washington to Jefferson claimed to want. But white settlers and President Jackson decided to ignore the assimilation. They wanted the land.
Georgia took the lead in seizing Indian land. In 1824, Governor George Troup announced that he was ending treaty rights for the Cherokee and Creek tribes. When President John Quincy Adams opposed him, citing the tribes’ treaties with the U.S. government, Troup and his successor, John Forsyth, campaigned for Jackson in 1828. In December 1828, the Georgia legislature declared that, starting in June 1830, Georgia state laws would extend to all parts of the Cherokee Republic despite federal treaty agreements to the contrary. White Georgians then began moving onto Cherokee lands, and Jackson withdrew U.S. troops that had been protecting the Cherokees.
It was in this context that Jackson addressed Congress, advocating an Indian Removal Act to “protect” the Cherokees from Georgia laws. The president gave the tribes what seemed like a choice: “voluntarily” move west to new lands where their independence would be honored or choose to stay where they were. But if they chose to stay, they would be subject to the laws of Georgia, laws that said Indians could not vote, own property, testify against a white person in court, or obtain credit. It was not much of a choice, as Jackson himself said in private.
The land that the government offered the tribes was completely unfamiliar to the tribes of the Old Southwest. Most people thought of it as simply a desert where farming would be impossible. Indian Territory, which eventually became the state of Oklahoma, was a portion of the Louisiana Purchase just north of Texas. The land was not empty, though the government tended to treat it that way. Some of the plains tribes—the Wichitas, Kiowas, Kiowa Apaches, and especially Osages—had lived there for generations. Some tribes from the Ohio-Illinois area—Shawnees, Delawares (Lenapes), Miamis, Kickapoos, Sacs, and Fox—had been relocated to that territory after defeats by the U.S. Army. In addition, there were a few white settlers and some slaves and former slaves seeking refuge in the region. Nevertheless, under Jackson’s plan, the government was now offering the territory to the Cherokees and others of the Five Civilized Tribes (see Map 10-1).
While Cherokee, Creek, Chickasaw, Choctaw, and Seminole leaders had long feared just such a move and had been protesting against it, many whites now rallied to their side. In Congress and the national press, Indian Removal became a major fight.
Chapter 10
Sequoyah was intrigued with the way reading seemed to give whites power. He created an alphabet for the Cherokee language and, later, a similar one for the Choctaw language.
Indian Removal Act
Legislation passed by Congress in 1830 which provided funds for removing and resettling eastern Indians in the West. It granted the president the authority to use force if necessary and resulted in the involuntary transfer of thousands of Native Americans to new homes in Oklahoma.
Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 275
10*1
Land granted to Indians west of the Mississippi River Date and route of removal
MAP 10-1 Indian Removal. While Indian Removal began with the forced relocation of the Sac and Fox tribes from Illinois and Iowa, by far the largest relocation of tribes took place when the five Indian nations who were living in large territories in Georgia, Alabama, Florida, and Mississippi were forced far to the west to the newly created Indian Territory.
Catharine Beecher, a reformer associated with many causes, organized women across the Northwest to defend Indian rights and flooded Congress with petitions. Missionaries campaigned against the bill so vigorously that Georgia sentenced two of them to prison at hard labor for refusing to abandon the Indians.
In the Senate, Theodore Frelinghuysen of New Jersey, long a supporter of Protestant missionaries and reform efforts, led the opposition to the Indian Removal Bill. Frelinghuysen insisted that the government was bound by its treaties and that, if need be, should use the U.S. Army to force Georgia to retract its claims to the Indian lands. Henry Clay, who had not previously spoken in favor of Indian rights, joined the antiremoval forces. In the end, the removal bill passed the Senate 28 to 19, but passed the House by only a 102-98 vote. Among those voting no was Congressman Davy Crockett of Tennessee, who called the bill “oppression with a vengeance.” But Jackson signed the law May 28, 1830, making half a century of treaties void. The tribes would have to move. While all of the tribes resisted, negotiated, and ultimately had to surrender, the Cherokees went to U.S. courts to assert their claims to their lands. Initially,
276 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
10.1
American Voices
Perspectives on Indian Removal, 1818-1829
10 J
mericans responded differently to President Andrew Jackson's plan to remove American Indians from the Old Southwest to reservations west of the Mississippi. Most whites in Georgia and many elsewhere applauded. In the north, many opposed Indian Removal, and Catharine Beecher organized a petition campaign in which women petitioned Congress to stop what
they saw as an immoral process. Not surprisingly, most Cherokees, t like the other tribes involved, also opposed removal. Writing a S decade before Jackson's speech, Cherokee women demanded that [ the tribal elders not cede land to the United States. The following I three documents represent three different American voices.
Andrew Jackson, Message to Congress, December8,1829	Statements of Residents of Steubenville Ohio, February 15,1830	Cherokee Women's Petition, June 30,1818
The condition and ulterior destiny of the Indian tribes within the limits of some of our States have become objects of much interest and importance. It has long been the policy of Government to introduce among them the arts of civilization, in the hope of gradually reclaiming them from a wandering life. This policy has, however, been coupled with another wholly incompatible with its success. Professing a desire to civilize and settle them, we have at the same time lost no opportunity to purchase their lands and thrust them farther into the wilderness. By this means they have not only been kept in a wandering state, but been led to look upon us as unjust and indifferent to their fate... Our ancestors found them the uncontrolled possessors of these vast regions. By persuasion and force they have been made to retire from river to river and from mountain to mountain, until some of the tribes have become extinct and others have left but remnants to preserve for awhile their once terrible names.... Humanity and national honor demand that every effort should be made to avert so great a calamity.... As a means of effecting this end 1 suggest for your consideration the propriety of setting apart an ample district west of the Mississippi, and without the limits of any State or Territory now formed, to be guaranteed to the Indian tribes as long as they shall occupy it, each tribe having a distinct control over the portion designated for its use. There they may be secured in the enjoyment of governments of their own choice, subject to no other control from the United States than such as may be necessary to preserve peace on the frontier and between the several tribes....	THAT your memorialists are deeply impressed with the belief that the present crisis in the affairs of the Indian nations, calls loudly on all who can feel for the woes of humanity.. ..It is readily acknowledged, that the wise and venerated founders of our country's free institutions, have committed the powers of government to those whom nature and reason declare the best fitted to exercise them; and your memorialists would sincerely deprecate any presumptuous interference on the part of their own sex, with the ordinary political affairs of the country, as wholly unbecoming the character of American Females.... yet all admit that there are times when duty and affection call on us to advise and persuade, as well as to cheer or to console. And if we approach the public representatives of our husbands and brothers, only in the humble character of suppliants in the cause of mercy and humanity, may we not hope that even the small voice of female sympathy will be heard?... In despite of the undoubted natural right, which the Indians have, to the land of their forefathers, and in the face of solemn treaties, pledging the faith of the nation for their secure possession of those lands, it is intended, we are told, to force them from their native soil, and to compel them to seek new homes in a distant and dreary wilderness. To you then, as the constitutional protectors of the Indians within our territory and as the peculiar guardians of our national character, and our country's welfare, we solemnly and earnestly appeal to save this remnant of a much injured people from annihilation, to shield our country from the curses denounced on the cruel and ungrateful, and to shelter the American character from lasting dishonor.	We have called a meeting among ourselves to consult on the different points now before the council, relating to our national affairs. We have heard with painful feelings that the bounds of the land we now possess are to be drawn into very narrow limits. The land was given to us by the Great Spirit above as our common right, to raise our children upon, & to make support for our rising generations. We therefore humbly petition our beloved children, the head men & warriors, to hold out to the last in support of our common right, as the Cherokee nation have been the first settlers of this land; we therefore claim the right to the soil. We well remember that our country was formerly very extensive, but by repeated sales it has become circumscribed to the very narrow limits we have at present. Our Father the President advised us to become farmers, to manufacture our own clothes, & to have our children instructed. To this advice we have attended in everything as far as we were able. Now the thought of being compelled to remove [to] the other side of the Mississippi is dreadful to us, because it appears to us that we, by this removal, shall be brought to a savage state again, for we have, by the endeavor of our Father the President, become too much enlightened to throw aside the privileges of a civilized life. We therefore unanimously join in our meeting to hold our country in common as hitherto. Some of our children have become Christians. We have missionary schools among us. We have h[e]ard the gospel in our nation. We have become civilized & enlightened, & are in hopes that in a few years our nation will be prepared for instruction in other branches of sciences & arts, which are both useful & necessary in civilized society....
Sources: Andrew Jackson, Annual Message to Congress, December 8,1829, Messages and Papers of the Presidents, ed. J. D. Richardson, National Archives and Records Administration, (1896), II, 456-459 (Dec. 8,1829); Ladies of Steubenville, Ohio, Petition Against Indian removal (February 15,1830), Ellen Skinner, Women and the National Experience: Sources in Women's History, third edition (Boston: Prentice-Hall, 1996), pp.42-143; "Petition of Nancy Ward and Other Cherokee Women to the United States Congress, 19\818," in Karen L. Kilcup, editor, Native American Women's Writings, 1800-1924: An Anthology (Malden, MA: Blackwell, 2000), pp. 29-30.
(continued)
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 277
y

r b
10.1
10 J
103
(continued)
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
How did Jackson attempt to argue that Indian Removal was in the Indians' best interest? How might opponents of Indian Removal have responded to his position?
2.	Contextualization
How might the fact that two petitions in opposition to Indian Removal were written by women have affected their
reception? How might it have helped the authors'cause? How might it have hurt?
3. Contextualization
The Cherokee women say that they hope that, soon, their people "will be prepared for instruction in other branches of sciences & arts, which are both useful & necessary in civilized society." What does this statement mean? What do you think is the strongest reason they give for asking not to be moved west?
they won. In Cherokee Nation v. Georgia (1831) and Worcester v. Georgia (1832), the U.S. Supreme Court, under Chief Justice John Marshall, ruled that the Cherokees were a “domestic dependent nation” and could not be forced by the state of Georgia to give up land that treaty rights agreed to by the United States government had given them. Jackson simply ignored the court. Jackson is supposed to have said, “John Marshall has made his decision, now let him enforce it.” No one actually heard Jackson say that, but Jackson controlled the army and he was not about to enforce the court’s decision. No other president before or after ignored the Supreme Court in that way.
The Indian Removal Act and the implementation that followed was a disaster for the Five Civilized Tribes. The government had seized their homes and offered in return land that was thousands of miles away and completely foreign to them. Moreover the tribes were divided about how to respond. While most of the country was focused on the Cherokees, Jackson sent Secretary of War John Eaton to negotiate with the Choctaws. By excluding those he considered troublemakers and bribing others, Eaton got a small group of Choctaw leaders to agree for the tribe to leave its homes in Mississippi, but most in the tribe considered those who negotiated the removal treaty to be nonrepresentative and refused to abide by it. The federal troops enforced it anyway.
The French observer Alexis de Tocqueville, who became famous for his analysis of American life in the Jacksonian era, described the day the Choctaws crossed the Mississippi River on their way west:
At the end of 1831,1 stood on the left bank of the Mississippi... .It was then the depths of winter and the cold was exceptionally severe.. .the snow had frozen hard on the ground; the river was drifting with huge ice-floes. The Indians had brought their families with them and hauled along the wounded, the sick, newborn babies, and old men on the verge of death. They had neither tents nor wagons....I saw them embark to cross the wide river and that solemn spectacle will never be erased from my memory. Not a sob or complaint could be heard... they stood silent. Their afflictions were of long standing and they considered them beyond remedy. Already the Indians had all embarked upon the boat which was to carry them; their dogs still remained upon the bank. When these animals finally saw they were being left behind forever, they raised all together a terrible howl and plunged into the icy Mississippi to swim after their masters.
Within the decade most members of the Cherokee, Chickasaw, Creek tribes had made the same crossing. Only the Seminoles avoided their fate.
Alabama and Mississippi followed Georgia’s lead and voted to end tribal rights for the Creeks. In March 1832, the Creeks surrendered all land east of the Mississippi, and most of them moved to Oklahoma. Those that took advantage of a promise that they could stay in the East as private citizens soon lost their lands. Some of the remain-ing Creeks began violent resistance to state and federal authorities, but the so-called Second Creek War of 1836-37 ended quickly when Jackson’s secretary of war ordered federal troops to expel all Creeks from lands east of the Mississippi. The Creeks who
'8 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
10,1
were deported after the Second Creek War suffered higher mortality rates than the Cherokees; perhaps half lived to see Oklahoma.
Among the Cherokees, a civil conflict broke out about how to respond to the demand that they move to Oklahoma. Principal Chief John Ross and most of the Cherokees were determined to fight for their lands. A minority, some of whom were among the rising middle class and slave holders within the tribe, decided that a compromise was better than forced expulsion. John Ridge and Elias Boudinot, publisher of the Cherokee Phoenix, signed the Treaty of New Echota in December 1835, trading land in Georgia for new land in Oklahoma and $5 million. The U.S. Senate barely ratified the treaty after Daniel Webster and Henry Clay pointed out how fraudulent it was since the majority of the Cherokees opposed it.
After Ridge and Boudinot and their followers departed for Oklahoma, or Indian Territory as it was called, the U.S. Army put most of the remaining members of the tribe in detention camps. A few were able to flee into the wilderness and remained in their homelands but without their land. Others fought, but in the end, Chief Ross and General Winfield Scott negotiated a settlement to avoid further bloodshed. Even though Jackson had left office by then, his successor, Martin Van Buren was determined to enforce his predecessor’s policy. From the detention camps, soldiers forced 12,000 Cherokee men, women, and children to march west in the fall and winter of 1838-39. It was an especially cold winter and a terrible time to make a march of over a thousand miles into the unknown. The Cherokees never had enough food, blankets, or warm clothing, and as they moved in large groups, disease and exposure took a terrible toll. On what became known as the Trail of Tears, perhaps a quarter to a third of the marchers, including Ross’s wife, died before they reached Oklahoma.
Seeing what was happening to other tribes, the Chickasaws moved west quickly on their own. The Seminoles of Florida Territory had no intention of moving, however. Although a minority of Seminoles agreed to move, most stayed in Florida, disappearing into the swamps and hiding places they knew well. When soldiers tried to force them to move, the Seminoles annihilated them. The Second Seminole War was not resolved until 1842. Fewer Seminoles than members of any other tribe ever moved to Oklahoma.
102
103
Trail of Tears
The forced march in 1838 of the Cherokee Indians from their homelands in Georgia to the Indian Territory in the West; thousands of Cherokees died along the way.
Cherokee men, women, and children, and their U.S. Army guards, rode or walked on the long march from their ancestral homes across a thousand miles to new territory in Oklahoma.
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 279
10.1
10 J
10 J
In the meantime, the Sac and Fox tribes, which had already been exiled to the Indian Territory as a result of earlier removals from the Old Northwest, were not too happy about life there. In April 1832, a chief named Black Hawk led 1,000-2,000 Sac and Fox people back east across the Mississippi, closer to their old homelands. The Sac and Fox Indians were moving mostly to escape from hostile Sioux groups on the Great Plains and Iowa Territory. The Illinois governor took the tribes move into Illinois as an attack, called out the militia, and asked for federal troops. In Black Hawk s War, federal and state troops on the east side of the Mississippi and Sioux warriors on the west virtually annihilated the Fox and Sac tribes, to the delight of whites who were happy to see these tribes completely out of their way.
In fact, Jackson had meant to use the removal law for Georgia to force all Indians east of the Mississippi out of their lands. When the forced exile finally reached its goal by the end of the 1830s, only the Iroquois in New York, a few Cherokees in North Carolina, and scattered small communities remained legally east of the Mississippi, although others like the Seminoles simply melted into the woods and could not be found by the government. All in all, 46,000 Indians were forcibly removed during the Jackson administration, and subsequent administrations removed as many more.
The Cherokees and other tribes tend to disappear from the history books after the Trail of Tears. But the Cherokees, Choctaws, and Creeks were resilient people. Forced onto an inhospitable and alien land, they sought to reestablish their communities and culture. To a surprising degree, they succeeded. As the last Cherokees arrived in Indian Territory in 1839, the tribe adopted a new Constitution and established Tahlequah as their capital. In 1844, they began publishing the Cherokee Advocate in both English and Cherokee. They also set up a school system with elementary schools as well as higher education institutes and seminaries to prepare teachers—European and Cherokee—for their schools. In the U.S. Civil War, parts of the tribe favored each side, and the divided tribe fought internally. But again they rebuilt after the war. Today, there are some 200,000 to 300,000 Cherokees, of whom 70,000 live within the Cherokee Nation in northeast Oklahoma and the rest are scattered around the country, making them the largest federally recognized tribe today.
Jacksonian Economics—The War on the Bank of the United States
The Second Bank of the United States
A national bank chartered by Congress in 1816 with extensive regulatory powers over currency and credit.
In his campaign for president, Jackson pledged to do something about the Bank of the United States, which he and many others blamed for the Panic of 1819 and saw as an elitist threat to a democracy. The Second Bank of the United States was patterned on the first Bank of the United States that had been a cornerstone of Alexander Hamilton’s economic plans for the new nation (see Chapter 7). The first bank had been chartered in 1791 for a period of 20 years. In 1811, the Jeffersonian Republicans refused to extend its charter and it closed. Henceforth, it seemed, state banks would issue currency in the form of banknotes backed by gold or silver, federal funds would be deposited in state banks, and the federal government, like everyone else, would borrow money from these banks when needed. Then came the War of 1812.
As the War of 1812 threatened to bankrupt the country, some of the nation’s richest men, led by John Jacob Astor, met with Treasury Secretary Albert Gallatin and offered to loan the nation the funds it needed if the Bank of the United States were rechartered. They believed that only a national bank could build long-term prosperity and ensure that their loan would be repaid. As a result, a charter for a Second Bank of the United States passed Congress in 1816. The Madison, Monroe, and John Quincy Adams administrations were strong advocates for a unified national market economy that could foster prosperity and stability, and they had used the bank to support that economy. Jackson wanted prosperity, but he disagreed about the government’s role in the nation’s economy.
The Second Bank of the United States was never without enemies. The Constitution never mentioned a bank, and strict constructionists—who thought the government
2i
Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
10.1
should limit its role to things specifically included in the Constitution—always opposed it. The bank was also seen by many as a way to expand the power of the commercial elite based in New York and Philadelphia and, thus, was seen as an enemy by farmers whether they lived on small out-of-the-way farms in the still very rural country or on the bourgeoning plantations of the cotton-growing South. In the opinion of many farmers, whether small or large scale, Jackson was the defender of their interests against threatening commercial elites. Particularly since the Supreme Court’s ruling on McCulloch v. Maryland that Congress had the right to charter a bank if it thought it was in the national interest, popular support for the Bank had weakened (see Chapter 9). Many farmers did not believe “the national interest” that Congress saw was in their interests.
During his first months in office, Jackson did not say a lot about the bank, but in December 1829, he told Congress: “Both the constitutionality and the expediency of the law creating this bank are well questioned.... [I] t has failed in the great end of establishing a uniform and sound currency.” In spite of Jackson’s challenge, the bank’s charter ensured that it could continue for 7 more years, but Jackson had fired a warning shot. Before long, he would do much more.
Many of Jackson’s strongest supporters disagreed with him about the bank. The country was prospering, credit was solid, and the soundness of the currency, despite Jackson’s words, seemed secure. The federal bank’s policies of calling in loans may have helped start the Panic of 1819, but Nicholas Biddle, the bank’s president, had done as much as anyone in the country to end the hard times after the Panic of 1819. Nevertheless Jackson was a populist, intending to represent the common people politically. And although the nation’s elite supported the bank, many citizens did not like any banks. In a meeting at the White House he told Biddle, “I do not dislike your bank any more than all banks,” but the federal bank was the only one Jackson could do something about. His attack on the bank was as emotional as it was calculated.
For the next few years, Biddle led the bank in continued efforts to stabilize the currency, help state banks through difficult times, and expand the nation’s credit, something that both northern mill owners and western land promoters liked. The bank also concentrated wealth and power within the economy in the hands of a commercial elite and strengthened the nation’s unified market economy based on currency and trade. That uneven concentration of wealth and power was something Jackson would not forgive.
In 1832, Jackson launched his campaign for reelection. For the first time, something resembling modern political parties played a role. Under Jackson’s leadership, the Democratic-Republicans had become simply the Democrats. They easily nominated Jackson for a second term and his handpicked running mate, Secretary of State Martin Van Buren, for vice president. The opposition to Jackson, sometimes known as the National Republicans because they had supported a strong national government, now became known simply as the Whig Party. They nominated Henry Clay for president and John Sergeant of Pennsylvania as vice president. Unlike the Jacksonian Democrats, the Whig Party was committed to Alexander Hamilton’s vision of a federal government that took an active role in shaping the economy, so they strongly supported the Second Bank of the United States. The Whig nominee, Henry Clay, urged Biddle to secure the bank’s future as well as that of the pro-bank Whig Party. If Biddle were to request an extension of the bank’s charter, even though the original charter would not expire for 4 years, Clay would promise to make the bank an issue in the campaign. Either Biddle would win the recharter fight immediately, or he would provide Clay a weapon with which to attack Jackson. Biddle, who was astute at counting votes in Congress, took Clay’s advice and applied for a new charter. The charter bill passed both houses of Congress easily. But Jackson vetoed it. He told Martin Van Buren, who was now his running mate, “The bank, Mr. Van Buren, is trying to kill me, but I will kill it.”
102
103
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 281
By the time Jackson became president, political cartoons were becoming popular, including this one that shows Jackson using his order to withdraw government funds to topple the pillars of the bank as Nicholas Biddle, the bank's "devil president, and investors run.
In November 1832, Jackson defeated Clay 219 electoral votes to 49. Congress refused to override the presidents veto.
Biddle still tried to rally support in Congress. He made arguments, offered congressmen loans, and ensured that the banks lead attorney was elected to Congress from Philadelphia. When Massachusetts Senator Daniel Webster complained that his annual retainer from the bank had not been “refreshed as usual,” Biddle promised quick action. Biddle also loosened credit across the country, ensuring short-term prosperity but provoking an eventual reckoning. He was desperate to save his bank.
Jackson then made his move. He ordered his treasury secretary to remove federal deposits from the bank and place them in 23 state banks that he selected—banks that were quickly called Jacksons “pet” banks by his opponents. The move was meant to destroy the Second Bank of the United States. But the law said that federal funds could be withdrawn only if there was clear evidence that the deposits were not secure. Even Jacksons handpicked auditors could find no such evidence. When Treasury Secretary McLane refused the presidents order to move the funds, Jackson promoted him to secretary of state. When another treasury secretary also refused, Jackson fired him.
Finally, Jackson’s third treasury secretary, Roger B. Taney, who also had doubts about the legality of removing federal funds, hit on a compromise. He would not actually remove federal deposits from the bank, but he would do something just as effective to undermine the bank. Going forward, Taney regularly paid the government’s bills with funds from the accounts that the government had in the Bank of the United States, but he stopped depositing new federal revenue in the bank. Instead, the government’s income went to the state banks. It was a mortal blow. The federal government’s accounts slowly shrunk to zero and the Second Bank of the United States was dead, though it took a few years to die.
Led by Clay, the Senate censured the president, saying he had “assumed upon himself authority and power not conferred by the Constitution and laws.” But the censure did not hurt Jackson or save the bank. Biddle’s politically motivated loans and payments sapped support for the bank. The Second Bank of the United States became a wholly private bank and soon went bankrupt. The combination of inflation caused by Biddle’s too-easy credit and the loss of a national bank that could stabilize the currency caused financial distress. By 1837—just after Jackson left office—the nation experienced another financial panic, and there was no national entity to help stabilize the economy. Nevertheless, efforts to revive the bank failed. For decades, all of the paper currency in circulation would be issued by state banks, some of less than solid credit. Only in 1863, during the Civil War, did the U.S. government again issue paper money, and not until the creation of the Federal Reserve Bank in 1913 did the nation again have a central bank to regulate the economy.
The Tariff, the Union, and the Nullification Crisis
The battle over the tariff began as a modest disagreement over federal tax policy. Before it ended, that battle was the greatest constitutional crisis the nation faced between the adoption of the Constitution in 1789 and the Civil War in 1861. To a degree, it was a personal battle between two proud and stubborn men, Andrew Jackson and John C. Calhoun. In another sense it was a battle about the fundamental nature of the U.S. government.
ANDREW JACKSON VS. JOHN C. CALHOUN
John C. Calhoun of South Carolina had been elected vice president when John Quincy Adams won the presidency in 1824, irt IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
10.1
and he was reelected to that office in 1828 to serve with Jackson. Because separate ballots were cast for presidential and vice presidential candidates after the passage of the Twelfth Amendment in 1804 and before the rise of party nominating conventions in 1832, no one thought it strange that two leaders as hostile to each other as Adams and Jackson would have the same vice president. As a congressman and as secretary of war under President James Monroe, Calhoun had been a nationalist who favored internal improvements as much as Henry Clay or John Quincy Adams. He sought a strong national government and had supported the Bank of the United States. Although his views differed from Jacksons on some issues, everyone expected Calhoun and Jackson, as proslavery southerners, to have a close partnership. It was not to be.
One of the first wedges between them was purely social. Jacksons Secretary of War John Eaton had married the recently widowed Margaret O’Neale Timberlake, but rumors swirled that she was a widow only because her first husband, a naval officer, had committed suicide when he learned of her long adulterous relationship with Eaton. Jackson, who had been deeply hurt by attacks on his own marriage, defended the Eatons. Others in Washington, led by Mrs. Calhoun, snubbed Peggy Eaton. When Emily Donelson, Jacksons official White House hostess, joined with Mrs. Calhoun, Jackson temporarily banished her from the White House. He never forgave the Calhouns.
Another reason for the growing split between Jackson and Calhoun centered on the fact that Calhoun’s political beliefs were changing. By 1828, Calhoun, who had previously advocated for a strong federal role in the life of the nation—far stronger than anything Jackson ever advocated—was becoming the nation’s strongest defender of states’ rights against federal authority. This new stance may have reflected an honest change of heart, but it also served a political purpose. Regardless, it guaranteed a clash with Jackson since no matter how much Jackson might have favored states’ rights in the past, he would not tolerate any challenge to his authority as president.
Many of the leaders in South Carolina, Calhoun’s home state, were becoming very fearful of the federal government, and South Carolina was developing the strongest anti-federal stance in the Union. The South Carolina Radicals, as they were called, dominated state government. They advocated the right of states to declare any federal law null and void or even to secede from the Union. The reason was clear: South Carolinians feared for the future of slavery more than people in any other state. Most residents of South Carolina—54 percent—were enslaved people of African descent. In some rice-growing regions of the state, that figure was closer to 90 percent. A wealthy but deeply fearful white elite governed these slaves and depended on their labor to generate continuing wealth. In 1827, a pamphlet called The Crisis; or, Essays on the Usurpations of the Federal Government argued that federal tariffs, internal improvements, and other federal activities were all means to enable the national government, if it chose, to abolish slavery. As word spread that Parliament was about to abolish slavery throughout the British Empire in the 1830s, the fear grew that Congress might try to do the same. Calhoun had to decide whether he was with his state’s planter elite or against them. He might have dreamed about becoming president someday, but in the meantime, he would have to win elections in South Carolina. He made his choice.
NULLIFICATION AND THE FUTURE OF THE REPUBLIC
In 1828, Calhoun wrote a pamphlet arguing that a state could declare a tariff or any other federal law null and void. Calhoun claimed that since state-by-state conventions had ratified the Constitution, state conventions, not the Supreme Court, had the authority to decide what was constitutional. In his view, once a state convention declared a federal law void, other states would have to weigh in, and only a new amendment to the Constitution could force the law on the dissenting state. Calhoun did not advocate secession as many of the South Carolina Radicals did. Instead, he hoped nullification in response to a tariff or to restrictions on slavery would make secession unnecessary. He was thus more moderate than many South Carolinians, but that moderation would not continue to be the case. J 10.2
I
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 283
L
10.1
io j j
10.? 5
Tariff of Abominations
A revised federal tariff (or tax on imports) that lowered the tax on cotton products but raised it on many of the products made in the mid-Atlantic states.
The tariff, not the issue of slavery, brought the issue of nullification to the fore. The tariff, or tax on imported goods, had been the major source of financial support since the Washington administration, and it had been an issue in the 1828 election in which Jackson defeated Adams. As Jacksons supporters prepared for that election, Jackson’s chief advisor Martin Van Buren realized that, even though he and Jackson opposed a high tariff—in part, because they thought the federal government needed less money and, in part, because the tax raised the cost of foreign-made consumer products in the United States—the Adams-Clay tariff was popular in many parts of the country because it protected local industries from foreign competition and because many people liked the internal improvements like roads and canals that the tariff helped finance. Adams and Clay might want to fight the 1828 election on the issue of tariffs, but Van Buren did not. When the Adams administration suggested a new tariff, Van Buren and his congressional allies decided to reshape it rather than oppose it. They knew they could not win New England in the next election, so they did not hesitate to modify the proposed tariff by reducing the protection for the cotton produced by New England mill owners, thus allowing foreign-made cotton to be sold more cheaply than might otherwise have been the case. They also raised tariffs to protect export of products like molasses, hemp, iron, and wool, which were produced in the mid-Atlantic states, especially in Pennsylvania, to woo voters there by protecting their industries and jobs from foreign competition. The result was a tariff that raised the price of products that many Americans bought from foreign sources and that angered the cotton mill owners who originally wanted the tariff but now saw the protection of their industry disappear. The new tariff also infuriated rural interests, especially southern plantation owners, who saw the cost of everything they needed go up while no protection was provided to the price of the goods they produced and sold on the international market. The 1828 tariff came to be known as the Tariff of Abominations because it was so uneven and obviously unfair in the industries and regions it protected, but it passed Congress and set the stage for a confusing presidential campaign and the crisis that followed.
Planters in South Carolina saw the tariff as a terrible hardship and an unfair use of federal power. To a degree, they were right. A tax on imports raised the cost of virtually everything the planters needed. Planters claimed that 40 out of every 100 bales of cotton they produced went to pay the tariff. This claim was an exaggeration, but the tariff may have raised the cost of living in South Carolina by 20 percent. In addition, planters worried that a tariff on imported goods might cause other nations to purchase less cotton either in retaliation or because, with Americans buying less from abroad, other nations might not have had the funds to purchase American grown cotton. With their state’s economy hurting, public opinion in South Carolina supported nullification of the tariff.
The issue of states’ rights versus the rights of the federal government was argued on the floor of the U.S. Senate in January 1830. It was a debate that would be remembered for generations. South Carolina Senator Robert Y. Hayne, a protege of Calhoun’s, claimed that the federal government was making the North the winner and the South the loser and that the pro-Northern policy has invaded the State of South Carolina, is making war upon her citizens, and endeavoring to overthrow her principles and institutions.” Everyone understood that Hayne was talking about the tariff but also the issue of slavery. He was determined to defend the right of South Carolina to nullify federal law and, if still dissatisfied, to secede from the Union if Congress ever made a move against slavery. Massachusetts Senator Daniel Webster’s “Second Reply to Hayne” staked out a different position. Webster pleaded for a strong federal union that no state should be allowed to undermine. His closing line, “Liberty and Union, now and forever, one and inseparable” became part of American lore. Hayne congratulated Webster on winning the war of words, though Hayne never changed his mind.
14 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
In January 1830 as tensions were building over the right claimed by South Carolina to nullify federal law, Massachusetts Senator Daniel Webster-shown here—defended the priority of the federal government and the cause of the national union.
At first, people wondered how the president would respond to the debate. Jackson had campaigned for reducing the federal role in people’s lives, but he did not like to be crossed. He was not elected to see the government over which he presided pushed aside. As a military man, he would not countenance mutiny. As a politician, he despised Calhoun s self-serving strategic maneuvering. To the surprise of some, Jackson, the president elected with virtually no support from New England, embraced Webster’s speech in spite of the fact that it was given by the senator from Massachusetts.
Four months after the Hayne-Webster debate, political leaders were asked to make toasts at a banquet. Looking directly at his vice president, Jackson, offered a simple toast, “Our Union: It must be preserved.” Calhoun responded, “The Union. Next to our liberty, the most dear. May we always remember that it can only be preserved by respecting the rights of the states....” It marked the final break between the two men.
Nevertheless, as strongly as Jackson believed in asserting federal authority, he was still prepared to compromise about the tariff itself.
The actual rate charged in the tariff mattered far less to Jackson than the principle that no state had a right to nullify federal law. A compromise seemed possible when Congress convened in 1831. Former President John Quincy Adams had been elected to the House of Representatives from Massachusetts (the only former president in history to return to Congress), and the congressional leaders asked him to write a new tariff to replace the Tariff of Abominations.
Adams took the job seriously. He reduced the duty on goods not
produced in the United States and therefore not in need of protection, but retained tariffs to protect growing U.S. industries, especially iron and cotton textiles. He also reduced the tariff on cheap woolens—which slaves wore—from 45 percent to 5 percent, a significant concession to the slave states.
Most of the South found Adams’s tariff reasonable. Besides, much of the cottongrowing South was prospering, despite the tariff, because of other Jacksonian policies, especially from the new land that Indian Removal had made available for growing cotton. Other states were in no mood to press the nullification issue.
But South Carolina was different. Much of the state’s farmland had been exhausted by decades of overuse, and its dependency on slave labor made its leaders more fearful of federal intervention in the institution of slavery than those of any other state. Led by Calhoun, the state’s leaders believed that they had to win the right to nullify the tariff to establish the larger principal that states could nullify any law. For them, the Adams tariff was not enough. In November 1832, a South Carolina state convention declared that both the tariffs of 1828 and 1832 were unconstitutional and that “it shall not be lawful.. .to enforce payment of duties imposed by the said acts within the limits of this state” after February 1833. They also said that the state would secede if the federal government tried to force it to back down. The South Carolina legislature elected Robert Hayne, who had debated with Webster, as the governor to lead the state through these difficult times and elected Calhoun to replace Hayne in the Senate. Calhoun would essentially be South Carolina’s ambassador to the federal government for the next 2 decades. Calhoun resigned as vice president in December 1832, a little more than 2 months before his term ended, and returned to the Senate as a member, a very belligerent member. The stage was set for a major confrontation.
In November 1832, the South Carolina legislature also raised a state militia of25,000 volunteers. Jackson responded with a proclamation, stating that the state’s vote was “in direct violation of their duty as citizens of the United States.” According to Jackson, they had no right to nullify federal law and certainly not to raise their own army and,
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 285
he said, “Disunion by armed force is treason.” He told a South Carolina congressman, “I will hang the first man of them I can get my hands on to the first tree I can find.” He backed his words with action, reinforcing federal garrisons and sending armed revenue ships to Charleston Harbor. He also shifted the collection of customs duties in Charleston to warships offshore. When Governor Hayne told Senator Thomas Hart Benton of Missouri that he did not think Jackson would really hang anyone, Benton, who knew Jackson better, replied, “I tell you, Hayne, when Jackson begins to talk about hanging, they can begin to look out for ropes!” Jackson also lobbied to ensure no other southern state supported South Carolina and pushed Congress to keep the tariffs low.
In the end, no shots were fired. On March 1, 1833, Congress passed a compromise tariff that Henry Clay had crafted based on Adams’s proposals and gave the president the authority to put down the rebellion. Wiser heads in South Carolina decided to compromise. The state convention reconvened and declared victory based on the new Clay tariff. For spite they also nullified the congressional vote of new military authority, which they called the “Force Bill,” but that action was now meaningless since South Carolina was no longer resisting federal authority.
Jackson won the nullification battle, but it was an incomplete victory. He made it clear, in words and actions, which Abraham Lincoln would use as precedent, that no state could nullify federal law and that the U.S. government would use force to assert its authority. He was treated as a hero in many parts of the country and even
THINKING HISTORICALLY
The Nullification Crisis
The 1832 South Carolina convention that passed the Ordinance of Nullification said:
Whereas the Congress of the United States, by various acts, purporting to be acts laying duties and imposts [taxes] on foreign imports, but in reality intended for the protection of domestic manufacturers, and giving the bounties to classes and individuals engaged in particular employments, at the expense and to the injury and oppression of other classes and individuals...hath exceeded it just powers under the Constitution...
We, therefore, the people of the State of South Carolina in Convention assembled, do declare and ordain...That the several acts and parts of acts of the Congress of the United States, purporting to be laws for the imposing of duties and imposts on the importation of foreign commodities...are unauthorized by the Constitution of the United States, and violate the true meaning and intent thereof, and are null, void, and no law, nor binding upon this state, its officers or citizens.
This declaration was not the first time in U.S. history that a state had taken such a stand. The Kentucky and Virginia resolves
of 1798 and 1799, written by Thomas Jefferson and James Madison, had said the same thing about the Alien and Sedition Acts. The Hartford Convention that met in 1814 said the much the same thing about Congress having declared war on Great Britain in 1812. Yet unlike the response to earlier challenges, President Jackson declared the South Carolina ordinance "incompatible with the existence of the Union" and prepared for a military response.
Source: Statues at Large of South Carolina, Vol. I, pp. 329ff. (Columbia, South Carolina: A. S. Johnston, 1836).
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
Why did the authors of the Ordinance of Nullification believe that the Tariffs of 1828 and 1832 were unconstitutional?
2.	Craft an Argument
Defend or refute the following statement: "As the Nullification Crisis demonstrates, the ratification of the Constitution in 1788 was only a first, tentative step towards defining the relationship between the federal government and the states.” What events and developments between 1788 and 1832 support your position?
I6
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848 given an honorary degree by Harvard University. Even so, neither Calhoun nor the South Carolina legislature admitted defeat. In fact, that legislature passed a new law in 1834 requiring anyone holding state office to swear primary loyalty to South Carolina and only conditional loyalty to the federal government. This law effectively barred Unionists, those moderates who disagreed with nullification, perhaps a third of the state’s voters, from state office for the next 30 years.
Alexis de Tocqueville was in the United States during the Nullification Crisis. He took a dim view of the compromise on the tariff and the decision of South Carolina to nullify the “Force Bill”:
Either I am mistaken or the federal government of the Unites States is daily losing its power; it is gradually withdrawing from public affairs and is increasingly narrowing its sphere of action... .1 think I have seen a more lively feeling of independence and a more evident affection for regional government developing in the individual states of the Union.
The outcome of this movement, Tocqueville said, was “hidden in the future and I do not claim the ability to lift the veil.” But he remained worried for the future of the country.
10J
10.2
10 J
10.1
Quick Review Was Andrew Jackson's presidency democratic? Which of his actions and policies support your argument?
DEMOCRATIZED RELIGION: THE SECOND GREAT AWAKENING
Analyze the diversity of American religious experience and how the freedom of the era gave rise to diverse religious expressions.
10.2
Most Americans had strong opinions about Andrew Jackson. They might love or hate him, but they followed his career. However, politics was far from the only interest of most people. Many things closer to home, and sometimes closer to their own souls, mattered more. For many Americans in the 1820s and 1830s, the growth of a more popular democracy and popular social movements led by ordinary citizens was far more important than Presidents Jacksons policies or opinions.
No popular movement was more powerful than the upsurge in religious activity that took place in Jacksonian America. Once again de Tocqueville understood the country well: “There is no country in the whole world in which the Christian religion retains a greater influence over the souls of men than in America.” He described the Christianity he saw as “a democratic and republican religion.” When de Tocqueville wrote these words in the early 1830s, the Second Great Awakening was in full swing. It had begun around 1800 (see Chapter 8), but gathered new strength in Jacksonian America. Contrary to what Tocqueville implied, not all Americans were Protestant Christians, and many of those who were Christians did not fit into traditional Protestantism. But for a large numbekof those who lived from the 1820s to the 1840s, religion was important, even if formal membership in a specific religious congregation was not.
Charles G. Finney and New York's "Burner-Over District"
In 1821, Charles Grandison Finney, a 29-year-old lawyer in Adams, New York, not far from the Erie Canal, was struggling with the question of whether true religious belief was consistent with his legal career. He decided to leave his law practice, and began to preach in churches in upstate New York, eventually becoming one of thejnost influential preachers in the United States.
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 287
103 ;
In July 1824, Finney was ordained a Presbyterian minister in spite of his lack of formal training. In 1826, the spirit of revivalism hit upstate New York, and in 1830, Finney led the largest religious revival ever seen in Rochester, New York. Six hundred people joined one of the town’s three Presbyterian Churches, and the other denominations were also strengthened.
Finney did not seek an emotional catharsis from his congregants but, like an attorney, argued his case logically using wit and wisdom. Nevertheless, in his preaching, the rigid religious orthodoxy that dominated Congregational and Presbyterian churches gave way to a more egalitarian spirit. Finney called people to change their lives, not necessarily to agreement with specific creeds. Because of his preaching, hundreds, then thousands took religion more seriously, joined churches, participated in reform movements, and changed New York and American society.
By the late 1830s, the area along the Erie Canal where Finney preached had become known as “the burned-over district” because of the fires of religious enthusiasm that rolled over the region. Finney was far from the only revivalist in New York. However, he gave the New York revivals a distinct tone—different not only from the emotionalism of frontier revivals but also from the staid life of many established churches. Ihe Erie Canal also made communications easier and faster than before, so word of the revivals traveled fast.
Lyman Beecher and the Growth of Voluntary Societies
As a young minister, Lyman Beecher had been one of the staunchest defenders of state support for the Congregational churches in Connecticut (see Chapter 8). Once the Connecticut churches lost their government support, Beecher embraced the new situation and supported revivals and voluntary associations for moral reform in New England and the nation. Beecher described his goal:
A
Bible for every family, a school for every district, and a pastor for every 1000 souls, must be the motto upon the standard, round which the millions who enjoy these blessings must rally for the purpose of extending them to those who do not. Lyman Beecher, one of the leaders of the Second Great Awakening, is shown here with his numerous children including petitioner and educator Catharine (to the left of her father), Harriet Beecher Stowe (far right), and one of the most famous ministers of the next generation, Henry Ward Beecher (standing on the right).
288 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848

As the Second Great Awakening grew in force in the 1820s and 1830s, a series of voluntary societies or interdenominational organizations that Beecher helped launch grew in their influence. These societies were not owned by any one religious body but, rather, depended on the voluntary contributions of members of several different religious bodies. They represented a new form of cooperation across traditional religious lines in the service of a larger goal to change the culture of the United States. The American Bible Society distributed Bibles, the American Sunday School Union provided curriculum materials for church-based Sunday schools, and the American Education Society supported the education of ministers. In addition, the American Board of Commissioners for Foreign Missions sent missionaries around the world, including Adoniram Judson and his wife Ann Hasseltine Judson, whose efforts in Burma became role models for generations of foreign missionaries to convert the world to Christianity. Beecher included prominent members of the Congregational, Presbyterian, and Episcopal churches in the leadership of these societies. The underlying mission of all of these societies was moral reform—the creation of a sober, God-fearing, American public.
By the early 1830s, Beecher had become convinced that the key to transforming the nation lay in the Mississippi Valley. He became president of Lane Theological Seminary in Cincinnati to
fulfill this goal. Beecher helped prepare future ministers, strengthened religious colleges, and placed Protestant pastors in hundreds of Midwestern churches. He also helped create the public school system of Ohio and supported schools and teachers across the Midwest.
The goal of all of this activity was to strengthen the moral sway of Congregational-Presbyterian Protestantism against the individualism of Jacksonian Democrats, Catholics, and other Protestants who disagreed with them. In the world that Beecher and his fellow Protestant evangelists were creating, the separating of church and state meant that specific denominations would not wield political power, but together, these Protestants would help build a culture in which the churches, voluntary societies, and public schools would reinforce common beliefs and practices.
Revivalism and Moral Reform Movements
Most converts in the revivals that preachers like Finney and Beecher led, perhaps three-fourths of them, were women who then prayed and lobbied for their husbands and families to convert. Finney and his closest lieutenant, Theodore Dwight Weld, encouraged women to be active in their religious communities. Where New England churches had urged women to keep silent except at home, the new generation of revivalists welcomed them as prayer leaders and preachers. Such speaking in “promiscuous assemblies,” may have been familiar in Baptist and even Methodist churches, but it was new in the more middle-class Presbyterian and Congregational churches. Women who became religious leaders in the revivals often also became leaders in their communities. The movement demanding womens rights that swept the United States in the 1840s sprang from the same areas of upstate New York that revivalists called the burned-over district (see Chapter 12). The link was not surprising.
For Finney, conversion meant that one needed to show one’s new faith in ethical behavior, and no ethical behavior was more important to him than opposing slavery. Upstate New York’s churches sent revivalist preachers into the rest of the country to preach for the abolition of slavery. For the next 30 years, the Finney-Weld brand of revivalism spread across the country and was one of the streams of abolitionism that inspired Northerners to fight a war to end slavery.
The rights of women and opposition to slavery were not the only reform causes to spring from the revivalism of the Second Great Awakening. Other reformers, inspired by the same forces, began to advocate for important changes in the way prisoners were treated. Too often, they said, overcrowded prisons were simply schools for crime, and the focus on punishment, whatever the original crime, did little to redeem or reclaim prisoners to reenter society. At first, reformers advocated the building of prisons in which each prisoner would be confined to a solitary cell where they would have time to reflect on their past, be taught new habits, and prepare to reenter society. But too often, the solitary confinement led to insanity rather than reform. In response, prison reformers built a new kind of prison in which each prisoner had a separate cell, but also had access to common dining quarters, workshops, and a chapel. In all of these spaces, the authorities sought to teach prisoners a new way of behaving as preparation for reclaiming them. In the 1830s, the New York state penitentiary at Auburn was redesigned to foster the new approach, and soon thereafter, a large new penitentiary at Sing Sing on the Hudson River was built with 1,000 cells plus the common areas. Reformers hoped that the new, more humane approach would change lives and ultimately society. Other states quickly followed in adopting the new models.
Many mentally ill people were treated very much like prisoners before the reforms, and they often found themselves in similar circumstances. Reformers quickly took up the cause of those they said were insane. Perhaps no one equaled Dorothea Dix as a reformer in the treatment of the mentally ill. In 1843, Dix told the Massachusetts fegislature that she was calling their attention “to the present state of Insane Persons confined within this Commonwealth, in cages, closets, cellars, stalls, pens! Chained, naked, beaten with rods, and lashed into obedience!” Moreover, she had the facts to
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 289
This illustration from an anti-alcohol publication makes the claim that drunkenness was the cause of many problems in society, especially the abuse of women.
prove her point. The result, beginning in Massachusetts, was that a system of state hospitals for the insane replaced the earlier prisons.
Many other reforms also blossomed. Although the campaign against alcohol would reach its peek many decades later, it began during the Second Great Awakening. Lyman Beecher preached temperance sermons that were widely reprinted, including one in which he said, “What then is this universal, natural, and national remedy for intemperance? It is the banishment of ardent spirits from the list of lawful objects of commerce...” Many, including members of Congress took the pledge to stop drinking, the U.S. Army stopped the old tradition of a ration of alcohol, and refusing to drink became a mark of religious observance in many circles. At the same time, the American Peace Society advocated an end to all wars. The American Sunday School Union distributed not only Bible stories, but also basic reading books in places where there were no schools. Schools were opened for those who were deaf and blind. Efforts were made to rescue prostitutes. Countless reforms designed to create a better, more humane, and sometimes more tightly controlled society emerged from the enthusiasm of the awakening.
Utopian Religious Communities
The religious enthusiasm of the early 1800s also inspired untraditional ways of thinking about religious matters. Large American spaces that allowed people to develop their own communities relatively undisturbed and the American emphasis on liberty, even the liberty to be eccentric, made the United States fertile ground for radical experiments and utopian religious communities. Some of these religious experiments were short lived. Others lasted for generations. A few, most of all the Mormons, have continued to the present.
MOTHER ANN LEE AND THE SHAKERS
The founder of the United Society of Believers in Christ’s Second Appearing, or the Shakers, was Ann Lee—known as Mother Ann Lee—who before the American Revolution gathered a few supporters in England and came to America in 1774. Lee was convinced that she was receivings special revelation from God that human sexuality was the basis of all sin and celibacy was the only way to live a godly life. Lee inspired Shaker communities in New York and New England. Shaker worship reflected Lee’s spirituality and, according to observers, included, “shaking and singing, hopping and turning, smoking and running, groaning and laughing-Shaker communities at New Lebanon, New Hampshire; Sabbath Day Lake, Maine; and elsewhere thrived, and the Shakers became one of the largest and most successful of the pre-Civil communitarian movements.
290 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
SBlSglMKBiiaMSiBB
In Shaker worship and community life, women and men were kept separate, but all participated in lively music and dance designed to shake sin out of their bodies.
Shaker theology placed Ann Lee on a par with Jesus and committed the society to the equal leadership of women with men. But Shakers were united by their community life more than by theology. They demanded celibacy, a requirement that limited the community’s appeal and prevented increasing membership by means of childbirth. Instead, all new members had to be converts who were attracted to Shaker life. The revivals produced many such converts who sought a deeper spiritual life than they found in traditional churches. Shaker beliefs were reflected in their commitment to making things of beauty, and Shaker furniture remains a reminder of their beliefs.
American Voices
The Shaker Community, “Tis the Gift to be Simple,” 1830s
rhe simplicity and joyfulness of the Shakers have infiltrated American culture in many ways. Shaker furniture, now so popular, was not just a product for them. Mildred Barker, leader of a Shaker Community in Maine, who died in 1990, once reflected, "I almost expect to be remembered as a chair or a table." But Barker reminded those who came to interview her that behind oil of the Shakers' physical artifacts, "There's the religion." And while many of their complex theological ideas have largely been forgotten, the basic joy, humility, and playfulness of the Shakers continue to be remembered in this familiar hymn that dates to the 1830s:
Tis the gift to be simple, 'tis the gift to be free;
Tis the gift to come down where we ought to be;
And when we find ourselves in the place just right,
Twill be in the valley of love and delight.
When true simplicity is gaind,
To bow and to bend we shan't be asham'd To turn, turn will be our delight,
'Till by turning, turning we come round right.
Source: Stephen J. Stein, The Shaker Experience in America (New Haven: Yale University Press, 1992), p. 191.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
What values and priorities are extolled in the hymn?
2.	Historical Interpretation
Why might simplicity, certainty, and humility have been particularly appealing to 1830s Americans? What aspects of the larger society might Shakers have found most disturbing and unwelcome?
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 291
10.2
The things they created, whether furniture, houses, or art, were owned in common, not individually, a requirement that some found as difficult to accept as celibacy.
JOHN HUMPHREY NOYES AND THE ONEIDA COMMUNITY
The Oneida Community also had its roots in the Second Great Awakening and flourished in Oneida, New York, between 1848 and 1879. Its founder and spiritual guide was John Humphrey Noyes, who was born in Vermont in 1811. As a student for the ministry, he became convinced that repentance from sin was not enough and that people should simply stop sinning. Noyes became convinced that all Christians could achieve a state “in which all the affections of the heart are given to God, and in which there is no sin.” Gathering a small community in Putney, Vermont, he expanded his definition of Christian perfectionism to include what he called “complex marriage,” an arrangement in which monogamy was replaced with many sexual companions. Noyes argued that sexual pleasure was a gift from God and that Christianity demanded the sharing of that gift without any exclusive or jealous reservations.
Vermont authorities, however, took a dim view of these sexual practices and beliefs, and Noyes and his followers moved to Oneida, New York, where the community thrived for decades, supported ultimately by producing and selling silverware. Oneida eventually fell victim to Victorian morality and to its dependence on Noyes as its single charismatic leader. Between 1875 and 1879, Oneida was torn by debates as New York authorities began threatening arrests for Oneida’s flouting of the marriage laws. Noyes fled to Canada and the community dissolved although the silver business supported former members for generations.
ROBERT OWEN AND THE NEW HARMONY COMMUNITY
After making a fortune in London, Robert Owen founded a model factory town at New Lanark, Scotland, in which he sought to put the spirit of universal welfare into practice. In the early 1820s, Owen decided to relocate his utopian vision of a community designed to benefit all of it members and establish it in the United States. In early 1825, 900 people arrived at New Harmony, Indiana, where Owen had purchased land. But New Harmony failed within a year. The community could not attract enough skilled workers to make it economically successful. There was tension between those who ran New Harmony and the rest of the community. As one disaffected resident recalled, the “aristocrats” quarreled, and the fields went to ruin. Owen lost most of his fortune, which he had invested in New Harmony, but returned to England to continue to advocate his version of social reform.
f
JOSEPH SMITH AND THE CHURCH OF JESUS CHRIST OF THE LATTER-DAY SAINTS
Joseph Smith (1805-1844) was as much a product of New York’s burned-over district as Charles G. Finney. Smith was born in 1805 and moved with his family to a farm in Palmyra, New York, when he was age 11. In 1827, word spread along the Erie Canal that Smith had found a treasure that would unlock the Indian history of the area. He had, he said, found golden plates and magical stones known as Urim and Thummim with which to read and translate what was written on the plates by an ancient prophet-historian named Mormon. He published the result, the Book of Mormon, in 1830. With that book, a uniquely American religious tradition was born, one that its followers believed represented a rebirth of true Christianity. Smith, however, did much more than publish a new book; he organized a community. Within a month of the book’s publication, the first Mormon community began to form near Palmyra, New York, with Smith as its leader. Some responded with hos-
• tility to his efforts, even tarring and feathering Smith at one point. But converts seeking religious truth poured in, a temple was built, and the community grew.
In response to the hostility, Smith and the Mormon community moved first to Missouri and then in the late 1830s, to Nauvoo, Illinois, which became the largest and fastest growing city in Illinois because of Mormonism. The city’s 15,000 residents
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
became a virtually autonomous state, and their militia was recognized by state law. But Smith s political involvements and religious teaching, especially his suggestion that all members participate in marriages involving one husband and multiple wives, brought renewed hostility. On June 27, 1844, a mob killed Smith and his brother Hyrum.
With Smith’s death, Brigham Young became the new leader of the Mormons in 1847 and led them on a cross-continent trek to the shores of the Great Salt Lake in what is now Utah. Salt Lake was then on the northern edge of the Republic of Mexico, which was soon to be annexed by the United States. There, far from any governmental authority, they set up settlements in a tight, church-regulated community. They also embraced Smith s revelation that a man could take as many wives as he could support.
But the Treaty of Guadalupe Hildago, which marked the end of the U.S. War with Mexico from 1846 to 1848, brought Salt Lake City and the Mormon community under the control of the U.S. government. For a while, the U.S. government left the Mormons alone, but in 1857, President James Buchanan replaced Young with a non-Mormon territorial governor, and the Mormon War broke out as federal authorities tried to enforce monogamy on the Mormons and the Mormons fought back. In one well-publicized incident, Mormons massacred a group of non-Mormon settlers. Only in 1890, after an intense time of prayer and a new revelation, did the Mormon leadership abandon plural marriage. Relations with the government improved, and Utah became a state in 1896. Of all the new religious communities spawned during the Second Great Awakening, the Church of Jesus Christ of the Latter-Day Saints has been the most successful.
Mormons, like those shown in this wagon train, crossed the plains and mountains to get to new homes in Utah.
Transcendentalism
In 1838, far from Salt Lake City or the revivals of New York, Ralph Waldo Emerson gave a speech at Harvard Divinity School in Cambridge, Massachusetts, that had as much impact as any revival sermon. Emerson had been ordained as a Unitarian minister but had resigned when he came to believe that the Lord’s Supper and public prayer were barriers to direct experience of the divine.
In the Divinity School Address, Emerson told an audience of future Unitarian ministers that too often in formal worship, “The soul is not preached.” And he said, “The true preacher can be known by this, that he deals out to the people his life,—life passed through the fire of thought.” Emerson’s call to preach “throbs of desire and hope” rather than formal theology offended most of his audience and he was never invited back to the Divinity School, but the speech represented a new approach to religious life that was developing in America in the 1830s.
While Emerson continued to develop his ideas for another 40 years, the Transcendentalist movement with which he is most associated blossomed in the 1830s. In 1836, a group that came to call themselves the Transcendental Club met at the Boston home of George Ripley, another Unitarian minister, to discuss ideas. The members of the club created a theology that reflected a powerful personal experience of life.
In 1841, under Ripley’s leadership, members of the Transcendental Club founded Brook Farm, a utopian community in West Roxbury, Massachusetts, where the residents sought to support themselves through manual labor. Women and men shared work equally, and an effort was made at true gender equity. But few of the residents of Brook Farm actually knew much about farming, the farm did not prosper, and the community disbanded in 1847. Nevertheless, Emerson’s writings and the Transcendental movement he helped launch reflected an impatience with “old ways” and a desire for direct and immediate experience of the divine that continued to impact American religious life.
10.2
Quick Review How did the increasing diversity of religion in America reflect other political and social changes in the nation?
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson 293
DEMOCRATIZED EDUCATION: THE BIRTH OF THE
COMMON SCHOOL
_________________ Explain thG dGVGloprnent of public education as a result of, and in response to, the cultural currents of the 1820s and 1830s.
103
The years during which Andrew Jackson dominated American politics were also years in which the nations public school system was radically transformed, though the transformation was mostly the work of Jacksons staunch opponents. Many of the most prominent education reformers were Whigs who did not share Jackson’s vision for American society. They often sought to change the ways schools were organized and conducted for the same reasons they opposed Jackson politically. Schools, Whig educators believed, could build a new American culture more to their liking than the Jacksonian brand of democracy that most school reformers found too individualistic and unlikely to transmit the kind of moral code they thought was essential to a well-regulated national life.
Various individuals with their own agendas contributed to what came to be known as the Common School Crusade. Catherine Beecher sought to empower women by opening the doors for them to become school teachers. Horace Mann, a Whig Party leader, helped launch a new and more tightly organized school system in Massachusetts—a system that came to serve as a model for much of the nation. Ihe transformation of the nation’s schools in this period was a key dynamic of the changing culture of the United States between the 1820s and the 1840s.
Women Become Teachers
In 1835, Catharine Beecher, daughter of the religious leader Lyman Beecher, was already well known for founding the Hartford Female Seminary to help educate women and for her petitions seeking to stop Jackson’s Indian Removal. In her Essay on the Education of Female Teachers published in that year, Beecher argued that women were much better equipped than men to be teachers, but she also wanted to educate them for the work. She saw teaching as an extension of motherhood, a nurturing role: “What is the most important and peculiar duty of the female sex? It is the physical,
, n' "I0 u Very y°un9 women' taught school, most often in one-room schools like this one where ch' dren of 311 ages learned to read, write, count, and then advance through more complex assignments. No all the schools were as comfortable as the one shown here and not all the children were as well behaved.

Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
intellectual, and moral education of children. She continued, “Woman, whatever are
her relations in life, is necessarily the guardian of the nursery, the companion of child-
hood, and the constant model of imitation. It is her hand that first stamps impressions
on the immortal spirit, that must remain forever.” At a time when most teachers were
still men, Beecher argued not only that women actually made better teachers than
men, but also that including women as teachers would expand the supply of teachers
for the country and open the door to a professional life for middle-class women who
had few employment options.
Beecher’s impassioned views reflected those of Emma Willard, who had founded the Troy Female Seminary in 1821 in upstate New York to prepare women to be teachers. Like Beecher, Willard had argued, “There are many females of ability, to whom the business of instructing children is highly acceptable.” She also believed that women should get the same education as men and modeled the curriculum at Troy on what men studied at college, though she added courses on how to teach. In 1837,
Mary Lyon founded Mount Holyoke Female Seminary in Massachusetts to give future female teachers a college education.
New Structures for Schooling
While Catharine Beecher and her colleagues were transforming the gender of the
teaching profession, other reformers sought to transform the structure of schools.
None of these leaders was more important than Horace Mann. In 1836, Mann, a
rising star in the Massachusetts Whig Party, helped shepherd a bill through the
Massachusetts legislature that created a state Board of Education. He then became
the boards full-time, paid secretary. Mann spent the next 12 years advocating tighter
state standards for education, more money for schools and teacher salaries, and a
better education for children. He became the best-known spokesperson for public
education of his generation.
Mann believed in state standards for the schools. He described the schools of Massachusetts as, “so many distinct, independent communities.” Mann meant to change that. He also believed that it was the responsibility of all citizens to pay taxes to support schools; looking at the conditions of the state’s schools when he took office, he did not think that they paid nearly enough at the time in such taxes. Like Beecher and Willard, Mann wanted educated teachers and created a system of state-sponsored teacher preparation schools, called “normal schools,” that offered 1 year of state-funded preparation to any young woman or man who wanted to be a teacher. Mann’s greatest concern, however, was the moral education of the state’s citizens. He believed that there needed to be a public guardian of morality, and since the United States had no state church, that guardian had to be the public school.
While Mann was the best-known educational reformer, almost all Whigs also came to advocate the same changes he did: state systems of education, state support for teacher preparation, and state efforts to ensure a common morality. Like many reformers, Mann and his allies could not understand why anyone would oppose them.
Yet even in Massachusetts, there was opposition. Jacksonian Democrats in the legislature tried to abolish the Board of Education and the office of secretary. They saw the state control that Mann advocated as expensive, unnecessary, and an unwarranted interference by the state in local affairs, which would undermine local support for each town’s school.
Roman Catholics were especially unhappy with the growing influence and cost of the public school system. Catholics saw the public schools as essentially a Protestant venture, something Protestants like Mann could never understand. Mann advocated teaching the Protestant Bible in school “without note or comment,” leaving it to churches or parents to interpret it. But Catholics believed that the Bible should be read in light of the teachings of the Church and not left to individual interpretation.
Chapter 10 Democracy
in the Age of Andrew Jackson 295
10.3
They found anti-Catholic bias in many of the textbooks the public schools used To pay taxes only to have their children read such material outraged them. Citing examples from textbooks that spoke of “deceitful Catholics,” Catholics in New York City wrote that they could not “in conscience, and consistently with their sense of duty to God, and to their offspring” send them to the city’s public schools and requested public funds so that they could operate their own schools. When such funds were denied Catholics in New York and around the country started their own parochial system at their own expense.
The Nation's Textbook: McGuffey's Reader
claws
catch
harks
scratch
J {
L
The j ler. ; p teeth: : she will: she will i
In 1836, the small Cincinnati publishing house of Truman and Smith brought out a new textbook for schools. The first McGuffeys Reader became part of a series, the McGuffey's Primer, McGuffey's Speller, and the First through the Sixth McGuffey's Eclectic Readers. By 1920, when most school districts had turned to other materials, 122 million copies of the books had been sold.
The McGuffey Reader offered lessons in reading and public speaking designed to create a unified, literate, and patriotic society. The Readers reflected the same morality that Mann and Beecher wanted the schools to teach. They included patriotic speeches by Patrick Henry and stories of George Washington as well as tales of the poor boy and his faithful dog or the poor boy who worked hard and made good. The texts also included ethical instruction, for example, don’t steal apples from someone else’stree, and instruction in how to speak and present oneself. The goal was a citizenry that could speak well, participate in a common democratic dialogue, and use a common national language instead of regional dialects.
A story in the Second Eclectic Reader is illustrative of the McGuffey approach. “Henry, the Bootblack,” begins with the story of Henry, “a kind good boy.”
Henry’s “father was dead, and his mother was very poor. He had a little sister about two years old.” One day, Henry found a pocketbook. He could have kept all the money in it, but he found the owner and returned it. The owner then gave him a dollar for doing so. Henry used the dollar to set himself up as a bootblack and he was “so polite that gentlemen soon began to notice him, and to let him black their boots.” When Henry brought home his first fifty cents in earnings his mother responded, “You are a dear, good boy, Henry. I did not know how I could earn enough to buy bread with, but now I think we can manage to get along quite well.” This account is not the kind of success story that would appear fifty years later. In the story, Henry does not go on to own a factory or make a fortune. He is simply a dutiful child who makes his mother happy. The students who read the McGuffey texts were urged to do the same. They were also urged to learn the correct pronunciation and spelling for support, boots, notice, money, and other words in the story. McGuffey was teaching a common morality but also a common American English to all students.
The United States that the Readers portrayed was white, middle class, hard working, and willing to sacrifice for the common good. The Readers also demanded a high standard of reading ability and moved students step by step to attain it. In one-room schoolhouses, often staffed by teachers with little training, which was the national norm throughout the 1800s, a teacher could encourage different stu dents to move from Reader to Reader in careful order and be confident that, by the time the student had mastered the Sixth Eclectic Reader, he or she would be fluent in the English language and in the nation s

( »
OF THE ECLECTIC HEHEIS.
See how this dog stands on his feet. He Wants to play with John.
A dog has four feet. A dog and a cat can see in the dark.
Hogs keep watch at night and hark, lliey bark most when the moon shines.
A dog will chase a sheep, or a hog, or a co5V? an(j bjte it. If you are kind to dog, he will not bite you.
ike	Riders were filled with patriotic speeches and stories
Ictr,.e. °ne S °Wr> here, designed to teach morality, in addition to istruction on	,
^-ummon ways of pronouncing key terms.
296 Part IV
Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
ethical norms. Not everyone agreed with the specific values the Readers taught, and reformers were often tone-deaf to complaints, but the public schools and their teachers shaped American culture as significantly as any of the religious, political, or commercial ventures of the Age of Jackson.
Quick Review Why might education be increasingly important in an expanding country?
CONCLUSION
Andrew Jackson was like no other president before him. He had no connection to the Founding Fathers, either by blood, class, or any similar privilege. Jackson was determined to make the presidency the center of American government, believing that the government should be an expression of his agenda and of his party. In his two terms as president, Jackson successfully prodded Congress to bend to his will or used executive power to realize his goals, despite fierce opposition. A complex American leader with a long-standing distrust of centralized government, his views were reflected in his actions: an Indian Removal policy that forced thousands of Native Americans out of their ancestral homes in Illinois, Georgia, Mississippi, Alabama, and Florida and on to new lands in present-day Oklahoma; opposition to the Second Bank of the United States because he thought the federal government should have no role in banking, issuing paper currency, or expanding credit; and the Nullification Crisis in which Jackson successfully challenged South Carolina’s efforts to declare federal law null and void in that state. Those actions would have long-lasting effects on the nation.
For many Americans in the decades between 1820 and 1850, the growth of a more popular democracy and popular social movements led by ordinary citizens were far more important than President Jackson’s policies or opinions. Along with the market revolution that was transforming the physical, commercial, and political landscapes of the United States, the Age of Jackson, as his years in the White House were called, was also a period of social and religious revival and reform. It was the peak of a long-running series of religious revivals known as the Second Great Awakening. This upsurge in religious activity resulted in greater rights for women, stronger opposition to slavery, and radical transformation of the nation’s public schools, whose teachers and moral teachings shaped American culture as significantly as any of the religious, political, or commercial ventures of the Age of Jackson.
CHI R E
Considering the political, economic, and social aspects of the "Age of Jackson," to what extent was the United States in that period different from the beginning
of the 1800s?
Chapter 10 Democracy in the Age of Andrew Jackson
Chapter 10 Chapter Review
10.1
JACKSONIAN DEMOCRACY
Analyze Jackson's advocacy for Indian Removal, his opposition to the Bank of the United States, his support for a tariff, and the impact of these policies on other Americans.
Review Questions
1.	Comparison
How did Jackson’s vision of the presidency differ from that of his predecessors?
2.	Crafting Arguments
What were Jackson’s most important political priorities? What connections can you make between his policies and his vision of the presidency?
3.	Historical Interpretation
What does the debate over Indian Removal tell you about political divisions in the United States in the 1830s? What groups were most likely to support removal? What groups were most likely to oppose it?
4.	Synthesis
In what ways was the Nullification Crisis part of a longstanding disagreement about the nature of American government that went at least as far back as the debate over ratification of the Constitution?
DEMOCRATIZED RELIGION: THE SECOND GREAT AWAKEN I NG_______________________________________________
Analyze the diversity of American religious experience and how the freedom of the era gave rise to diverse religious expressions.
Review Questions
5.	Synthesis
How did the role of religion in American society and culture change between 1800 and 1840? What explains the changes you note?
10*2
6.	Historical Interpretation
What might explain the close connection between calls for religious revival and campaigns for social reform in the 1830s and 1840s?
7.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the various utopian religious com. munities of the early 1800s. What common features die they share? What common forces might have contributes to their emergence?
DEMOCRATIZED EDUCATION: THE BIRTH OF THE COMMON SCHOOL
i 103
Explain the development of public education as a result of, in response to, the cultural currents of the 1820s and 1830s. i
Review Questions
8.	Contextualization Why did reformers like Catherine Beecher believe women had a natural aptitude for teaching? In what ways did Beecher see teaching as a natural extension of women’s role in the home?
9.	Crafting Arguments
Is it fair to describe Mann’s system of public education, as some of his opponents did, as nothing more than a vehicle for imposing mainstream Protestantism on all Americans? Why or why not?
10.	Historical Interpretation
How did textbooks in The McGuffey Reader series shape the society and culture of the United States in the first half of the 1800s?
298 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
1830-1853
In this painting, Emigrants at Kanesville by William Henry Jackson, a backlog of wagons waits to be ferried across the Missouri River at Council Bluffs, Iowa.
In the summer of 1845, the Democratic Review, a New York City paper edited by John L. O’Sullivan, urged the nation to annex the independent Republic of Texas: "It is time now for opposition to the annexation of Texas to cease,” Sullivan wrote. Texas was a hot topic, and many newspapers were taking the same position. But the Review claimed that including Texas in the United States was an essential part of the fulfillment of our manifest destiny to overspread the continent allotted by Providence for the free development of our yearly multiplying millions. Manifest Destiny quickly became a core American belief. It was a mindset that justified the Louisiana Purchase of 1803, the hoped-for U.S. acquisition of the Oregon Territory along with the northern half of Mexico including Texas and California, and a significant influence across the Pacific Ocean.
Manifest Destiny gave a new name to an old idea. Even before the
American Revolution and in growing numbers in the 1790s, white Americans had crossed the Allegheny Mountains in spite of government prohibitions and had established colonies in Kentucky and in the Ohio River Valley. Soon after 1800, others were crossing into Florida and Missouri, both then under Spanish control. In both cases, the settlers were confident that the American army and American government would soon follow. While the first Americans to cross into Texas spoke of loyalty to the
CHAPTER OBJECTIVE
Demonstrate an understanding of how the idea of Manifest Destiny and the policies of the Polk administration almost doubled the size of the United States in 12 years in spite of opposition from many people in the country.
MANIFEST DESTINY—THE IMPORTANCE OF AN IDEA_________________________________
Explain what Manifest Destiny meant and how it led the United States to involvement in Texas, California, and Oregon.
THE U.S. WAR WITH MEXICO,
1846-1848 Analyze the causes, strategies, and outcomes of the U.S. War with Mexico.
WEST TO THE PACIFIC___________________________________
Analyze the causes and outcomes of U.S. expansion in California and into the Pacific region, including establishing new relationships with Hawaii, China, and Japan.
11.1
11.2
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 299
113
	Significant Dates
1821	Mexico gains independence from Spain First American colony established in Texas
1829	Mexico abolishes slavery, including in Texas
1830	Revolts against Mexican authority begin in Texas
1835	Americans in Texas capture the Alamo, drive out Mexican army
1836	Narcissa and Marcus Whitman help found the first Protestant mission in Oregon Texas declares independence from Mexico Fall of the American forces in the Alamo to Mexican army Treaty of Velasco recognizes independent Republic of Texas Congress passes gag rule forbidding discussion of slavery
1837	Financial Panic of 1837
1842	Webster-Ashburton Treaty resolves U.S.-Canadian border dispute
1844	Treaty of Wang-hsia gives United States open trading rights in China
1845	The term Manifest Destiny becomes popular James K. Polk inaugurated as president U.S. annexation of Texas
1846	Beginning of U.S. War with Mexico
1848	Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo ends war with Mexico Gold Rush in California
1849	Thoreau's Civil Disobedience published
1851	Herman Melville's Moby Dick published
1853	Commodore Perry enters Tokyo Harbor, begins opening Japan to United States Gadsden Purchase, last acquisition of land in continental United States
Manifest Destiny
The doctrine, first expressed in 1845, that the expansion of white Americans across the continent was inevitable and ordained by God and was a means to spread Protestant Christianity and Jacksonian Democracy to more people.
Republic of Mexico, by 1830, they too were seeking protection from the American government. In all these cases, many in the government were happy to oblige, seeing the movement of colonists as a first step in expanding the nation. Being aware of the nation’s long-term expansion, the power of the idea of Manifest Destiny, and the political and military actions that the nation’s leaders took in the name of that idea is essential to understanding how the nation expanded into the shape it has today. This chapter will explore the political, diplomatic, and military issues involved in turning the idea of Manifest Destiny into a geographic reality.
It is also important to understand how the acquisition of so much new territory in the 1830s and 1840s, as well as other developments in people’s thinking, changed the lives of those who lived in the United States. The population of the country was expanding as dramatically as its geographical borders. Migrants from around the world especially flocked to California to find their fortunes in the gold. Citizens of the Republic of Mexico suddenly found themselves living in the United States because the border had moved, as did American Indians, who rejected the claims of all nations to their lands. Other immigrants came to the already established parts of the nation. In addition, amid the many changes, slaves, supporters and opponents of slavery, and women became increasingly vocal about the issue of freedom and equality. These issues will be explored in Chapter 12. The great territorial expansion of these years and dramatic changes in the makeup and the thinking of people in the United States during the same time period transformed the country and its future.
MANIFEST DESTINY—THE IMPORTANCE OF AN IDEA
Explain what Manifest Destiny meant and how it led the United States to involvement in Texas, California, and Oregon.
11.1
The idea that the United States had a “manifest destiny” led to more than simply acquiring land, though between 1845 and 1848, the United States would almost double in size, from 1.8 million square miles to almost 3 million. Advocates of Manifest Destiny claimed that the United States—with God’s blessing—should rule the heart of North America from the Atlantic Ocean to the Pacific and from a still-to-be-defined border with British Canada to an even more undefined border with the Republic of Mexico. For O Sullivan and other supporters of Manifest Destiny, it was the nations appointed role to spread not only democracy—in its Jacksonian form—but also to spread Protestant Christianity in place of the Catholicism of Mexico or the native beliefs of American Indians. The same year that O’Sullivan coined the term Manifest Destiny, Illinois Representative John Wentworth told Congress that he “did not believe the God of Heaven...designed that the original States should be the only abode of liberty on earth. On the contrary, he only designed them as the great center from which civilization, religion, and liberty should radiate and radiate until the whole continent shall bask in their blessing. That belief, held by many beyond Wentworth, that the United States was specially chosen by divine will to bring liberty and democracy to the planet and especially North America—was a driving force in the push for new lands in the 1840s.
Many Americans supported versions of Manifest Destiny for their own reasons. Land speculators and those promoting the extension of the nation’s railroads wanted to exploit the vast lands in the West. Farmers dreamed of starting over in rich—and cheap new lands. Workers believed that rapid national expansion would guarantee industrial profits and thus their jobs, or give them a chance to start over if necessary. Protestant leaders and missionaries saw U.S. control of the new lands as an opportunity to ensure that a Protestant United States, not a Catholic Mexico, controlled the continent. Manifest Destiny also referred to a patriotic belief that the nation had a divine mission to become a world power.
and a National Identity, 1800-1848
ifllli
At the mythical level, Manifest Destiny was seen as the spirit hovering over the westward movement of white settlers, leading them and urging them on whether they came by foot, covered wagon, or stage coach.
In contrast, many other Americans opposed the whole idea of a “manifest destiny.” Democrats tended to support expansion, but most Whigs, led by Henry Clay, had grave reservations. Clay’s goal was not necessarily a larger country but a better developed one with roads, canals, railroads, and industries knitting it together and ensuring its prosperity. Antislavery advocates opposed the acquisition of more land, especially Texas, since they were certain that new lands meant new slave states. However, some proslavery advocates, notably South Carolina Senator John C. Calhoun, wanted Texas but worried that other incorporated lands, especially California and Oregon, might become free states peopled by darker-skinned citizens, which would shift power away from the white slaveholding regions.
Some Americans also saw the violence associated with expansion as simply wrong. Many residents of the lands from Texas to California did not want to become part of the United States at all. Antonio Maria Osio spoke for those who did not want to become U.S. residents when he described himself as “a Californio who loves his country and a Mexican on all four sides and in my heart.” He opposed the annexation of California to the United States, and when it happened, he left, eventually settling in Baja California so that he could to remain a citizen of Mexico.
While many Americans debated Manifest Destiny in the Congress, the press, and the pulpits, other Americans, especially trappers and farmers, moved into the regions, just as a generation before the same types of people had expanded beyond the Mississippi. Regardless of whether the United States, Mexico, or Britain claimed the land, these frontiersmen and women were confident that, in time, their government would follow them. Most of all, they moved into Texas (see Map 11-1).
The Birth of the Texas Republic
The tensions between Americans living in Texas and the Mexican government that governed it had been building even before Mexico gained its independence from Spain in 1821. When the United States purchased Louisiana from France in 1803, the western
Chapter 11
Californio
Person of Spanish descent—and after 1821, citizen of Mexico—living in California.
Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 301
300 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land,
T
Saltillo MAP 11-1 Trade networks between Mexico, Texas, and the United States. Mexico (and before it, Spain) had established settlements and trade networks throughout its sparsely populated northern territories. Texas trade ran not only south from San Antonio and Goliad in Texas to Monterrey and other trading centers in Mexico but also east into the United States. Separate networks connected the heartland of Mexico with its settlements in Santa Fe and Taos in New Mexico, with Tucson in the future Arizona, and with the missions and presidios along the coast of California.
San Francisco n San Jose Santa Cruz (Branciforte);
San Carlos de Monterey
PACIFIC OCEAN
"f* Mission B Presidio • Town
-----Present-day political boundaries
—— Principal road
Present state names and boundaries provided for orientation Indian communities, including the New Mexico Pueblos, are not shown
Tejanos
People of Spanish or Mexican descent born in Texas.
border of the territory was disputed. Spain insisted it was the Sabine River (the current border between Louisiana and Texas), but French officials hinted that the United States might claim territory further west. Jefferson had wanted Louisiana to include all of the land from modern-day Texas to the Rio Grande River, but he was not prepared to fight Spain over it. In the Adams-Onis Treaty of 1819, Spain ceded Florida to the United States, along with Spanish claims to Oregon, in exchange for U.S. recognition of the Sabine River as the border between U.S. Louisiana and Spanish Texas, though some in Congress criticized the treaty for that reason. Despite treaties, however, Americans still crossed the Sabine in the early 19th century settling in Texas.
Soon after the Adams-Onis Treaty was signed, a revolutionary uprising began in Mexico. Like the people of the United States, most Mexican citizens wanted to be free of control by a European power. The Mexican revolution against Spanish rule, which lasted from 1810 to 1821, was long and bloody and decimated the Mexican economy In Texas, the Mexican population, people known as Tejanos, fell from 4,000 in 1800 to 2,500 in 1821. Comanche and Apache tribes dominated large parts of Texas, and
much of the desert was vacant of any human habitation. Nevertheless, after 1821, Mexico had won its independence.
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
With the establishment of the Republic of Mexico, two independent republics— the English-speaking, overwhelmingly Protestant United States in the north and the Spanish-speaking and mostly Catholic Republic of Mexico to the south—bordered each other at the Sabine River, with settlers from one living in the territory of the other.
Even before Mexican independence, the Spanish government had given Missouri merchant Moses Austin permission to start a colony in Texas, believing that more settlers—whatever their origin—would help stabilize a border area that was far from the population centers of either Mexico or the United States. In 1821, Moses’s son Stephen F. Austin, along with Erasmo Seguin, a Tejano with liberal political views, rode into Texas to build the new settlement. A month later, Austin and his party learned that Mexico had won its independence. Austin then went to Mexico City where he met with Mexico’s new leader Agustin de Iturbide and announced, “I make a tender of my services, my loyalty, and my fidelity to the Constitutional Emperor of Mexico.” Austin’s physical presence in Mexico City and willingness to make an oath of allegiance to the new nation impressed the new government. In April 1823, Austin received confirmation of his claims to a huge swath of land in Texas and his right to act as an empresario, or colonizing agent, for this land. He was the only American to get such rights.
At first, the new American colony grew slowly, but Austin continued to recruit settlers. The Mexican government, aware that it could do little to stop settlement and anxious for a buffer against Indian tribes and the United States, hoped that settlers in Texas would create a stable population of loyal citizens.
Few Europeans and even fewer Mexicans moved into Texas, but Americans came in large numbers. The Tejano community was overwhelmed by the newly arrived Americans. By 1830, 20,000 American colonists had arrived and had brought 2,000 slaves with them. The Americans generally ignored the requirement that they convert to Catholicism, though they did not build Protestant churches, and most absolutely refused to free their slaves in spite of the fact that Mexico had abolished slavery in 1829 and expected the residents of Texas to obey that decree. One American visitor to Texas, Amos Parker, wrote, “A person may travel all day; and day after day, and find Americans only.” Those in the Tejano community were also divided. Many Tejanos profited from trade with the Americans and identified with their independent streak. Others clung to their connection to Mexico. Distance, difficult travel conditions, and an unstable government in Mexico City with more pressing concerns closer to home allowed an American community to develop in Texas that was officially governed by one set of laws but lived by its own rules (see Map 11-2).
The Mexican government’s benign neglect of the American community in Texas ended in 1830 when the Mexican Congress closed Texas to further American immigration and the importation of slaves. Mexico also insisted that trade be routed through established ports further south in Mexico rather than directly between Texas and the United States. The government stationed more soldiers in Texas to enforce the new rules. Austin was stunned, and revolts broke out in the English-speaking colonies, a few of which drew Tejano support.
In 1832 Mexican troops defeated an American effort to take control of an army garrison, but in October, American colonists met at San Felipe and called for autonomy for Texas within the Republic of Mexico. In 1833, they organized an army under the command of Sam Houston and sent Austin to Mexico City to negotiate for them. Tejanos were not represented in these meetings, and most of the 5,000 Tejanos probably opposed these actions. But by now, there were 30,000 Americans in Texas, and the Tejanos were greatly outnumbered. Austin had little success in Mexico City. He was arrested in the fall of 1833 and at the time of his release from jail in the summer of 1835 he wrote, “War is our only recourse. There is no other remedy.” Most Americans in Texas seemed to agree.
empresario
An agent who received a land grant from the Spanish or Mexican government in return for organizing settlements.
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 303
San Francisco „ San Jose Santa Cruz (Branciforte)
PACIFIC
OCEAN
MAP 11-1 Trade networks between Mexico, Texas, and the United States. Mexico (and before it, Spain) had established settlements and trade networks throughout its sparsely populated northern territories. Texas trade ran not only south from San Antonio and Goliad in Texas to Monterrey and other trading centers in Mexico but also east into the United States. Separate networks connected the heartland of Mexico with its settlements in Santa Fe and Taos in New Mexico, with Tucson in the future Arizona, and with the missions and presidios along the coast of California.
■f Mission H Presidio • Town
---- Present-day political boundaries
—— Principal road
Present state names and boundaries
provided for orientation
Indian communities, including
the New Mexico Pueblos, are not shown
border of the territory was disputed. Spain insisted it was the Sabine River (the current border between Louisiana and Texas), but French officials hinted that the United States might claim territory further west. Jefferson had wanted Louisiana to include all of the land from modern-day Texas to the Rio Grande River, but he was not prepared to fight Spain over it. In the Adams-Onis Treaty of 1819, Spain ceded Florida to the United States, along with Spanish claims to Oregon, in exchange for U.S. recognition of the Sabine River as the border between U.S. Louisiana and Spanish Texas, though some in Congress criticized the treaty for that reason. Despite treaties, however, Americans still crossed the Sabine in the early 19th century settling in Texas.
Soon after the Adams-Onis Treaty was signed, a revolutionary uprising began in Mexico. Like the people of the United States, most Mexican citizens wanted to be free of control by a European power. The Mexican revolution against Spanish rule, which lasted from 1810 to 1821, was long and bloody and decimated the Mexican economy.
Tejanos	In Texas, the Mexican population, people known as Tejanos, fell from 4,000 in 1800
People of Spanish or Mexican descent born	to 2,500 in 1821. Comanche and Apache tribes dominated large parts of Texas, and
inTexas*	much of the desert was vacant of any human habitation. Nevertheless, after 1821,
Mexico had won its independence.
302 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
With the establishment of the Republic of Mexico, two independent republics— the English-speaking, overwhelmingly Protestant United States in the north and the Spanish-speaking and mostly Catholic Republic of Mexico to the south—bordered each other at the Sabine River, with settlers from one living in the territory of the other.
Even before Mexican independence, the Spanish government had given Missouri merchant Moses Austin permission to start a colony in Texas, believing that more settlers—whatever their origin—would help stabilize a border area that was far from the population centers of either Mexico or the United States. In 1821, Moses’s son Stephen F. Austin, along with Erasmo Seguin, a Tejano with liberal political views, rode into Texas to build the new settlement. A month later, Austin and his party learned that Mexico had won its independence. Austin then went to Mexico City where he met with Mexico’s new leader Agustin de Iturbide and announced, “I make a tender of my services, my loyalty, and my fidelity to the Constitutional Emperor of Mexico.” Austin’s physical presence in Mexico City and willingness to make an oath of allegiance to the new nation impressed the new government. In April 1823, Austin received confirmation of his claims to a huge swath of land in Texas and his right to act as an empresario, or colonizing agent, for this land. He was the only American to get such rights.
At first, the new American colony grew slowly, but Austin continued to recruit settlers. The Mexican government, aware that it could do little to stop settlement and anxious for a buffer against Indian tribes and the United States, hoped that settlers in Texas would create a stable population of loyal citizens.
Few Europeans and even fewer Mexicans moved into Texas, but Americans came in large numbers. The Tejano community was overwhelmed by the newly arrived Americans. By 1830, 20,000 American colonists had arrived and had brought 2,000 slaves with them. The Americans generally ignored the requirement that they convert to Catholicism, though they did not build Protestant churches, and most absolutely refused to free their slaves in spite of the fact that Mexico had abolished slavery in 1829 and expected the residents of Texas to obey that decree. One American visitor to Texas, Amos Parker, wrote, “A person may travel all day; and day after day, and find Americans only.” Those in the Tejano community were also divided. Many Tejanos profited from trade with the Americans and identified with their independent streak. Others clung to their connection to Mexico. Distance, difficult travel conditions, and an unstable government in Mexico City with more pressing concerns closer to home allowed an American community to develop in Texas that was officially governed by one set of laws but lived by its own rules (see Map 11-2).
The Mexican government’s benign neglect of the American community in Texas ended in 1830 when the Mexican Congress closed Texas to further American immigration and the importation of slaves. Mexico also insisted that trade be routed through established ports further south in Mexico rather than directly between Texas and the United States. The government stationed more soldiers in Texas to enforce the new rules. Austin was stunned, and revolts broke out in the English-speaking colonies, a few of which drew Tejano support.
In 1832 Mexican troops defeated an American effort to take control of an army garrison, but in October, American colonists met at San Felipe and called for autonomy for Texas within the Republic of Mexico. In 1833, they organized an army under the command of Sam Houston and sent Austin to Mexico City to negotiate for them. Tejanos were not represented in these meetings, and most of the 5,000 Tejanos probably opposed these actions. But by now, there were 30,000 Americans in Texas, and the Tejanos were greatly outnumbered. Austin had little success in Mexico City. He was arrested in the fall of 1833 and at the time of his release from jail in the summer of 1835 he wrote, “War is our only recourse. There is no other remedy. Most Americans in Texas seemed to agree.
empresario
An agent who received a land grant from the Spanish or Mexican government in return for organizing settlements.

Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 303
MAP 11-2 Contested boundaries between Texas and Mexico. The borders of Texas were highly contested in the 1830s and 1840s. The Adams-Onis Treaty of 1819 had fixed the border between the two nations as the Sabine River—the border between modern Louisiana and Texas. Austin's land grant from the Mexican government allowed him to settle to the west of that line. Most people considered the Nueces River to be the western border of the Republic of Texas in the 1830s and 1840s, but at President Polk's insistence, the Rio Grande River became the border as a result of the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo in 1848, which tripled the total size of Texas.
Although revolt had been brewing since 1830, the campaign for the independence of Texas became a full-fledged war late in 1835 when American volunteers captured the Alamo fortress at San Antonio de Bexar from its Mexican garrison. In January and February 1836, James Bowie and William Travis took joint command of the Alamo, while another Texian (as the Americans in Texas were called) force remained in the town of Goliad under the command of James Fannin. Austin went to Washington, D.C., to try to secure American support for the insurrection while Sam Houston took command of a volunteer army based at the Texian’s temporary capital of Washington-on-the-Brazos.
In response to these military actions, Mexican president Santa Anna ordered the Mexican army north, capturing the Alamo and killing its defenders in March 1836. After a furious fight, the nearly 200 defenders of the Alamo, including former Tennessee Congressman Davy Crockett, adventurer Jim Bowie, and the garrison’s commander William B. Travis, were killed. It is estimated that 600 Mexican soldiers were also killed in the assault. Ihe defeat and grisly deaths of the Alamo’s outnumbered defenders entered Texas—and American—legend. “Remember the Alamo!” became a rallying cry for the independence of Texas and later in the war with Mexico.
After his victory at the Alamo, Santa Anna marched his army to the second Texan garrison at Goliad, which surrendered in late March. Santa Anna ordered his soldiers to execute all of the Goliad troops and some 341, including the garrison’s commander James Fannin, died on the spot. For some, the phrase quickly became “Remember the Alamo and Goliad.”
While Texian volunteers fought against the Mexican army, political leaders in the American colony met in convention at Washington-on-the-Brazos and on March 2, 1836, declared the independence of the Republic of Texas and adopted a constitution.
Having defeated the insurgent forces at the Alamo and at Goliad, Santa Anna had little use for the Texas declaration. He turned on Sam Houston’s army, the only remaining defenders of the Republic of Texas and its new constitution. Houston, mindful of Santa Anna’s strength, began a slow retreat. Then, after Santa Anna’s troops had been marching for days with an increasingly thin supply line, Houston suddenly turned on them. On April 21, 1836, Houston defeated Santa Anna at the Battle of San Jacinto. Houston’s troops showed no more mercy than Santa Anna had and executed hundreds of Mexican prisoners. The next day, Santa Anna himself was captured and forced to sign the Treaty of Velasco, promising to withdraw all Mexican troops from Texas, end the war, and recognize the independence of Texas. The Mexican Congress refused to recognize the treaty, but neither the Mexican government nor the Texians were in the mood for more fighting.
In the early fall of 1836, Sam Houston, the hero of the Battle of San Jacinto, was elected president of the new republic, defeating Austin, who became secretary of state. Both men, and most of their followers, did not want long-term independence but rather annexation by the United States. However, the United States was a reluctant partner. Texas would be a new huge slave state, and many in Washington worried about the destabilizing impact on the nation of having such a powerful addition to the slave states in the U.S. Senate. In addition, U.S. trade with Mexico was too important to trifle with. Even Andrew Jackson did not want to risk the political cost of annexing Texas, especially in 1836 when Martin Van Buren, his handpicked successor, was in the midst of the presidential election. After the election, Jackson, a good friend of
Alamo
A
Franciscan mission at San Antonio, Texas, that was the site in 1836 of a siege and massacre of Texans by Mexican troops. 304
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Sam Houston, officially recognized the Republic of Texas, but that was as far as its neighbor to the north would go. The Texas Republic would stand on its own for the immediate future.
Distant California
While Texas was declaring its independence from Mexico, Alta California, as it was known to distinguish it from Baja California to the south, was a sleepy and distant outpost of the Republic of Mexico, and most people in Mexico and the United States were content to leave it that way. California had wonderful harbors, large and prosperous rancheros, and a string of missions, but it was a long way from the heart of either nation. In the 1830s, the population there included not only Mexicans, most of whom valued self-government in local matters and cared little for the authorities in Mexico City, but also a much smaller number of Americans. Neither group was thinking seriously about independence. A majority among the declining number of American Indians in California were doing their best to maintain their tribal ways and keep their distance from both Mexican and American settlers, though some of them were living under the supervision of the missions.
Although Spanish explorers had sailed the coast of California and claimed the lands in the 16th century, meaningful European settlements in California began only in the mid-18th century, just before the American Revolution. In 1769, a Franciscan priest, Father Junipero Serra, was sent to Alta California with instructions to found a chain of missions that would aid in converting the California Indians to Catholic Christianity, put them to work for the Spanish, and establish a stronger Spanish presence to protect against possible Russian expansion.
Father Serra and his Franciscan successors succeeded in establishing a chain of missions stretching from San Diego to San Francisco. The Franciscan friars meant to save the Indian souls and bring them the gifts of Spanish culture, but they also worked them hard to ensure a good economic return for the missions, maintaining tight control and a tough discipline. One of the Franciscan friars noted, however, that the Indians “live well free but as soon as we reduce them to a Christian and community life... they fatten, sicken, and die.” When Serra arrived in California, there were probably 300,000 Indians in the area, but by the time Spanish rule ended in 1821, that number had been reduced to 200,000. From the Spanish government’s perspective, however, the missions were significant in asserting sovereignty as they controlled the Indian work force and managed the colony’s cattle, grain, and trade.
The Franciscans administered the California missions until 1833 when the Mexican government, which had seized power from Spain in 1821, transferred ownership of the missions from church to state and eventually to private hands. Mexico’s revolution was partly a rejection not only of Spanish royal authority but also of the power of the Catholic Church, and seizing the missions was a means to that end. Missions were sold off or awarded to powerful ranchers.
As late as 1821, California’s total Mexican population was about 3,000, though it grew to between 10,000 and 15,000 by 1846. The majority lived on large ranches spread along the coast. Some few immigrants from the United States also moved to California in these years. Most of the Americans arriving before 1840 learned Spanish, converted to Catholicism, took on Mexican citizenship, and became part of the local culture of Alta California.
Beginning in the 1840s, however, a different group of immigrants from the United States began to arrive who were more interested in making California part of the United States. Even before the war with Mexico began, President Polk, well aware of the interests of these recent immigrants to California, told Congress that California s harbors “would afford shelter for our navy, for our numerous whale ships, and other merchant vessels employed in the Pacific Ocean, and would in a short period become the marts of an extensive and profitable commerce with China, and other countries of
Chapter 11
11.1
112
An early photograph of a young Mexican American woman illustrates some of the comfort and confidence that the Californios had before their homes became part of the United States. Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 305

American Voices
Eulalia Perez, Memories of Mexican California, ca. 1830s
ulalia Perez was born about 1768 in Baja California. She and her husband first moved to the Alta California mission of San Diego and then to San Gabriel near Los Angeles. At San Gabriel, the priests selected her as cook for the mission where she also served as a midwife and eventually "keeper of the keys" or mayordoma— head of the mission household. Perez lived a long life, and in 1877, a historian at the University of California interviewed her on her memories of a much earlier era in California history. Her account provides a rare glimpse of mission life in California before that area's acquisition by the United States.
When we arrived here, Father Jose Sanchez lodged me and my family temporarily in a small house until work could be found for me....He, as well as his companion Father Jose Maria Zalvidea, treated the Indians very well, and the two were much loved by the Spanish-speaking people and by the neophytes [Indians recently converted to Christianity] and other Indians.
Father Zalvidea introduced many improvements in the Mission of San Gabriel and made it progress a very great deal in every way. Not content with providing abundantly for the neophytes, he planted [fruit] trees in the mountains, far away from the mission, in order that the untamed Indians might have food when they passed by those spots....
In the morning the girls were let out. First they went to Father Zalvidea's Mass, for he spoke the Indian language; afterwards they went to the mess hut to have breakfast, which sometimes consisted of corn gruel with chocolate, and on holidays with sweets and bread. On other days, ordinarily they had boiled barley and beans and meat. After breakfast each girl began the task that had been assigned to her beforehand—sometimes it was at the looms, or unloading, or sewing, or whatever there was to be done....
The Indians were taught the various jobs for which they showed an aptitude. Others worked in the fields, or took care of the horses, cattle, etc. Still others were carters, oxherds, etc.... The Indians also were taught to pray. A few of the more intelligent ones were taught to read and write. Father Zalvidea taught the Indians to pray in their Indian tongue; some Indians learned music and played instruments and sang at Mass. The sextons and pages who helped with Mass were Indians of the mission.
The punishments that were meted out were the stocks and confinement. When the misdemeanor was serious, the delinquent was taken to the guard, where they tied him to a pipe or a post and gave him twenty-five or more lashes, depending on his crime. Sometimes they put them in the head-stocks; other times they passed a musket from one leg to the other and fastened it there, and also they tied their hands. That punishment, called "the Law of Bayone," was very painful. But Fathers Sanchez and Zalvidea were always very considerate with the Indians. I would not want to say what others did because they did not live in the mission.
Source: Eulalia Perez, from an original manuscript in Spanish in the Bancroft Library, University of California, Berkeley originally written in 1877 and published in Nancy F. Cott, et al, Roots of Bitterness: Documents of the Social History of American Women (Boston: Northeastern University Press, 1996), pp. 185-192.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
How would you characterize Perez's view of the mission system? How did she respond to its coercive elements?
2.	Historical Interpretation
What assumptions about Indian peoples underlie Perez's account? What to her were the signs of progress in California?
the East. Polks Secretary of the Navy George Bancroft anticipated the coming of war with Mexico and ordered Commodore John D. Sloat, commander of the U.S. Pacific squadron, based in the nation of Hawaii, to land in San Francisco if war came. At the same time, U.S. Army Captain John C. Fremont led what he claimed was a military map-making expedition overland from St. Louis, arriving in Monterey, California, in late December 1845. Fremont told the Mexican authorities he was simply exploring. They had their doubts that he was just making maps—doubts that later turned out to be well founded—but allowed him to remain. Then in April 1846, a U.S. warship arrived at Monterey, with orders for Fremont and the U.S. counsel in California, Thomas Oliver Larkin, to stir up a pro-American revolt in California. The once distant outpost was quickly becoming an important focus of attention in the growing tensions between the United States and Mexico.
Manifest Destiny and American Presidential Politics
The creation of the Democratic Party as a vehicle to continue his political philosophy and support his handpicked successors was one of Jacksons most significant achievements.
,	.	1116 twin Pillars on which the party rested were a small federal government and the idea of
306 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Manifest Destiny. The political parties that had emerged from the John Adams-Thomas Jefferson presidential election—the Federalists and the Democratic-Republicans —were long gone. Americas founding generation, including all presidents up to John Quincy Adams, disliked party spirit, even if they accepted that spirit when it helped them. Martin Van Buren, who had built on the base of the older Democratic-Republican organizations to create the new Democratic Party that elected Jackson and who followed him as its candidate, had no such reservations. He thought it best “to deal with the subject of Political Parties in a sincerer and wiser spirit—to recognize their necessity [and] to give them the credit they deserve.”
As part of their effort to build a strong political party, Jackson and Van Buren called the first national political convention to be held by a major party. The event was held in Baltimore in 1835, a year before the presidential election. (The small Anti-Masonic Party actually held the first national political convention, modeled on a religious revival in 1831, but it won only seven electoral votes in the 1832 election and faded from national prominence thereafter.) The Democrats borrowed the idea of a national convention as part of their preparation for the 1836 election, and their tight political organization allowed the Democrats to win most presidential contests until the Civil War when the party splintered. At the 1835 convention, Jackson stage-managed Van Buren’s nomination as the Democratic party’s candidate for what some said was basically a third term for Jackson. The outgoing president also managed to ensure the nomination of his hand-picked candidate for vice president, Richard Mentor Johnson of Kentucky, in spite of an effort by Virginias delegates to derail his nomination.
Ihe core principle of the emerging Whig Party was opposition to Jackson, though it also wanted a larger federal government that could manage internal improvements. The Whigs continued to support a Bank of the United States. But the Whigs disliked Van Buren’s ideas of political parties and continued to distrust the growing sense of party spirit, or at least said that they did. Given this distrust, the Whigs were not well enough organized to have a national convention in preparation for the 1836 election relying instead on state conventions. They reasoned that, even if the various states did not nominate the same candidate for president, they might use a number of popular candidates to gain enough electoral votes to throw the election into the House of Representatives where they were confident they could control the outcome. Having lost decisively with Henry Clay in 1832, most Whig leaders wanted a different candidate. One choice, popular in the North and West, was William Henry Harrison, who had won as many battles as Jackson during the War of 1812. Some states duly nominated Harrison, and Clay reluctantly supported him. Southern Whigs nominated Hugh Lawson White of Tennessee, who agreed with Jackson on many issues but had broken with him over what he saw as Jackson’s abuse of power. Whigs in Massachusetts went their own way with Senator Daniel Webster. The Whig effort to appeal to diverse constituencies with different candidates failed. In November 1836, the Jackson magic stuck to Van Buren and he received 50.79 percent of the popular vote and 170 electoral votes against 124 votes scattered among the three Whig candidates.
Van Buren faced several challenges as he began to govern. He pledged to continue Jackson’s policies and did so, in particular, presiding over the final removal of the Cherokees to Oklahoma and a long and bloody war against Seminoles in Florida. Given his difficulties with the Seminoles, Van Buren decided against removing Iroquois tribes from New York. He avoided a war with Britain when rebels in Canada recruited volunteers along the American side of the Great Lakes. In spite of his ties to the party of Manifest Destiny, he had no inclination to deal with Texas or Oregon.
In addition, issues of nullification and abolitionism continued, unresolved. Like Jackson, Van Buren opposed nullification or any effort to disrupt the Union. He also opposed abolitionism, which, despite his northern roots, he saw as another attack on the Union along with nullification. Southerners supported Van Buren, and he repaid them by supporting a gag rule in Congress. The Constitution gave all citizens the
Chapter 11
gag rule
A procedural rule passed in the House of Representatives that prevented discussion of antislavery petitions from 1836 to 1844.
Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 307
Panic of 1837
A major economic downturn brought on by temporary excesses in international trade and the inability of the United States to control the currency or make credit available after the closing of the Second Bank of the United States.
Specie Circular
A proclamation issued by President Andrew Jackson in 1836 stipulating that only gold or silver could be used as payment for public land.
right to “petition the government for a redress of grievances, and abolitionists had begun flooding the House and Senate with antislavery petitions. Ihe gag rule was a promise by congressional leaders in the House of Representatives to ignore the abolitionist petitions. In the end, the gag rule only highlighted the divisions over slavery. As a member of the House, John Quincy Adams took it upon himself to undermine the rule in every possible way. He saw it as a limitation on the constitutional rights of abolitionists, and they came to view him as “Old Man Eloquent.” Through the 1830s and 1840s, Adams and a handful of like-minded Whigs began to introduce antislavery petitions at each session of Congress before the House adopted its rules, including the gag rule. Then, during sessions, he regularly interrupted other debates to ask the Speaker whether this or that petition ran afoul of the gag rule while knowing full well that it did but using the occasion to describe both the petition and the gag rule. Perhaps more effectively than if there had been no rule, Adams used these manipulations of the gag rule to change public opinion on slavery, even if he could not get the votes he wanted from the House.
Most challenging for Van Buren’s political fortunes, however, was the fact that some of the economic policies Jackson had advocated had their greatest impact during Van Buren’s term and it was not a good one. Only 2 months after Van Buren’s inauguration, the Panic of 1837 hit the country. The initial cause of the panic was a sudden drying up of credit. Without the ability to borrow money, cotton brokers failed, banks failed, and the great New York mercantile house of Arthur Tappan and Company failed. In his hatred of banks and distrust of debt, Jackson had paid off the national debt—sending a great deal of U.S. currency to bond holders in Britain and reducing the currency available in the United States. Jackson also had closed the Second Bank of the United States, which had held the ability to expand credit when it was needed. In addition, he had issued a Specie Circular in 1836, requiring speculators to pay for federal land in silver or gold coinage, not bank notes. The Specie Circular reflected Jackson’s distrust of banks, but once the economy began to decline in 1837, many Americans started to think that if the U.S. government would not trust bank notes, then they should not either. There was a run on banks, and few banks had sufficient reserves of silver and gold to redeem all of the bank notes they had issued. Banks failed, and credit became even scarcer, crippling the economy.
Soon after Jackson left office, the Panic of 1837, which many blamed on him, wracked the nation. In this political cartoon, the results of Jackson's economic policies are shown as drunkenness, women begging a rich banker for money, and long lines of the unemployed.
308 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
A second panic hit in 1839, this one the result of overspeculation in cotton and cotton-producing land. When British investments and international trade stalled, the value of cotton, land, and slaves all plummeted. The sale of public lands, and federal revenue from these sales, virtually stopped. Northern textile and shoe industries laid off thousands of workers. More banks closed. The panic lasted until 1843 and was arguably as severe as any economic downturn before the Great Depression of the 1930s.
Given his Jacksonian commitment to small government, there was little that Van Buren could or would do about the economy. His position enabled the Whigs in the 1840 election to describe him as “cold and heartless.” The Whigs had also learned from the Democrats. In 1840, they held a single national convention that unified them behind one candidate. For a second time, they pinned their hopes on the aging war hero William Henry Harrison, despite Clay’s effort to secure the nomination for himself. They nominated John Tyler of Virginia, who had served as governor and senator, for vice president, an ill-fated choice. Tyler brought balance to the ticket—he was from the South while Harrison was from the North, and at age 50, he was much younger than the 68-year-old Harrison. But Tyler was a Whig only because he found Jackson “high handed,” not because he disagreed with most of his policies. The 1840 political campaign pitted Martin Van Buren, running for a second term, against “Tippecanoe and Tyler Too,” a reference to Harrison’s victory at the Battle of Tippecanoe in 1811. This time, the Whigs won with 52.8 percent of the popular votes and 234 electoral votes against only 60 for Van Buren. But the high expectations for the Whig presidency would not last long.
At his inauguration in March 1841, Harrison delivered a long address laying out the Whig agenda; in fact, it was the longest inaugural address in American presidential history. The day was cold and blustery, and Harrison did not wear a coat. He caught a bad cold that turned to pneumonia. A month later, President Harrison was dead and Tyler was president. This instance marked the first time a president had died in office, and Tyler made it clear that he was not just an “acting president” but that he had inherited the presidency for the full term. A worse disaster for the Whig Party was hard to imagine. The election of 1840 was the only time when the country elected a Whig president and Whig majorities in both houses of Congress. After only a month into the new administration, “Tyler Too,” who shared little of the Whig agenda beyond an intense dislike of Andrew Jackson and an interest in holding office, was president.
Before he became seriously ill, President Harrison had called a special session of Congress to deal with the economic crisis. When the Whig-dominated Congress convened, it re-created the Bank of the United States so that there could be federal control of the currency and credit, thus easing economic conditions that had been created when the bank had been abolished. President Tyler, a believer in small government every bit as much as Jackson or Van Buren, vetoed the bill. Congress then created a “fiscal corporation” that would have more limited powers. Tyler vetoed that, too. Tyler did sign the Land Act of 1841, which made it much easier for homesteaders to buy federal land or keep land on which they were squatters, and he signed the first federal Bankruptcy Act. But the Whigs were furious at Tyler. In September 1841, the entire cabinet except for Secretary of State Daniel Webster resigned in protest over the veto of the bank bills, and the Whig congressional caucus expelled Tyler from the party, marking the only time in U.S. history that a president was expelled from his own political party.
Expanding the size of the United States remained an issue throughout the Tyler presidency. Webster had refused to resign as secretary of state primarily because he was negotiating with Britain to resolve a dispute that came dangerously close to war over where to locate the border between Maine and Canada. The Webster-Ashburton Treaty of 1842 resolved the border with Canada as far west as Minnesota. Tyler supported Webster because he did not want problems with Britain when he turned to his real priority—Texas.
11.1
1 n.2
J 11,3
Webster-Ashburton Treaty
The treaty signed by the United States and Britain in 1842 that settled a boundary dispute between the United States and Canada and provided for closer cooperation in suppressing the African slave trade.
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 309
Tyler had two paramount goals—the annexation of Texas and his own reelection. He failed at the latter but not the former. In September 1843, Tyler began secret negotiations with Texas over annexation. In April 1844, Tyler’s new Secretary of State John C. Calhoun, who was also a Whig only because of his hatred for Jackson over the nullification issue, presented a treaty to the Senate for the annexation of Texas. Calhoun justified the treaty in explicitly proslavery terms, insisting that if the United States did not annex Texas as a slave state, Britain would take it over and end slavery there, blocking the expansion of U.S. slavery. But the nation’s leading Whig, Henry Clay, and former Democratic President Martin Van Buren both announced their opposition to annexation largely because of slavery. The Senate rejected the treaty by an overwhelming vote of 35 to 16.
Ihe link between Texas and slavery doomed the presidential hopes of both Tyler and Calhoun since both were seen as using a political gimmick to gain their way. The Whigs nominated their old hero Henry Clay. Having been expelled by the Whigs, Tyler tried for the Democratic nomination, but the party spurned him. Jackson still dominated the Democratic Party. He would not allow Tyler to be their candidate, and Jackson was furious at Van Buren over Van Buren’s opposition to the annexation of Texas. As a result, the Democrats ended up nominating Jackson’s choice, a political unknown, James K. Polk of Tennessee, instead of their own former president Martin Van Buren.
James K. Polk was a true “dark horse” in American presidential politics. He had served as speaker of the house from 1835 to 1839 but had twice been defeated for governor of Tennessee. Few besides Jackson thought he would be president. His Whig opponent, Henry Clay, was one of the best-known political leaders in the United States. If Van Buren had been the Democratic nominee, the election would have been fought over Clay’s support for federally financed internal improvements and his advocacy for the Bank of the United States, both of which Van Buren opposed. Polk’s nomination changed everything. The Democratic Party platform called for “the reoccupation of Oregon and the reannexation of Texas.” With Polk as their nominee, the Democrats planned to focus the election on Manifest Destiny, claiming that they were the party of national expansion while painting the Whigs as timid defenders of the status quo. This focus on Manifest Destiny, especially as it applied to Texas, assured Polk the support not only of Jackson but also of President Tyler and of Calhoun’s pro-slavery partners who included both Whigs and Democrats in the South. Many Catholics also saw the Whigs as a Protestant party, while the Democrats courted Catholic voters, especially recent immigrants. Most of the country’s Catholics voted Democratic, especially in Pennsylvania and New York. In the end, Polk won 170 electoral votes to 105 for Clay. Expansion in Oregon and Texas was going to be at the top of Polk’s agenda.
Because the new president would not take office until March 4 (the practice from the country’s beginning until passage of the Twentieth Amendment in 1933), Tyler still had 4 months to serve in office. He did not waste them. When the Senate had rejected the annexation of Texas in 1844, it had rejected a treaty with the Republic of Texas. But the Constitution provided that while treaties had to be ratified by two-thirds of the Senate, a new state could be admitted by a majority vote in each house of Congress. Up to this point, all new states had been U.S. territories, not separate sovereign countries. There was no precedent for incorporating another country into the United States. Now Tyler, with Jackson’s advice and Polk’s support, tried a new approach: simply admit Texas as a state. The idea worked. Instead of a treaty with Texas, which required a two-thirds vote in the Senate that Tyler could not get, both houses of Congress passed a resolution admitting Texas as a state in February 1845, leaving it to the president to negotiate the Texas border with Mexico (see Map 11-2). Five senators, led by Missouri s Thomas Hart Benton, who had opposed annexation, now supported the statehood resolution based on a promise that President Polk would conduct the negotiations about the Texas border. Tyler did not feel bound by the promise. On March 1, 1845, with 4 days left in office, Tyler signed the resolution admitting Texas, sent envoys to Texas
310 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
offering immediate statehood without any negotiations, and held a gala White House party to celebrate the admission of the new state to the union. Benton was furious, and most Whigs were equally distraught. Three days later on March 4, 1845, James K. Polk was inaugurated as president of a nation that considered Texas to be one of its states, even if Mexico did not agree.
54° 40' or Fight—The United States and Oregon
Until the mid-1830s, few Americans had followed the route of the Lewis and Clark expedition and explored or settled in Oregon. The Canadian Hudsons Bay Company dominated the fur business in Oregon, and Indian tribes traded furs to the company for rifles and other goods. While American political debates seemed fixated on Texas, Oregon was generally ignored by the press or in Congress. The lack of interest in Oregon began to change in July 1836 when some 70 people traveled through a pass in the Rocky Mountains into what is now Wyoming. Some of the group, including four Protestant missionaries, settled in the fertile farming areas of the Willamette Valley south of the Columbia River in present-day Oregon. Two of those missionaries, Marcus and Narcissa Whitman, also became first-rate publicists for beauties of the Oregon Territory (see Map 11-3).
11.1
’ Oregon Trail	—»* Southern Overland Trail
’ Bozeman Trail —« Old Spanish Trail ' California Trail —— Taos Trail ' Mormon Trail — Santa Fe Trail
MAP 11-3 Westward Trails. Beginning at places like St. Louis or Independence, Missouri, or Council Bluffs,
Iowa, a variety of trails were used by early American migrants seeking new homes in not only Oregon but
also territory claimed by the Republic of Mexico from Texas to California.
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 311
American Voices
The Letters of Narcissa Whitman, 1836-1847
arcissa Whitman and her physician husband Marcus were sent by the American Board of Commissioners for Foreign Missions to establish a mission to the Cayuse Indians near what is now Walla Walla, Washington, in 1836. The mission converted few Cayuse. But Narcissa's letters home and her husband's speaking tours encouraged white settlement in the Oregon territory, settlement that alienated Indians but led to a strong American presence in the area. Although the letters were filled with descriptions of the hardships of the journey across the Rocky Mountains and the difficulty of life in Oregon, Narcissa's praise of the beauty and fertility of the land made the greatest impact.
September 12. [1836] What a delightful place this is; what a contrast to the rough, barren sand plains, through which we had so recently passed. Here we find fruit of every description, apples, peaches, grapes, pears, plums, and fig trees in abundance; also cucumbers, melons, beans, peas, beets, cabbage, tomatoes and every kind of vegetable too numerous to be mentioned. Every part is very neat and tastefully arranged, with fine walks, lined on each side with strawberry vines. At the opposite end of the garden is a good summer house covered with grape vines.
Dec. 26th. [1836] It is indeed, a lovely situation. We are on a beautiful level—a peninsula formed by the branches of the Walla Walla river, upon the base of which our house stands, on the southeast corner, near the shore of the main river. To run a fence across to the opposite river, on the north from our house—this, with the river, would enclose 300 acres of good land for cultivation, all directly under the eye. The rivers are barely skirted with timber. This is all the woodland we can see; beyond them, as far as the eye can reach, plains and mountains appear. On the east, a few rods from the house, is a range of small hills, covered with bunchgrass—a very excellent food for animals, and upon which they subsist during winter, even digging it from under the snow.
Waiilatpu, Oregon Territory [The Whitman Mission near Walla Walla]
August 23. [1847] For the last two weeks immigrants have been passing, probably 80 or 100 wagons have already passed and 1,000 are said to be on the road, besides the Mormons.. .The poor Indians are amazed at the overwhelming numbers of Americans coming into the country. They seem not to know what to make of it. Very many of the principal ones are dying, and...[t]he remaining ones seem attached to us, and cling to us the closer; cultivate their farms quite extensively, and do not wish to see any Sniapus (Americans) settle among them here.
The Cayuse Indians, who were the focus of the Whitman Mission, were indeed "amazed at the overwhelming numbers of Americans coming into the country." When, as a result of the immigration, a measles epidemic struck in 1847, the amazement turned to anger. The Whitmans provided medical care to Indian and white children, but many Cayuse still died. In November 1847, the Cayuse Chief Tiloukaikt led a party that killed both Whitmans and burned the mission. In response, a white militia attacked the Cayuse. Two years later, Tiloukaikt was executed for the murder of the Whitmans. From the gallows he said, "Did not your missionaries teach us that Christ died to save his people? So we die to save our people." Disease and white raids so weakened the Cayuse that they could not continue as an independent nation, and they merged into the Nez Perce and Yakima tribes.
Source: www.pbs.org/weta/thewest/program/resources/archives/two/whitman 1 .htm#120536 www.pbs.org/weta/thewest/program/resources/archives/twowhitman2.htm#040447 The Letters of Narcissa Whitman, 1836-1847 (Fairfield, WA: YeGalleon Press, 1986).
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
On what aspects of the land did Narcissa focus? Why?
2.	Comparison
How might the Cayuse Indians have seen the land? How might their view have differed from that of Narcissa?
The Whitmans’ letters about Oregon did much to attract further American settlement, but the claim to the Oregon Territory had been shared by the United States and Britain since a series of treaties negotiated by then Secretary of State John Quincy Adams between 1818 and 1824 created the joint American-British governance of Oregon (see Chapter 8). The Oregon Territory stretched along the Pacific coast from the northern border of Spanish-Mexican California to the southern border of what was then Russian America, (now Alaska) and included the present U.S. states of Oregon, Washington, and Idaho as well as the Canadian province of British Columbia and the Yukon Territory. By the 1840s, both governments wanted to resolve the border and end the joint ownership of the territory.
In the Webster-Ashburton Treaty of 1842, the United States and Britain had already negotiated a U.S.-Canadian border at the 49th parallel from the Great Lakes west to the beginning of Oregon. Continuing that border west would split the Oregon Territory
312 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
114
Fort Vancouver on the north shore of the Columbia River in present day Washington state was a beautiful site, shown in this 1848 lithograph, after an 1845 drawing by Lieutenant Henry J. Warre of Native Americans gathered in front of the fort. Pictures like this, along with Narcissa Whitman's letters did much to popularize the Oregon-Washington region.

between the two countries. Tyler’s ambassador in London proposed making the 49th parallel the boundary all the way to the Pacific but giving the British the southern tip of Vancouver Island, sliced by the 49th parallel, and giving both countries the right to navigate the Juan de Fuca Strait between Vancouver and the mainland. It seemed like a straightforward compromise. Polk, however, wanted more, or pretended to.
In his 1844 campaign, Polk promised to win all of Oregon up to the Alaskan border, or 54°40' in terms of latitude. But Polk needed his army for the war that he expected to have with Mexico and did not want to fight Britain, too. The coalition that elected him was divided about Oregon. Calhoun and the southern planters would have happily given all of Oregon to Britain. They did not want a war or even tension to interrupt the cotton trade with Britain that was making the South wealthy. In addition, from Calhoun’s perspective, any future states carved out of the Oregon Territory would most likely be free states, tipping the balance in the Senate against southern interests. But Missouri’s powerful Senator Thomas Hart Benton was growing fond of Oregon because the trail from Independence, Missouri, to Oregon was adding wealth to his state. Polk had promised 54°40', and Benton meant to hold him to it. John Quincy Adams, now a power in the House of Representatives, agreed with Benton. Although he was opposed to annexing Texas because of slavery, Adams was still an American expansionist, he liked the region for all the reasons Calhoun disliked it, and he wanted Oregon in the Union.
The British government, led by Prime Minister Sir Robert Peel, also wanted compromise that would support the Hudson’s Bay Company but guarantee an uninterrupted flow of American cotton to British mills and avoid war with the United States. Peel also faced other issues that were more pressing than Oregon. But others in London wanted more of Oregon and insisted that the southern border of British
Oregon should be the Columbia River, which created the so-called “disputed triangle °f land that both nations claimed.
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 313
———
11.1
n.2
Ihe Peel and Polk administrations eventually compromised along the 49th parallel (the current border) in spring 1846. The agreement was an obvious compromise, particularly for the United States, but it meant that the United States was free to pursue actions that Polk considered more important. As the Democratic New York Herald said, “We can now thrash Mexico into decency at our leisure.”
113
11.1
Quick Review Why was annexing Texas more controversial than dividing the Oregon Territory? Discuss at least two major factors.
THE U.S. WAR WITH MEXICO,
1846-1848 n.2
Analyze the causes, strategies, and outcomes of the U.S. War with Mexico.
Two years before Presidents Tyler and Polk had managed the U.S. annexation of Texas, Mexico had warned the United States that such a move would mean war because Mexico still claimed the territory. One week after Tyler signed the annexation legislation, the Mexican ambassador in Washington declared the move “an act of aggression,” and Mexico severed diplomatic relations with the United States.
Although the vote to make Texas a state of the United States was passed and celebrated in Washington in March of 1845, Texas did not ratify the agreement until July 1845, and Congress did not ratify the Texas decision until December. Meanwhile, Mexican President Jose Joaquin Herrera, a political moderate, agreed to negotiate with the United States. He knew his country did not have the resources to fight a war, but he also knew that public opinion in his country would never accept the loss of Texas, particularly the larger area of Texas going all the way to the Rio Grande that the United States now claimed. Polk sent former Louisiana Congressman John Slidell to Mexico City to negotiate.
Fighting the War in Texas and Mexico, Responding to Resistance
Although there were tensions between Americans and the government of Mexico from Texas to California, the heart of the concerns in 1846 had to do with Texas. While leaders in both countries negotiated about whether the United States could annex Texas, another question loomed: just what constituted Texas? The Republic of Texas had never governed any land west of the Nueces River. Many in the United States and Mexico considered that river to be the western boundary of Texas. But Polk and many Texans claimed that the Rio Grande was the border, a claim that made Texas a much bigger state (see Map 11-2). Herrera would never accept that claim. Moreover, Polk really wanted not only Texas as far as the Rio Grande but also New Mexico and California. He would purchase it if he could, but he also considered a war as a viable way to secure that land.
While the negotiations continued, Polk ordered General Zachary Taylor to cross the Louisiana-Texas border at the Sabine River in June 1845 and from there continue to approach as near the boundary line, the Rio Grande, as prudence will dictate.” Taylor was indeed a prudent general, and he initially moved only as far as the Nueces where he halted at Corpus Christi to train his 4,000 troops. But his orders were clear: any Mexican movement across the Rio Grande would be considered an act of war. It took almost a year for Polk to get his war, but in April 1846, Taylor’s army moved to the northern edge of the Rio Grande. On April 25,1846,11 Americans were killed in a battle with Mexican troops who had crossed the Rio Grande. Polk was delighted when Taylor reported that hostilities may now be considered as commenced.” In his war message to Congress on May 11,1846, Polk said, “Mexico.. .has invaded our territory and shed American blood upon the American soil... .War exists.. .by the act of Mexico herself.”
314 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
The artist Richard Caton Woodville's painting War News from Mexico captured the interest and, in some cases, surprise that came as news of the war reached people in most parts of the United States much more quickly than ever before, thanks primarily to the spread of telegraph lines that transmitted information faster than ever previously possible.
Not everyone in Congress agreed. Most Whigs opposed war, though they wanted to support the American troops who might be in harm’s way and worried about being seen as unpatriotic. Kentucky Whig Garrett David said, “It is our own President who began this war. He has been carrying it on for months.” Ihe key vote on the war passed the House 123 to 67, though many Democrats did not want to be seen as opposing their party’s president and a subsequent vote formalizing the declaration of war carried the House by 174 to 14 with 35 abstentions. In the Senate, the key test of strength carried only by 26 to 20, but a subsequent vote that included funds financing the war carried 40 to 2 with 3 abstentions. President Polk declared that a state ofwar existed between the United States and Mexico on May 13,1846.
The war that a divided Congress declared was fought by a divided nation. Polk and his supporters expected a quick victory. Senator Thomas Hart Benton wrote that the president wanted “a small war, just large enough to require a treaty of peace, and not large enough to make military reputations dangerous for the presidency.” Polk got a longer and more costly war than he bargained for—one that also produced more military heroes.
The war provoked strong opposition. A decade before it began, John Quincy Adams warned Congress that the annexation of Texas would bring on a war in which the United States would be in the wrong, saying:
“Sirs, the banners of freedom will be the banners of Mexico; and your banners, I blush to speak the word, will be the banners of slavery.” A decade later, Adams voted against the war in the House of Representatives.
Once the war began, others, including Congressman Abraham Lincoln
of Illinois, joined Adams in opposition. An aspiring Whig politician from Illinois, Lincoln voiced his suspicions about the war. He thought that President Polk “is deeply conscious of being in the wrong.. .that he ordered General Taylor into the midst of a peaceful Mexican settlement, purposely to bring on a war.” Some of those in the field agreed. In Texas, a young Lieutenant Colonel Ethan Hitchcock noted in his diary that “It looks as if the government sent a small force on purpose to bring on a war, so as to have a pretext fort taking California and as much of this country as it chooses.”
Perhaps the most influential response to the war with Mexico came from a poet rather than a politician. While he is remembered today mostly for his reflective stay at Walden Pond, Henry David Thoreau also believed that the war with Mexico was immoral. In a pamphlet titled Civil Disobedience, Thoreau wrote, “I meet this American government, or its representative the State government, directly, and face to face, once a year, no more, in the person of its tax-gatherer.” Thoreau saw the demand for his tax money as the opportunity to resist what he saw as the government s injustice and refused to pay his tax, a portion of which would go to support what he considered to be an unjust and immoral war. He was arrested and spent a night in the town jail in Concord before someone, to his frustration, paid the tax for him. But his willingness to face arrest for his convictions and the pamphlet that he wrote explaining his actions made Thoreau not only one of the most famous opponents of the War with Mexico but a model of civil disobedience for generations to come, in the United States and elsewhere.
In the first battles of the war, Taylor defeated a larger Mexican force and occupied Ihe Mexican town of Matamoros in May 1846. The Mexican army fought bravely, but the Americans had superior technology-rifles that shot farther and better artillery.
The U.S. Navy blockaded Mexican ports on the Gulf and Pacific coasts, so Mexico could not import supplies from abroad. Taylor’s army moved slowly into Mexico, but heat and disease took a heavier toll than battles. One in eight U.S. soldiers died in a 6 week encampment in the Mexican city of Camargo even though no battles took place there. If the troops, especially the volunteers, had learned to fill canteens upstream
from where horses were washed, the death toll would have been far lower. Then in
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 315
rti;
THINKING HISTORICALLY
Considering Henry David Thoreau
Henry David Thoreau (1817-1862) published "On the Duty of Civil Disobedience" in 1849. The essay has at least two themes: Thoreau's opposition to most, if not all, government and his belief that civil disobedience—in this case breaking an immoral law—was the right thing to do. Thoreau's belief in civil disobedience—refusing to obey an unjust law and a willingness to face the consequences—have made Thoreau a model for others who advocated civil disobedience, including Martin Luther King, Jr. (1929-1968) in the United States and Mohandas Gandhi (1869-1948), who led the nonviolent protests that eventually won India independence from Great Britain, both of whom cited Thoreau.
But Thoreau's arguments are complex and many who may agree with some of what he might say would reject other aspects of his essay. In the essay he begins by arguing:
/ heartily accept the motto, "That government is best which governs least"; and I should like to see it acted up to more rapidly and systematically. Carried out, it finally amounts to this, which also I believe—"That government is best which governs not at all"; and when men are prepared for it, that will be the kind of government which they will have. Government is at best but an expedient; but most governments are usually, and all governments are sometimes, inexpedient. The objections which have been brought against a standing army, and they are many and weighty, and deserve to prevail, may also at last be brought against a standing government.
He then moves on to his specific critique of the war with Mexico and his appeal for resistance:
How does it become a man to behave toward the American government today? I answer, that he cannot without disgrace be associated with it. I cannot for an instant recognize that political organization as my government which is the slave's government also.... Under a government which imprisons unjustly, the true place for a just man is also a prison. The proper place today, the only place which Massachusetts has provided for her freer and less despondent spirits, is in her prisons, to be put out and locked out of the State by her own act, as they have already put themselves out by their principles.
It is there that the fugitive slave, and the Mexican prisoner on parole, and the Indian come to plead the wrongs of his race should find them; on that separate but more
^^aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaam
free and honorable ground, where the State places those who are not with her, but against her—the only house in a slave State in which a free man can abide with honor.
Finally, he says he is not willing to be like "the thousands who are in opinion opposed to slavery and to the war, who yet in effect do nothing."Thoreau refused to pay taxes to support the war and was jailed for his crime of conscience.
While Thoreau's words and actions were widely praised by some and condemned by others, the arguments also involved significant internal differences:
•	Some who agreed with Thoreau in his opposition to the war were not willing to risk jail as he was and did not think it was necessary to do so or indeed proper to break the law as he did.
•	Some who agreed with Thoreau in his opposition to the war also disagreed with his critique of all government and would never echo Thoreau's words, "The objections which have been brought against a standing army, and they are many and weighty, and deserve to prevail, may also at last be brought against a standing government." Indeed, many have criticized Thoreau for being a philosopher of excessive individualism-advocating the moral worth of the individual over the state or a social group—a stance that observers from Tocqueville to the present have criticized the United States for representing.
Source: Henry David Thoreau, On the Duty of Civil Disobedience (New York: Houghton Mifflin, 1893).
Thinking Critically
1.	Contextualization
How would you explain Thoreau's decision to use a fugitive slave, a Mexican prisoner, and an Indian as examples of those wronged by his government? What connections might he make between the plight of all three? What was happening in the United States that might lead an author to link these different groups of people in 1849?
2.	Chronological Reasoning
What are the implications of his rejection of all government when he says, "That government is best which governs not at all." Is it necessary to agree with Thoreau in his rejection of government to agree with his critique of the War with Mexico or his decision to go to jail as a matter of conscience rather than pay taxes to support the war?
September 1846, Taylor defeated another larger Mexican force and captured the crucial Mexican town of Monterrey. With both armies now exhausted, Taylor allowed the Mexicans to withdraw peacefully and declared a truce, which infuriated Polk.
After the victory at Monterrey, Polk tried to open peace negotiations, but the Mexican government was not interested. This lack of interest came as a surprise
because the United States had secretly helped the former Mexican dictator Santa Anna
316 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
11.1
11.2
113
MAP 11-4 Battles in the U.S. War with Mexico. Once war was declared between the United States and Mexico, General Taylor led his armies into the disputed territory and further south to battles in Monterrey and Buena Vista in Northern Mexico, while General Kearney led forces across the continent to take control of Santa Fe, New Mexico, and then parts of California. The Navy played a major role in the takeover of California but also blockaded Pacific and Gulf ports in Mexico while General Winfield Scott landed at Veracruz and soon thereafter won control of Mexico City itself.
seize power in Mexico City, based on his promise to U.S. negotiators that he would
conclude a peace treaty. But once in office, Santa Anna shifted his position and pre-
pared to fight rather than bargain (see Map 11-4).
Santa Anna marched north to engage Taylor, whom he knew was now short of troops.
In February 1847, the two armies met at what Americans called the Battle of Buena Vista.
It was the largest single engagement of the war, and it was a draw, which meant that Santa
Anna had failed to defeat the Americans on Mexican soil. Taylor’s army remained intact.
Many of Taylor’s best troops had been moved further south. As Polk realized he
was in for a long fight, he also knew that Taylor could not march across the deserts to
Mexico City. The distance was too long to supply an invading army. Polk also worried
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation
317
11.2
E3
Explore the War with Mexico on WHAT DID THE TEXAS REVOLUTION AND MEXICAN-AMERICAN WAR MEAN FOR AMERICAN EXPANSION?
In the 1830s, the Mexican government faced problems in its northern state of Texas. The area was home to many Anglo-American settlers, and they were growing increasingly unhappy under Mexican governance. Texans successfully rebelled, forming the independent Republic of Texas in 1836. During the next decade, the United States annexed Texas as a new state, but disputed land claims quickly led to war between the United States and Mexico in 1846.
The U.S. victory over the Mexican forces in 1848, after a series of consecutive U.S. battle successes, led to huge territorial losses for its southern neighbor as the United States acquired the territory that today is the modern Southwest.
U.S.
General Winfield Scott led his troops into Mexico City to accept the official Mexican surrender in 1847. This popular picture shows the clean ending of the war but not the bloody battles that led to it. MAJOR BATTLES OF THE MEXICAN-AMERICAN WAR
Battle	Date	Victor	J
Battle of Palo Alto	j	May 8,1846	U.S.
Battle of Resaca de la Palma i	May 9,1846	U.S.
I
Battle of Monterrey I Sept. 21-24,1846 U.S. Battleof San Pasqual	Dec. 6,1846	Mexico
Battle of Rio San Gabriel	Jan. 8,1847	U.S.
i Battleof Buena Vista	Feb. 22-23,1847	U.S.
Battle of Sacramento Rier	Feb. 27,1847	U.S.
Battle of Veracruz	March 29,1847	U.S.
Battle of Cerro Gordo	April 18,1847	! U.S.
KEY QUESTIONS
Use MyHistoryLab£xp/orer to answer these questions: Context ►►► What was the political situation in Mexico leading up to its war with the United States?
Map the nation's transformations between the 1820s and 1840s.
Response ►►► How did the Texas Revolution unfold?
Understand the progress, troop movements, and major battles.
Consequence ►►► What did the acquisition of Mexican territory mean for the slavery in the United States?
Consider the potential implications for the extension of slavery.
318 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
about making Taylor a war hero and political rival. So he turned to the experienced professional soldier Winfield Scott to plan an invasion of the Mexican heartland.
In March 1847, after careful planning, Scott landed troops at the port of Veracruz.
(It was the largest amphibious operation of U.S. troops before D-Day during World War II.) Scott s army then marched to Mexico City, taking the same invasion route that Hernan Cortes had used against the Aztecs 328 years before (see Chapter 2). After hard fighting, Mexico City surrendered in September 1847. Polk, still worried about military heroes, then removed Scott from command in early 1848. The United States had lost 12,518 soldiers and spent almost $100 million in the war. Mexico had lost many more lives soldiers and civilians—and its economy was devastated.
From New Mexico to Alta California and the Bear Flag Revolt
While the major focus of the fighting in the U.S. war with Mexico took place on the Texas border and in the heartland of Mexico, New Mexico and California were not exempt from battles, though they were of smaller scale than anything seen elsewhere. The initial U.S. conquest of New Mexico was easy. In the summer of 1846, General Stephen Watts Kearny marched 850 miles from Fort Leavenworth, Kansas, to Santa Fe. The Mexican governor had already fled, and Kearny took silence and sullenness among the people for support or at least acceptance of the American takeover. He raised the U.S. flag in Santa Fe and promised that the government would respect the residents’ property and religious freedom as well as protect them from Indian raids. Kearny appointed Charles Bent, an American already living in Taos, as territorial governor. Then in September 1846, a month after he had arrived, Kearny marched most of his troops off to secure the US. victory in California. Although a bloody rebellion against U.S. rule by Hispanics and Indians broke out later that year, and Bent himself was killed by the rebels, U.S. troops soon suppressed it, and most armed resistance to annexation ended.
Emboldened by this show of support, a group of armed American immigrants in the inland town of Sonoma arrested General Mariano Vallejo, the man they considered the symbol of Mexican authority in Sonoma, and jailed him at Fort Sutter near Sacramento. Vallejo had retired from active duty with the Mexican government and was quite friendly to a possible American takeover. But to the Americans, Vallejo symbolized Mexican authority. With no other Mexican leader in sight, the rebels organized what they called the Bear Flag Revolt by declaring California to be an independent Republic. They also designed a flag and raised it in the town square in Sonoma. The flag displayed a large star next to a grizzly bear atop a bottom border stripe and the words “California Republic.” To the Mexicans like Vallejo, the Bear Flag was a symbol that these new immigrants were the bears who came as a thief to take their cattle and their land. Soon after Vallejo’s arrest, Sloat’s U.S. Navy squadron sailed into Monterey Bay and proclaimed U.S. conquest of California as a victory in the War with Mexico. The independent California Republic was a short-lived convenience. The rebels replaced the Bear Flag (now the state flag of California) with the Stars and Stripes.
The American conquest of California was much easier than the war along the Rio Grande in Texas. The Mexican government was much less interested in California than in Texas, a reality that had allowed a unique Californian culture to develop in the early decades of the 19th century. Mexican citizens of California, the products of this culture, had a decidedly ambivalent attitude toward annexation by the United States. Nevertheless, some native Californians opposed the American takeover and fought against the Bear Flag rebels and the American forces led by Navy Commodore Robert Stockton, who had replaced Sloat, and Captain Fremont. Those Californians saw themselves as citizens of the Republic of Mexico, even if sometimes disgruntled citizens, and they saw the Americans as an invading army. In a series of skirmishes between 1846 and 1847 35 of those fighting on the American side died in battle while an estimated eight Californios (those fighting for the Mexican cause) were killed. Later, the Californios suffered much greater losses in property and, indeed, their way of life.
Chapter 11
111
11.2
113
Bear Flag Revolt
A revolt led by recent American immigrants who temporarily declared California to be an independent Republic until U.S. forces took control of the territory.
Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 319
Ill I I
n.2
i
There were many reasons for the limited nature of the warfare in California. The total non-Indian population of California was very small, and most of the regular Mexican forces had abandoned the region before hostilities began. Probably even more significant, most of the Mexican leaders in California were really hoping for an American takeover to replace the distant and inept Mexican administration and the lawlessness of the American Bear Flag frontiersmen. In 1847, the final skirmishes between Californio defenders under Andres Pico and the American troops took place in southern California. As it became increasingly clear that no support could be expected from Mexico, Pico negotiated the terms of what he saw as an honorable surrender. In January 1847, Pico’s troops marched into Los Angeles and disbanded. The American control of the region was complete.
Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo
The treaty, signed in 1848, ended the U.S. War with Mexico and granted the United States control of all of Texas, New Mexico, and California.
Gadsden Purchase
The final acquisition of land in the continental United States was completed in 1853 when the United States paid Mexico $ 10 million for a strip of land in what is now southern New Mexico and Arizona.
Negotiating the Peace, Defining the Borders
In April 1847, Polk had sent Nicholas Trist, an experienced diplomat, to accompany Scott and negotiate a treaty with the Mexican government. After the fighting in Mexico City had ended, Trist began serious negotiations. With Mexico City, New Mexico, and California already in the hands of the U.S. Army, however, Polk decided that Trist was not being tough enough and recalled him. Instead of returning to Washington, Trist warned the Mexican authorities that he had been recalled and that his replacement would demand much more. Perhaps they might want to conclude a treaty quickly with him. The Mexicans were anxious to end the U.S. occupation of Mexico City and the country’s key ports, and Trist was right: after the conquest of Mexico City, Polk wanted even more Mexican territory. On February 2, 1848, Trist and the Mexican commissioners signed the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo. Trist told his wife that he had asked Mexico for the minimum that Polk would accept because he was ashamed of “the iniquity of the war, as an abuse of power on our part.” But his minimum included all of Polks original demands-all of Texas to the Rio Grande and land further west to California as far south as San Diego. Mexico was paid $15 million, which went to its creditors. The treaty may have been for less land than Polk wanted, but it reshaped both the United States and Mexico.
A furious President Polk, realizing that he was stuck with the treaty that Trist had negotiated, submitted it to the Senate, which ratified it. But Polk refused to pay Trist for his services. (Trist was not paid until 1871.) The Whig-affiliated editor Horace Greeley wrote in his New York Tribune, “Let us have peace, no matter if the adjuncts are revolting.” The abolitionist Frederick Douglass was harsher: “They have succeeded in robbing Mexico of her territory, and are rejoicing over their success under the hypocritical pretense of a regard for peace.” Nevertheless, with the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo, peace had come. The United States was much larger as a result of the war, now including 90,000 new citizens who had been citizens of Mexico and even more Indians who preferred to stay independent of both countries. It was a different country from when Polk took office.
In 1853, one of Polk’s successors, President Franklin Pierce, sent James Gadsden to Mexico City with instructions to buy a strip of land south of Arizona and New Mexico for a southern transcontinental railroad from New Orleans to El Paso to Los Angeles, which needed to be located south of the Rocky Mountains. Gadsden was also told to purchase as much additional land as possible, including perhaps all of Baja California. Mexican authorities suspected that the United States was after much more than a railroad route. In the end, Mexico sold only the minimum that the United States wanted. For $10 million, money its government badly needed, Mexico ceded 39,000 sparsely populated square miles to the United States. This area, known as the Gadsden Purchase, was the final extension of U.S. territory within what would be the contiguous 48 states (see Map 11-5).
In his own eyes, Polk had an amazingly successful term. He had made the United States a continental nation. He had completed the job he had promised to do and did not seek a second term. For the election of 1848, Polk’s Democrats nominated Lewis
320 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Territorial expansion in the nineteenth century Date of terntor'Ht acquisition, i e . 1850 Date of statehood ie WM a Original thirteen states 1783 □ Great Britain Cession 1783
Louisiana Purchase 1803
Florida Purchase 1819
L.-un Texas Annexation 1845 [... ...I Mexican Cession 1848
Acquired from Great Britainl818 I _J Acquired from Great Britain 1842 EZZ3 Oregon Country 1846	Gadsen Purchase 1853
MAP 11-5 An Expanded Union. With the treaty setting the Oregon border in 1846 and the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo in 1848, the territory of the continental United States was almost set. The small Gadsden Purchase in 1853 made it easier to build a railroad south of the Rocky Mountains.
Cass of Michigan. The Whigs, having won once with a general and having lost three
limes „,h then hero Henry Clay, turned to a new war hero and nominated Genera
Zachary, Taylor, known as "Old Rough and Ready,” and former Congressman Millard
Fillmore from New York as Taylor’s running mate. While Taydor was as strong a , eiovroIrnlHer and Cass, like Polk, was an expan-
nationahst as Jackson, he was also a slaveno	,
,i„ ■. m ,	,i km cbvprv could not stomach either of them and some
siomst. Northerners opposed to slavery couiu
treated the Free Soil Party, which was committed to ensunng that all new terr.torre
would be free of slavery, fhe Free Soilers did not propose abolishing slavery where r.
already existed but did oppose any extension of slavery into any new terrrtor.es. Using
that platform, they nominated former P	ironic Qutcome for President
three-way race, Taylor won a solid vie y .	ciaUy On the issue of the
Polk. The Whigs had opposed Polk	creating military heroes throughout the
ar with Mexico, and the presi en	tg on
war. In the end, a Whig war hero succeeded him. A lime o y
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 321

a hot July 4th of 1850, Taylor suddenly died and Vice President Fillmore ascended to the presidency. This time, however, unlike Tyler s accession with the death of Harrison, there were no major policy shifts when Fillmore took office.
11.2
Quick Review Considering U.S. actions in Texas and California, was the Mexican-American War a "land grab"? Why or why not?
113
California Gold Rush
The rush to find gold that brought thousands of new residents to California and produced millions of dollars in new wealth for the region and the United States.
WEST INTO THE PACIFIC_______________________________________________________
Describe the causes and outcomes of U.S. expansion in California and into the Pacific region, including establishing new relationships with Hawaii, China, and Japan.
Early in his term of office, President Polk had told Congress that he was interested in acquiring Californias harbors from Mexico because, he said, these ports would shelter American ships and allow the Pacific Ocean to provide the basis for “an extensive and profitable commerce with China, and other countries of the East.” He had no idea how quickly his dream would come true. Even before the negotiations with Mexico were complete, gold was discovered in California, and the resulting Gold Rush made into thriving commercial centers not only the gold camps but also the cities around harbors that Polk wanted. These same Pacific coast harbors quickly became home to American ships that had been dominating much of the Pacific Ocean for a decade before Polk spoke. In the 1840s, American whaling ships led all other nations in the whale trade in the Pacific, and the U.S. Navy led the way to American negotiations for a role in trade with Hawaii and China. After the acquisition of California, the Navy also established a trading relationship with Japan. After 1848, the profits of the Pacific trade poured into the United States through the newly acquired Pacific ports. The acquisition of Oregon and California not only expanded the United States to the Pacific coast but also allowed the nation to become a dominant player all across the Pacific Ocean.
The Gold Rush to California
Another 1848 development was perhaps even more important to Californias history than the shift in political authority from Mexico to the United States. On January 24, 1848, while American and Mexican negotiators were still meeting in the Mexican town of Guadalupe Hidalgo, James Marshall, a carpenter at the fort and mill owned by Swiss native Johann Sutter on the American River in northern California, was deepening the channel going into the mill’s water wheel when he noticed some odd material in the water. He reported, “Boys, I believe I have found a gold mine.” His was the first discovery of gold that would quickly lead to the California Gold Rush.
Sutter and Marshall tried to keep the discovery a secret, but word spread all too quickly. By May 1848, everyone in San Francisco seemed to know that gold had been discovered. And while communications were still slow, prospective miners from all over California—Indians, long time Mexican residents, and American settlers--as well as immigrants from Oregon, Hawaii, Mexico, and as far away as Chile, Peru, Australia, France, and parts of China moved into the gold fields of the Sierra Nevada mountains. The rush was on. Two-thirds of the white men in Oregon came south to California. Recently discharged soldiers from the Mexican and American armies joined them there. In the earliest days, California Indians who knew the land best made excellent gold prospectors. Newcomers expressed surprise that in the first year of the gold rush Miwok Indian women panned for gold alongside of Miwok men and the newcomers from around the globe. The diversity in the fields did not last.
In August 1848, an article in the New York Herald included a brief mention that gold, worth in value $30, was picked up in the bed of a stream of the Sacramento. President Polk, determined to show the value of the newly acquired territory,
322 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
113
included a mention in l,,s Annual Message to Congress. Ten million dollars in gold produced in California in 1848, and within 3 years, the revenue had grown to
S22O million. So much gold changed the economic calculations of the United States and much of the world from China to South America to Europe. Suddenly, there was a great deal of gold in circulation everywhere.
Thousands of people wanted to get rich quickly by coming to California to find the gold. California’s non-Indian population was around 7,000 in 1845. It had grown to almost 93,000 in the first U.S. census of 1850. While the first prospectors had come from the south—Mexico and South America—and the east—from Pacific whaling ships, Hawaii, and China by 1849, the largest numbers were coming from the eastern United States and Europe. Getting to California from other parts of the United States or Europe could mean a long, slow, and expensive trip by ocean around the southern tip of South America. It could also involve a shorter sea voyage to Nicaragua, then an overland trek by pack mule across the isthmus, and another voyage from there up to San Francisco. Still for others, it could mean traveling overland by walking and on ox-drawn wagons across the continent. Sea travel around South America was certainly the most comfortable and perhaps safest, but it cost a lot, from $300 to $700, and it was slow, taking 4 to 8 months. The trip via Nicaragua or Panama was almost as expensive, perhaps $600, and dangerous, but it was certainly the fastest, taking 5 to 8 weeks. Coming by land across the continent was by far the cheapest, costing not more than $200, but it also took at least 3 months and had to be timed just right to avoid winter on the Rocky Mountains. The majority opted for the cheapest way. Small numbers of people had been coming west for decades, but in 1849-50, many thousands of prospective Californians traveled along the Platte and Humboldt Rivers and then the Oregon and California Trails into the gold fields (see Map 11-3).
The gold camps themselves were harsh places. Fortunes were made and lost not only in the fields but also at gambling tables and through theft and intimidation. White Americans, some of them very recent Americans, resented the competition of miners from South America and elsewhere, especially those who came from China or who were Indians or Californios. Within a short time, most Chinese and Indians miners had been driven from the gold fields through violence and intimidation, though some Indians were retained to work for subsistence wages mining gold for others while the Chinese found other kinds of work, eventually building the western railroads and developing service industries for miners and others.
The incredible jump in California’s immigrant population came at a terrible cost for the California Indians. Their population, already declining in the face of the missions, declined much more rapidly after the beginnings of the Gold Rush because of disease and outright murder, decreasing by almost 85 percent between 1848 and 1880 to 23,000. African slaves were rare both because slave owners knew it was all too easy for a slave to escape in California and because other miners hated all competition.
Few women were able to succeed as miners; indeed, far fewer women than men even came to California in the gold rush. Mining camps were overwhelmingly male communities. Some women who did come to California were forced or tricked into prostitution to pay for their passage from Europe, China, and Latin America.
The most freewheeling era of the gold camps was very short lived. By 1851, the chances of finding gold by simply looking in a stream bed, as Marshall and Sutter had done in 1848, or even finding gold with a pan had pretty much ended except in the more southerly Tuolumne and Merced gold regions. Some miners began using a “rocker” or “cradle” that washed dirt out more quickly. Soon enough gold mining was transformed into large-scale hydraulic mining which required large corporate investments and reduced most miners to hired labor. Even for hired laborers, though mining paid much better than most East Coast jobs, the possibility of making
r	,	,,	■	z-nntimied and fortunes were still made in the gold
a fortune evaporated. Gold mining continued ano ioi iu	&
fields, but the Gold Rush was over.
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 323
11.3
Whaling in the Pacific Ocean
In February 1849, the owners of the whaling ship Minerva from New Bedford, Massachusetts, received a letter from its captain. The communication reported that, after hunting whales in the Pacific, he had stopped in San Francisco for supplies and to recruit more sailors, “but the excitement there in relation to the discovery of gold made it impossible to prevent the crew from running away. Three of the crew in attempting to swim ashore were drowned, and the ship’s company soon became too much reduced to continue the whaling voyage.” The Minerva thus joined dozens of other whaling ships abandoned in San Francisco harbor while their crews sought wealth in the California gold fields.
Some sailors no doubt found fortunes in the gold fields that had eluded them at sea, and some ship owners lost substantial sums when their ships were abandoned, but in general, the whaling industry was a source of wealth to some Americans while supporting many others and contributing to the growth of the American economy. The golden age of the American whaling industry began after the War of 1812 and continued until the outbreak of the Civil War in 1861. During these years, hundreds of American ships moved from their earlier and safer whale hunts in the Atlantic to 2-, 3-, and 4-year voyages to the Pacific Ocean. Whale oil, which burned brighter than any other fuel available at the time, was used for lamps across the globe. Whale products provided oil for the industrial revolution as well as the bone for the hoop dresses and corsets that were the height of women’s fashion. Despite British efforts to launch their own whaling fleets, by the 1830s four-fifths of all the whaling ships in the world were American.
The owners and captains of most American whaling ships were mostly men of old New England English stock, many of them Quakers, but there were exceptions. A few African-Americans, including Paul Cuffee and Absalom F. Boston, became captains,
Clipper ships like the famous Flying Cloud made the trip from New York to San Francisco in record speed-89 days in one case—while slower whaling ships traveling from New Bedford and other Atlantic ports into the Pacific often took 2 or 3 years. During the 1830s and 1840s, American sailing ships projected American influence into the Pacific Ocean region as never before.
324 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
and Cuffee became a ship owner. The crews, white and black, came from almost every corner of the globe-Pacific Islanders, West Indians, South Americans, or Portuguese. Whaling was one of the few occupations in which blacks were paid the same as whites. Even a runaway slave could admit, as John Thompson did in 1840, “I am a fugitive slave from Maryland....1 thought I would go on a whaling voyage, as being a place where I stood least chance of being arrested by slave hunters.” By some estimates, 10 percent of those who worked on whaling ships were black. Nevertheless, most sailors in the whaling business were white men, like Ishmael, the fictional narrator of Herman Melville s 1851 novel Moby-Dick, though like the fictional Ishmael, the real-world whites served as part of racially diverse crews.
Few women served on whaling ships. There were occasional stories of women who hid their gender and embarked with the crew, not easy in the close quarters of a small ship on a long voyage. Some captains also took along their wives and children, and some crew members said they appreciated having a woman on board who might know more medicine than the men and who could soothe an angry captain.
Whaling ships also explored parts of the world unknown to previous generations of Americans. The first Americans to enter Japan were whaling sailors. Almost a decade before Commodore Perry’s famous voyage to “open up” Japan in 1853-54, the Manhattan entered Tokyo harbor in 1845 to return shipwrecked Japanese sailors. The Superior was the first whaling ship to enter the Arctic Ocean off the coast of Alaska in 1848. U.S. whaling ships explored much of the South Pacific, sailed off the coast of Australia, and explored Antarctica. As a result of the many whaling ships that anchored there, Honolulu and San Francisco became major American ports, rivaling New Bedford, Boston, and Nantucket.
The Navy and Diplomacy Across the Pacific
While many American whaling ships had been sailing the Pacific since 1815, the 1848
Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo added a string of Pacific ports, especially San Francisco,
to the United States. Indeed, the push for Pacific Ocean ports had been part of the
driving force behind President Polk’s push for war. The acquisition of those ports
expanded U.S. interest in the Pacific and beyond. By 1851, Daniel Webster, who had
become secretary of state again under President Fillmore, proclaimed that the United
States should “command the oceans, both oceans, all the oceans.
Central to the “command” of the Pacific Ocean was securing U.S. influence in Hawaii. In 1778, the British explorer Captain James Cook was the first European to reach the Hawaiian Islands, but by the mid-19th century, the United States had a much larger presence in Hawaii. Many Protestant missionaries and merchants began arriving in Hawaii in the 1820s where they built churches, schools, and businesses. Missionaries, merchants, and whalers boosted the Hawaiian economy, but they also brought alcohol, gambling, prostitution, and disease, including venereal diseases that killed many Hawaiians and reduced the islanders’ ability to maintain their independence.
On occasion, the United States did protect the native Hawaiians. An American missionary, William Richards, advised King Kamehameha II (r. 1819-1824) on ways to maneuver among the great powers and play the United States, Britain, and France against each other. In 1842, Secretary of State Daniel Webster added Hawaii to the protections of the Monroe Doctrine and made it clear that the United States would not tolerate a British or French takeover. In 1851, Webster negotiated a secret treaty with King Kamehameha III that, in the event of war, Hawaii would become a U.S. protectorate Webster’s priority was securing trading rights and the use of Honolulu as a coaling station for U.S. steamships-merchant vessels and warships-on their way to trade with China and Japan.
Just as the United States gained San Francisco and influence in Hawaii, Britain was forcing China to open to the West. China saw itself as the center of the world.
Foreigners were barbarians who might be allowed to trade in a limited way through
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 325
A
Japanese artist captured a U.S. Navy commanded by Commodore Mathew Perry landing in Tokyo and demanding that Japan open itself to trade with the United States. Kanagawa Treaty
An 1854 agreement-the first between the United States and Japan-it opened two Japanese ports to American commerce, protected shipwrecked American sailors, and ended Japan's 200 years of isolation.
the port of Guangzhou but would never be treated as equals. Despite the restrictions, American merchants wanted access to more trade with China, and American missionaries wanted access to its people. Regardless, both were mostly shut out. Losing patience with the Chinese, the British turned to violence. In the so-called Opium War (1839-1842), the British forced China to open its ports to British products, including opium from British India, and cede Hong Kong Island as a British colony. Following in the footsteps of the British, U.S. Ambassador Caleb Cushing negotiated the Treaty of Wang-hsia in 1844, which gained the United States the same trade rights as the British.
While Britain took the lead in China, the United States forced the even more isolated Empire of Japan to open to the West. The United States wanted Japan as another coaling station beyond Hawaii on the route to China and wanted to trade with Japan for its own sake. President Fillmore sent Commodore Mathew Perry to “open up” Japan and force a “weak and semi-barbarous people” to deal with the United States. In July 1853, Perry led four large warships with nearly 1,000 sailors into Tokyo Bay and began negotiations. He returned in March 1854 with an even larger fleet. Perry did everything he could to impress the Japanese, providing Japanese officials with champagne, Kentucky bourbon, and a history of the war with Mexico to let them know what happened to those who opposed United States might. In return, the Japanese grudgingly agreed to the Kanagawa Treaty that opened two relatively iso-lated ports to the United States. Only in 1858 did Japan open more ports and establish formal diplomatic relations with other countries. Britain quickly became a larger economic and military force in Japan than the United States. Nevertheless, the United States had established a solid presence in Japan and China by the late 1850s.
As a result of expansion in the 1840s, the nation’s border was extended to the Pacific, and U.S. ships sailed everywhere on that ocean. The Pacific and every nation on its shores including China, Japan, and Russian Siberia were in much closer contact with the United States than they had been a short time before. After 1848, the United States was an emerging force in the world.
113
Quick Review Was expansion to other nations (Hawaii, China, Japan) a logical extension of Manifest Destiny? How were U.S. intentions across the Pacific different than U.S. goals in North America?
326
Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
CONCLUSION
From the late 1830s through the 1840s, the United States became a continental power whose territory spanned from the Atlantic to the Pacific oceans. A strong belief in the Manifest Destiny of the United States justified the Louisiana Purchase of 1803 (though the term was not yet in use) and supported hoped-for territory acquisitions from Oregon to Texas to California. Manifest Destiny reflected the larger belief that the United States was specially chosen by divine will to bring liberty and democracy— usually in its Jacksonian form—to the planet.
While Americans discussed Manifest Destiny, the nation experienced hard times in the 1830s. The financial Panic of 1837, brought on by a worldwide glut in trade, created economic uncertainty in the cotton-growing South and the industrial North. It took several years for the nation’s economy to recover.
Many Americans supported versions of Manifest Destiny for varied political or economic reasons, while others had grave reservations. Whether one supported or opposed slavery played directly into views about expansion, which new territories one wanted, and how new territories would be used. Military actions that leaders took in the name of Manifest Destiny led to territorial expansion that spanned the continent to the Pacific coast.
During the presidency of James Polk, Texas entered the Union as a slave state, and after a bloody war from 1846 to 1848, Mexico ceded much of what became the American West to the United States, including New Mexico and—aided by the local Bear Flag Revolt—California. While many Americans, from politicians like John Quincy Adams to philosophers like Henry David Thoreau, opposed the War with Mexico, many other Americans celebrated the victory and the acquisition of so much new territory. The United States also ended the joint ownership of the Oregon Territory with Britain, and both countries resolved borders that allowed each country to have full control of its share. The Gold Rush accelerated the settlement of California with diverse people, and it produced enormous amounts of gold but decimated the American Indian population in the far west.
Winning California from Mexico dramatically changed the U.S. economy not only in terms of gold but also in terms of increased ventures throughout the Pacific involving whaling and trade. The United States now projected Manifest Destiny across an ocean where it had few rivals. The United States became the world leader in the production of whale oil, established a relationship with Hawaii, increased its trade with China, and forced Japan to open itself up to the West. The intensification of American interest in Asia in the 1840s and 1850s reflected the desire of American policy makers to successfully compete with Europe for new markets and coincided with the realization of the long-standing desire among many Americans to create a continental nation that could become a world power.
CHAPTER
REVIEW
How did U.S. reliance on the idea of Manifest Destiny permanently alter the geographical, social, and political complexion of the United States?
Chapter 11 Manifest Destiny: Expanding the Nation 327
Chapter 11 Chapter Review
MANIFEST DESTINY—THE IMPORTANCE OF AN IDEA
Explain what Manifest Destiny meant and how it led the United States to involvement in Texas, California, and Oregon.
Review Questions
1.	Crafting Arguments
Was the war that broke out in 1835 between the Mexican government and American settlers in Texas inevitable? Why or why not?
2.	Contextualization
Why was the status of Texas such a divisive political issue in the early 1840s?
3.	Historical Interpretation
What light do the letters of Narcissa Whitman (see the American Voice feature on page 312) shed on the motives behind American settlement in the Oregon Territory in the 1830s?
11.1
5.	Contextualization
What connections did opponents of the U.S. War with Mexico make between the war and slavery?
6.	Historical Interpretation
What changes did incorporation into the United States bring to the society and economy of the former Mexican provinces of New Mexico and California?
WEST INTO THE PACIFIC________________________________
Analyze the causes and outcomes of U.S. expansion into the Pacific region, including establishing new relationships with Hawaii, China, and Japan.
Review Questions
7.	Historical Interpretation
What role did the whaling industry play in American expansion in the Pacific in the first half of the 19th century?
8.	Crafting Arguments
How would you explain the intensification of American interest in Asia in the 1840s and 1850s?
I
11J
THE U.S. WAR WITH MEXICO,
1846-1848 1M
Analyze the causes, strategies, and outcomes of the U.S. War with Mexico.
Review Questions
4.	Crafting Arguments
Is it fair to describe the U.S. War with Mexico as a war of conquest? Why or why not?
328 Part IV Crafting a Nation, People, Land, and a National Identity, 1800-1848
Expansion, Separation, and a New Union
1844-1877
PART
PART OUTLINE
CHAPTER 12
Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations, 1831-1854
The Changing Face of the American People in the 1840s and 1850s Slavery in the United States, 1840s and 1850s New Strength for American Women
